2
THE LINWOODS.
CHAPTER I.
Un notable exemple de la forcene curiosit de notre nature,
s'amusant se proccuper des choses futures, comme si elle n'avoit
pas assez  faire  dsirer les prsentes
.
Montaigne
.
Some
two or three years before our revolutionary
war, just at the close of day, two girls were seen
entering Broadway through a wicket garden-gate,
in the rear of a stately mansion which fronted on
Broad-street, that being then the court-end of the
citythe residence of unquestioned aristocracy
(sic transit gloria mundi!) whence royal favour
and European fashions were diffused through the
province of New-York.
The eldest of the two girls had entered on her
teens. She was robust and tall for her years, with the
complexion of a Hebe, very dark hair, an eye (
albeit
belonging to one of the weaker sex) that
looked as if she were born to empireit might be
over hearts and eyesand the step of a young
Juno. The younger could be likened neither to
goddess, queen, nor any thing that assumed or loved
command. She was of earth's gentlest and finest
mouldframed for all tender humanities, with the
destiny of woman written on her meek brow. Thou
art born to love, to suffer, to obey,to minister, and
not to be ministered to. Well did she fulfil her
mission! The girls were followed by a black
servant
in livery. The elder pressed forward as if
impelled by some powerful motive, while her
companion
lagged behind,sometimes chasing a young
bird, then smelling the roses that peeped through
the garden-paling; now stopping to pat a
good-natured
mastiff, or caress a chubby child: many a
one attracted her with its broad shining face and
linsey-woolsey
short-gown and petticoat, seated with
the family group on the freshly-scoured stoops of
the Dutch habitations that occurred at intervals on
their way. Come, do come along, Bessie, you
are stopping for every thing, said her companion,
impatiently. Poor Bessie, with the keenest
sensibility
,
had, what rarely accompanies it, a general
susceptibility to external impressions,one might
have fancied she had an extra set of nerves. When
the girls had nearly reached St. Paul's church, their
attendant remonstrated,Miss Isabella, you are
getting quite out to the fieldsmissis said you
were only going a turn up the Broadway.
So I am, Jupe.
A pretty long turn, muttered Jupiter; and
after proceeding a few paces further, he added, in
a raised voice, the sun is going down, Miss
Isabella
.
That was news at 12 o'clock, Jupiter.
But it really is nearly set now, Isabella,
interposed
her companion Bessie.
Well, what if it is, Bessie?it is just the right
timeEffie is always surest between sundown and
dark.
Mercy, Isabella! you are not going to Effie's.
It is horrid to go there after sundownplease
Isabella
,
don't. Isabella only replied by a pshaw,
child! and a laugh.
Bessie mustered her moral courage (it required
it all to oppose Isabella), and stopping short, said,
I am not sure it is right to go there at all.
There is no right nor wrong in the matter,
Bessie,you are always splitting hairs.
Notwithstanding
her bold profession, Isabella paused,
and with a tremulousness of voice that indicated
she was not indifferent to the cardinal points in her
path of morality, she added,why do you think
it is not right, Bessie?
Because the Bible says, that sorcery, and
divination
,
and every thing of that kind, is wicked.
Nonsense, child! that was in old times, you
know.
Isabella's evsion might have quieted a
rationalist
of the present day, but not Bessie, who had
been bred in the strict school of New-England
orthodoxy
;
and she replied, What was right and wrong
in old times, is right and wrong now, Isabella.
Don't preach, BessieI will venture all the
harm of going to Effie's; and you may lay the sin
at my door; and with her usual independent,
fear-naught
air, she turned into a shady lane that led by a
cross-cut to Aunt Katy's garden,a favourite
resort
of the citizens for rural recreations. The
Chatham-street
theatre has since occupied the same spot
that theatre is now a church. Isabella
quickened
her pace. Bessie followed most unwillingly.
Miss Belle, cried out Jupiter, I must detest,
in your ma's name, against your succeeding farther.
The tiresome old fool! With this
exclamation
on her lips, Isabella turned round, and
drawing
her person up to the height of womanhood, she
added, I shall go just as far as I please, Jupe
follow
me; if anybody is scolded it shall be me, not
you. I wish mamma, she continued, pursuing
her way, would not send Jupe after us,just as
if we were two babies in leading-strings.
I would not go a step farther for the world, if
he were not with us, said Bessie.
And pray, what good would he do us if there
were dangersuch a desperate coward as he is?
He is a man, Isabella.
He has the form of oneJupe, she called out
(the spirit of mischief playing about her arch
mouth), pointing to a slight elevation, called
Gallows
hill, where a gibbet was standing, Jupe, is
not that the place where they hung the poor
creatures
who were concerned in the negro-plot?
Yes, miss, sure it is the awful place: and he
2*
mended his pace, to be as near as might be to the
young ladies.
Did not some of your relations suffer there,
Jupiter?
Yes, miss, two of my poster'tymy
grandmother
and aunt Venus.
Isabella repressed a smile, and said, with
unaffected
seriousness, it was a shocking business,
Bessiea hundred and fifty poor wretches
sacrificed
,
I have heard papa say. Is it true, Jupe, that
their ghosts walk about here, and have been seen
many a time when it was so dark you could not
see your hand before your face?
I dare say, Miss Belle. Them that's hung
onjustly
always travels.
But how could they be seen in such darkness?
'Case, miss, you know ghosts have a light in
their anterior, just like lanterns.
Ah, have they? I never understood it before
what a horrid cracking that gibbet makes! Bless
us! and there is very little wind.
That makes no distinctions, miss; it begins as
the sun goes down, and keeps it up all night. Miss
Belle, stop one minutedon't go across the hill
that is right in the ghost-track!
Oh don't, for pity's sake, Isabella, said Bessie,
imploringly.
Hush, Bessie, it is the shortest way, and (in
a whisper) I want to scare Jupe. Jupe, it seems
to me there is an odd hot feel in the ground here.
There sarten is, miss, a very onhealthy
feeling
.
And, my goodness! Jupiter, don't you feel a
very,
very
slight kind of a tremblinga shakeor
a roll, as if something were walking in the earth,
under our feet?
I do, and it gets worser and worser, every step.
It feels like children playing under the bed,
and hitting the sacking with their heads.
Oh, Lord, missyesit goes bump, bump,
against my feet.
By this time they had passed to the further side
of the hill, so as to place the gibbet between them
and the western sky, lighted up with one of those
brilliant and transient radiations that sometimes
immediately succeed the sun's setting, diffusing a
crimson glow, and outlining the objects relieved
against the sky with light red. Our young
heroine
,
like all geniuses, knew how to seize a
circumstance
.
Oh, Jupe, she exclaimed, look, what
a line of blood is drawn round the gibbet!
The Lord have marcy on us, miss!
And, dear me! I think I see a faint shadow of
a man with a rope round his neck, and his head on
one sidedo you see, Jupe?
Poor Jupe did not reply. He could bear it no
longer. His fear of his young mistresshis fear
of a scolding at home, all were merged in the
terror
Isabella had conjured up by the aid of the
traditionary
superstitions with which his mind was
previously
filled; and without attempting an answer,
he fairly ran off the ground, leaving Isabella
laughing
,
and Bessie expostulating, and confessing that
she did not in the least wonder that poor Jupe was
scared. Once more she ventured to entreat
Isabella
to give up the expedition to Effie's, for this
time at least, when she was interrupted and
reassured
by the appearance of two friends, in the
persons
of Isabella's brother and Jasper Meredith,
returning, with their dogs and guns, from a day's
sport.
What wild-goose chase are you on, Belle, at this
time of day? asked her brother. I am sure
Bessie Lee has not come to Gallows hill with her
own good will.
I have made game of my goose, at any rate,
and given Bessie Lee a good lesson, on what our
old schoolmaster would call the potentiality of
mankind
but
come, she added, for though rather
ashamed to confess her purpose when she knew
ridicule
must be braved, courage was easier to Isabella
than subterfuge, Come along with us to Effie's,
and I will tell you the joke I played off on Jupe.
Isabella's joke seemed to her auditors a capital one,
for they were at that happy age when laughter does
not ask a reason to break forth from the full
fountain
of youthful spirits. Isabella spun out her story
till they reached Effie's door, which admitted them,
not to any dark laboratory of magic, but to a snug
little Dutch parlour, with a nicely-sanded floora
fireplace gay with the flowers of the season,
pionies
and Guelder-roses, and ornamented with storied
tiles, that, if not as classic, were, as we can vouch,
far more entertaining than the sculptured marble of
our own luxurious days.
The pythoness Effie turned her art to good
account
,
producing substantial comforts by her
mysterious
science; and playing her cards well for this
world, whatever bad dealings she might have with
another. Even Bessie felt her horror of
witchcraft
diminished before this plump personage, with
a round, good-humoured face, looking far more
like the good vrow of a Dutch picture than like the
gaunt skinny hag who has personated the professors
of the bad art from the Witch of Endor downwards.
Effie's physiognomy, save an ominous contraction
of her eyelids, and the keen and somewhat sinister
glances that shot between them, betrayed nothing
of her calling.
There were, as on all similar occasions, some
initiatory ceremonies to be observed before the
fortunes
were told. Herbert, boylike, was penniless;
and he offered a fine brace of snipe to propitiate
the oracle. They were accepted with a smile that
augured well for the official response he should
receive
.
Jasper's purse, too, was empty: and after
ransacking his pockets in vain, he slipped out a
gold sleeve-button, and told Effie he would redeem
it the next time he came her way. Meanwhile
there was a little by-talk between Isabella and
Bessie
;
Isabella insisting on paying the fee for her
friend, and Bessie insisting that she would have no
fortune told,that she did not believe Effie could
tell it, and if she could, she would not for all the
world let her. In vain Isabella ridiculed and
reasoned by turns. Bessie, blushing and trembling,
persisted. Effie at the same moment was shuffling
a pack of cards, as black as if they had been sent
up from Pluto's realms; and while she was
muttering
over some incomprehensible phrases, and
apparently absorbed in the manipulations of her
art, she heard and saw all that passed, and
determined
that if poor little Bessie would not
acknowledge
,
she should feel her power.
Herbert, the most incredulous, and therefore the
boldest, first came forward to confront his destiny.
A great deal of rising in the world, and but little
sinking for you, Master Herbert Linwoodyou
are to go over the salt water, and ride foremost in
royal hunting-grounds.
Good!good!go on, Effie.
Oh what beauties of horsesa pack of hounds
High! how the steeds gohow they leapthe
buck is at baythere are you!
Capital, Effie!I strike him down?
You are too fast, young masterI can tell no
more than I seethe sport is pastthe place is
changedthere is a battle-field, drums, trumpets,
and flags flyingAh, there is a sign of dangera
pit yawns at your feet.
Shocking! cried Bessie; pray, don't listen
any more, Herbert.
Pshaw, Bessie! I shall clear the pit. Effie
loves snipe too well to leave me the wrong side of
that.
Effie was either offended at Herbert's intimation
that her favours might be bought, or perhaps she
saw his lack of faith in his laughing eye, and,
determined
to punish him, she declared that all was
dark and misty beyond the pit; there might be a
leap over it, and a smooth road beyondshe could
not tellshe could only tell what she saw.
You are a croaking raven, Effie! exclaimed
Herbert; I'll shuffle my own fortune; and seizing
the cards, he handled them as knowingly as the
sibyl herself, and ran over a jargon quite as
unintelligible
;
and then holding them fast, quite out
of Effie's reach, he ran onAh, haI see the
mist going off like the whiff from a Dutchman's
pipe; and here's a grand castle, and parks, and
pleasure-grounds
;
and here am I, with a fair blue-eyed
lady, within it. Then dashing down the cards, he
turned and kissed Bessie's reddening cheek,
saying
,
Let others wait on fortune, Effie, I'll carve
my own.
Isabella was nettled at Herbert's open contempt
of Effie's seership. She would not confess nor
examine the amount of her faith, nor did she choose
to be made to feel on how tottering a base it rested.
She was exactly at that point of credulity where
much depends on the sympathy of others. It is
said to be essential to the success of animal
magnetism
,
that not only the operator and the subject,
but the spectators, should believe. Isabella felt
she was on disenchanted ground, while Herbert,
with his quizzical smile, stood charged, and aiming
at her a volley of ridicule; and she proposed that
those who had yet their fortunes to hear should,
one after another, retire with Effie to a little inner
room. But Herbert cried out, Fair play, fair
play! Dame Effie has read the riddle of my
destiny
to you all, and now it is but fair I should hear
yours.
Bessie saw Isabella's reluctance, and she again
interposed, reminding her of mammathe coming
night, &c.; and poor Isabella was fain to give up
the contest for the secret conference, and hush
Bessie, by telling Effie to proceed.
Shall I tell your
fortin
and that young
gentleman's
together? asked Effie, pointing to Jasper.
Her manner was careless; but she cast a keen
glance at Isabella, to ascertain how far she might
blend their destinies.
Oh, no, nono partnership for me, cried
Isabella, while the fire which flashed from her eye
evinced that the thought of a partnership with
Jasper
,
if disagreeable, was not indifferent to her.
Nor for me, either, mother Effie, said Jasper;
or if there be a partnership, let it be with the
pretty blue-eyed mistress of Herbert's mansion.
Nay, master, that pretty miss does not choose
her fortune toldand she's rightpoor thing!
she added, with an ominous shake of the head.
Bessie's heart quailed, for she both believed and
feared.
Now, shame on you, Effie, cried Herbert;
she cannot know any thing about you, Bessie;
she has not even looked at your fortune yet.
Did I say I
knew,
Master Herbert? Time must
show whether I know or not.
Bessie still looked apprehensively. Nonsense,
said Herbert; what can she know?she never
saw you before.
True, I never saw her; but I tell you, young
lad, there is such a thing as seeing the shadow of
things far distant and past, and never seeing the
realities, though they it be that cast the shadows.
Bessie shudderedEffie shuffled the cards. Now
just for a trial, said she; I will tell you
something
about hernot of the future; for I'd be loath
to overcast her sky before the time comesbut of
the past.
Pray, do not, interposed Bessie; I don't wish
you to say any thing about me, past, present, or to
come.
Oh, Bessie, whispered Isabella, let her try
there can be no harm if you do not ask her
the past is past, you knownow we have a chance
to know if she really is wiser than others. Bessie
again resolutely shook her head.
VOL. I.B 3
Let her go on, whispered Herbert, and see
what a fool she will make of herself.
Let her go on, dear Bessie, said Jasper, or
she will think she has made a fool of you.
Bessie feared that her timidity was folly in
Jasper's
eyes; and she said, she may go on if you all
wish, but I will not hear her; and she covered
her ears with her hands.
Shall I? asked Effie, looking at Isabella;
Isabella nodded assent, and she proceeded. She
has come from a great distanceher people are
well to do in the world, but not such quality as
yours, Miss Isabella Linwoodshe has found
some things here pleasanter than she expected
some not so pleasantthe house she was born in
stands on the sunny side of a hill. At each pause
that Effie made, Isabella gave a nod of
acquiescence
to what she said; and this, or some stray
words, which might easily have found their way
through Bessie's little hands, excited her curiosity,
and by degrees they slid down so as to oppose a
very slight obstruction to Effie's voice. Before
the house, she continued, and not so far distant
but she may hear its roaring, when a storm uplifts
it, is the wide seathat sea has cost the poor child
dear. Bessie's heart throbbed audibly. Since
she came here she has both won love and lost it.
There, there you are out, cried Herbert, glad
of an opportunity to stop the current that was
becoming
too strong for poor Bessie.
She can best tell herself whether I am right,
said Effie, coolly.
She is rightright in all, said Bessie,
retreating
to conceal the tears that were starting from her
eyes.
Isabella neither saw nor heard thisshe was
only struck with what Effie delivered as a proof of
her preternatural skill; and more than ever eager
to inquire into her own destiny, she took the place
Bessie had vacated.
Effie saw her faith, and was determined to
reward
it. Miss Isabella Linwood, you are born
to walk in no common track,she might have
read this prediction, written with an unerring hand
on the girl's lofty brow, and in her eloquent
eye. You will be both served and honoured
those that have stood in kings' palaces will bow
down to youbut the sun does not always shine
on the luckiestyou will have a dark daytrouble
when you least expect itjoy when you are not
looking for it. This last was one of Effie's staple
prophecies, and was sure to be verified in the
varied
web of every individual's experience. You
have had some trouble lately, but it will soon pass
away, and for ever. A safe prediction in regard
to any girl of twelve years. You'll have plenty
of friends, and lots of suitersthe right one will
be
Oh, never minddon't say who, Effie, cried
Isabella, gaspingly.
B 2
I was only going to say the right one will be
tall and elegant, with beautiful large eyesI can't
say whether blue or blackbut black, I think; for
his hair is both dark and curling.
Bravo, bravissimo,
brother
Jasper! exclaimed
Herbert; it is your curly pate Effie sees in those
black cards, beyond a doubt.
I bow to destiny, replied Jasper, with an arch
smile, that caught Isabella's eye.
I do not, she retortedlook again, Effieit
must not be curling hairI despise it.
I see but once, miss, and then clearly; but
there's curling hair on more heads than one.
I nevernever should like any one with curling
hair, persisted Isabella.
It would be no difficult task for
you
to pull it
straight, Miss Isabella, said the provoking Jasper.
Isabella only replied by her heightened colour;
and bending over the table, she begged Effie to
proceed.
There's not much more shown me, missyou
will have some tangled waysbesetments,
wonderments
,
and disappointments.
Effie's version of the `course of true love never
does run smooth,'  interposed Jasper.
But all will end well, she concluded; your
husband will be the man of your hearthe will be
beautiful, and rich, and great; and take you home
to spend your days in merry England.
Thank youthank you, Effie, said Isabella,
languidly. The beauty, riches, and days spent in
England were well enough, for beauty and riches
are elements in a maiden's
beau-ideal;
and
England
was then the earthly paradise of the patrician
colonists. But she was not just now in a humour
to acquiesce in the local habitation and the name
which the dark curling hair had given to the
ideal personage. Jasper Meredith had not even a
shadow of faith in Effie; but next to being
fortune's
favourite, he liked to appear so; and
contriving
,
unperceived by his companions, to slip his
remaining sleeve-button into Effie's hand, he said,
Keep them both; and added aloud, Now for
my luck, Dame Effie, and be it weal or be it wo,
deliver it truly.
Effie was propitiated, and would gladly have
imparted the golden tinge of Jasper's bribe to his
future destiny; but the opportunity was too
tempting
to be resisted, to prove to him that she was
mastered by a higher power: and looking very
solemn, and shaking her head, she said, There
are too many dark spots here. Ah, Mr. Jasper
Meredithdisappointment! disappointment!the
arrow just misses the markthe cup is filled to
the brimthe hand is raisedthe lips parted to
receive itthen comes the slip! She hesitated,
she seemed alarmed; perhaps she was so, for it is
impossible to say how far a weak mind may
become
the dupe of its own imposturesDo not
ask me any farther, she added. The young
3*
people now all gathered round her. Bessie
rested
her elbows on the table, and her burning cheeks
on her hands, and riveted her eyes on Effie, which,
from their natural blue, were deepened almost to
black, and absolutely glowing with the intensity of
her interest.
Go on, Effie, cried Jasper; if fortune is
cross, I'll give her wheel a turn.
Ah, the wheel turns but too fasta happy
youth is uppermost.
So far, so good.
An early marriage.
That may be weal, or may be wo, said
Jasper; weal it is, he added, in mock heroic;
but for the dread of something
after
.
An early death!
For me, Effie? Heaven forefend!
No, not for you; for here you are again a
leader on a battle-fieldthe dead and dying in
heapspools of bloodthere's the end on't, she
concluded, shuddering, and throwing down the
cards.
What, leave me there, Effie! Oh, nodeath
or victory!
It may be death, it may be victory; it is not
given to me to see which.
Jasper, quite undaunted, was on the point of
protesting
against a destiny so uncertain, when a
deep-drawn
sigh from Bessie attracted the eyes of the
group, and they perceived the colour was gone
from her cheeks, and that she was on the point of
fainting. The windows were thrown openEffie
produced a cordial, and she was soon restored to
a sense of her condition, which she attempted to
explain, by saying she was apt to faint even at the
thought of blood!
They were now all ready, and quite willing to
bid adieu to the oracle, whose responses not
having
been entirely satisfactory to any one of them,
they all acquiesced in Bessie's remark, that if it
were ever so right, she did not think there was
much comfort in going to a fortune-teller.
Each seemed in a more thoughtful humour than
usual, and they walked on in silence till they
reached the space, now the park, then a favourite
play-ground for children, shaded by a few locusts,
and here and there an elm or stinted oak.
Leaning
against one of these was the fine erect figure
of a man, who seemed just declining from the
meridian of life, past its first ripeness and
perfection
,
but still far from the decay of age. Ah, you
runaways! he exclaimed, on seeing the young
people advancing. Belle, your mother has been
in the fidgets about you for the last hour.
Jupiter might have told her, papa, that we were
quite safe.
Jupe truly! he came home with a rigmarole
that we could make nothing of. I assured her there
was no danger, but that assurance never quieted
any woman. Herbert, can you tell me what these
boys are about? they seem rather to be at work
than play.
What are you about, Ned? cried Herbert to a
young acquaintance.
Throwing up a redoubt to protect our fort,
and he pointed as he spoke to a rude structure of
poles, bricks, and broken planks on an eminence,
at the extremity of the unfenced ground.
And what is your fort for, my lad? asked Mr.
Linwood.
To keep off the British, sir.
The British! and who are you?
Americans, sir!
A loud huzzaing was heard from the fort
What does that mean? asked Mr. Linwood.
The whigs are hanging a tory, sir.
The little rebel rascals!Herbert!you
throwing
up your hat and huzzaing too!
Certainly, sirI am a regular whig.
A regular fool!put on your hatand use it
like a gentleman. This matter shall be looked into
here are the seeds of rebellion springing up in
their young hot bloodsthis may come to
something
,
if it is not seen to in time. Jasper, do you
hear any thing of this jargon in your schools?
Lord bless me! yes, sir; the boys are regularly
divided into whigs and toriesthey have their
badges and their pass-words, and I am sorry to say
that the whigs are three to one.
You are loyal then, my dear boy?
Certainly, sir, I owe allegiance to the country
in which I was born.
And you, my hopeful Mr. Herbert, with your
huzzas, what say you for yourself?
I say ditto to Jasper, sirI owe allegiance to
the country in which I was born.
Don't be a fool, Herbertdon't be a fool, even
in jestI hate a whig as I do a toad, and if my
son should prove a traitor to his king and country,
by George, I would cut him off for ever!
But, sir, said the imperturbable Herbert, if
he should choose between his king and country
There is no such thingthey are the same
so no more of that.
I am glad Herbert has his warning in time,
whispered Isabella to Bessie.
But it seems to me he is right for all, replied
Bessie.
So arbitrarily do circumstances mould opinions.
Isabella seemed like one who might have been born
a rebel chieftainess, Bessie as if her destiny were
passive obedience.
We
have thus introduced some of the dramatis
persone of the following volumes to our readers.
It may seem that in their visit to Effie, they
prematurely
exhibited the sentiments of riper years
but what are boys and girls but the prototypes of
B 3
men and womentime and art may tinge and
polish the wood, but the texture remains as nature
formed it.
Bessie Lee was an exotic in New-York. The
history of her being there was simply this.
New-England
has, from the first been a favourite school
for the youth from the middle and southern states.
Mr. Linwood sent Herbert (who had given him
some trouble by early manifesting that love of
self-direction
which might have been the germe of his
whiggism) to a Latin school in a country town
near Boston. While there, he boarded in the family
of a Colonel Leea most respectable farmer, who
had acquired his title and some military fame in
the campaign of forty-five against the French.
Herbert remained a year with the Lees, and he
returned
the kindness he received there with a hearty
and lasting affection. Here was his first
experience
of country life, and every one knows how
delightful
to childhood are its freedom, exercises, and
pleasures, in harmony (felt, long before understood)
with all the laws of our nature. When Herbert
returned he was eloquent in his praises of Bessie
her beauty, gayety (
then
the excitability of her
disposition sometimes appeared in extravagant
spirits), her sweetness and manageableness; a
feminine
quality that he admired the more from having
had to contend with a contrary disposition in his
sister
Isabella, who, in all their childish competitions,
had manifested what our Shaker friends would call
a
leading gift
. Isabella's curiosity being excited
to see this
rara avis
of Herbert (with her the
immediate consequence of an inclination was to
find the means of its gratification), she asked her
parents to send for Bessie to come to New-York,
and go to school with her. Mrs. Linwood, a model
of conjugal nonentity, gave her usual reply, just
as your papa says, dear. Her father seldom said
her nay, and Isabella thought her point gained, till
he referred the decision of the matter to her aunt
Archer.
Oh dear! now I shall have to argue the matter
an hour; but never mind, I can always persuade
aunt at last. Mrs. Archer, as Isabella had
foreboded
,
was opposed to the arrangementshe
thought there would be positive unkindness in
transplanting a little girl from her own plain, frugal
family, to a luxurious establishment in town, where
all the refinements and elegances then known in
the colony were in daily use. It is the work of
a lifetime, my dear Belle, she said, to acquire
habits of exertion and self-dependancesuch habits
are essential to this little country-girlshe does
not know their worth, but she would be miserable
without themhow will she return to her home,
where they have a single servant of all-work, after
being accustomed to the twelve slaves in your
house?
Twelve plagues, aunt! I am sure I should be
happier with one, if that one were our own dear
good Rose.
I believe you would, Belle, happier and better
too; for the energy which sometimes finds wrong
channels now, would then be well employed.
Do you see no other objection, aunt, to Bessie's
coming? asked Isabella, somewhat impatient at
the episode, though she was the subject of it.
I see none, my dear, but what relates to Bessie
herself. If her happiness would on the whole be
diminished by her coming, you, my dear generous
Belle, would not wish it.
No, auntcertainly notbut then I am sure it
would not beshe will go to all the schools I go to
that I shall make papa promise meand she will
make a great many friends andandI want to
have her come so much. Now don't, please don't
tell papa you disapprove of itjust let me have
my own way this time.
Ah, Belle, when will that time come that you
do not have your own way?
Isabella perceived her aunt would no longer
oppose
her wishes. The invitation was sent to Bessie,
and accepted by her parents; and the child's singular
beauty and loveliness secured her friends, one of
the goods Isabella had predicted. She did not
suffer
precisely the evil consequences Mrs. Archer
rationally anticipated from her residence in
New-York
,
yet that, conspiring with events, gave the hue
(bright or sad?) to her after life. Physically and
morally, she was one of those delicate structures
that require a hardening processshe resembled
the exquisite instrument that responds music to the
gentle touches of the elements, but is broken by
the first rude gust that sweeps over it. But we
are anticipating.
There is a history in all men's lives,
Figuring the nature of the times deceased;
The which observed, a man may prophesy,
With a near aim, of the main chance of things,
As yet not come to life.
4
CHAPTER II.
This life, sae far's I understand,
Is a' enchanted fairy-land,
Where pleasure is the magic wand,
That, wielded right,
Makes hours like minutes, hand in hand,
Dance by fu' light.
Burns
.
As soon as Mr. Linwood became aware of his
son's whig tendencies, he determined, as far as
possible, to counteract them; and instead of sending
him, as he had purposed, to Harvard University,
into a district which he considered infected with the
worst of plagues, he determined to retain him under
his own vigilant eye, at the loyal literary institution
in his own city. This was a bitter disappointment
to Herbert.
It is deused hard, he said to Jasper Meredith,
who was just setting out for Cambridge to finish
his collegiate career there, that you, who have
such a contempt for the Yankees, should go to live
among them; when I, who love and honour them
from the bottom of my heart, must stay here, play
the good boy, and quietly submit to this most
unreasonable
paternal fiat.
No more of my contempt for the Yankees, Hal,
an' thou lovest me, replied Jasper; you
remember
sop's advice to Crsus at the Persian court?
No, I am sure I do not. You have the most
provoking way of resting the lever by which you
bring out your own knowledge on your friend's
ignorance.
Pardon me, Herbert; I was only going to
remind
you of the Phrygian sage's counsel to Crsus,
to speak flattery at court, or hold his tongue. I
assure you, that as long as I live among these
soidisant
sovereigns, I shall conceal my spleen, if I
do not get rid of it.
Oh, you'll get rid of it. They need only to be
seen at their homes to be admired and loved.
Loved!
Yes,
loved;
to tell you the truth, Jasper,
Herbert's honest face reddened as he spoke, it
was something of this matter of loving that I have
been trying for the last week to make up my mind
to speak to you. You may think me fool, dunce,
or what you please; but, mark me, I am serious
you remember Bessie Lee?
Perfectly! I understand youexcellent!
Hear me out, and then laugh as much as you
like. Eliot, Bessie's brother, will be your
classmate
you
will naturally be friendsfor he is a
first-rateand you will naturally
Fall in love with his pretty sister?
If not forewarned, you certainly would; for
there is nothing like her this side heaven. But
remember, Jasper, as you are my friend, remember,
I look upon her as mine. `I spoke first,' as the
children say; I have loved Bessie ever since I lived
at Westbrook.
Upon my soul, Herbert, you have woven a
pretty bit of romance. This is the very youngest
dream of love I ever heard of. Pray, how old were
you when you went to live at farmer Lee's?
ElevenBessie was sixI stayed there two
years; and last year, as you know, Bessie spent
with us.
And she is now fairly entered upon her teens;
you have nothing to fear from me, Herbert, depend
on't. I never was particularly fond of
children
there is not the slightest probability of my falling
into an intimacy with your yeoman friend, or ever,
in any stage of my existence, getting up a serious
passion for a peasant girl. I have no affinities for
birds of the
basse cour
. My flight is more aspiring
`birds of a feather flock together,' my dear fellow,
and the lady of my love must be such a one as my
lady aunts in England and my eagle-eyed mother
will not look down upon. So a truce to your fears,
dear Herbert. Give me the letter you promised
to your farmer, scholar, friend; and rest assured, he
never shall find out that I do not think him equal
in blood and breeding to the King of England, as
all these Yankees fancy themselves to be.
Herbert gave the letter, but not with the best
grace. He did not like Jasper's tone towards his
New-England friends. He half wished he had
not written the letter, and quite, that he had been
more frugal of his praise of Jasper. With the
letter
,
he gave to Jasper various love-tokens from
Isabella and himself for Bessie. The young men
were saying their last parting words, when Herbert
suddenly exclaimed, Oh, I forgot! Isabella sent
you a keepsake, and he gave Jasper a silk purse,
with a dove and olive-branch prettily wrought
on it.
Oh, you savage! exclaimed Jasper, had you
forgotten this! He pressed it to his lips. Dear,
dear Belle! I kiss your olive-branchwe have
had many a falling-out, but thus will they always
end. Then slipping a ring from his finger, on
which was engraven a heart, transfixed by an
arrowBeg Isabella, he said, to wear this
for my sake. It is a pretty bauble, but she'll not
value it for that, nor because it has been worn by
all our Capulets since the days of good Queen Bess,
as my aunt, Lady Mary, assured me; but perhaps
she will care for it forpshaw. He dashed off
an honest teara servant announced that his uncle
was awaiting him, and cordially embracing
Herbert
,
they parted.
As Herbert had expected, Eliot Lee and
Meredith
were classmates, but not, as he predicted, or
at least not immediately, did they become friends.
Their circumstances, and those habits which grow
out of circumstances, were discordant. Meredith
4*
had been bred in a luxurious establishment, and
was taught to regard its artificial and elaborate
arrangement as essential to the production of a
gentleman. He was a citizen of no mean city,
though we now look back upon New-York at that
period, with its some eighteen or twenty thousand
inhabitants, as little more than a village. There
was then, resulting from the condition of America
far more disparity between the facilities and
refinements
of town and country than there now
is; and even now there are young citizens (and
some citizens in certain illusions remain young all
their lives) who look with the most self-complacent
disdain on country breeding. Prior to our
revolution
,
the distinctions of rank in the colonies were
in accordance with the institutions of the old world.
The coaches of the gentry were emblazoned with
their family arms, and their plate with the family
crest. If peers and baronets were
rar aves,
there
were among the youths of Harvard nephews of
my lord, and sons of Sir George and Sir Harry.
These were, naturally, Meredith's first associates.
He was himself of the privileged order and,
connected
with many a noble family in the mother
country, he felt his aristocratic blood tingle in
every vein. A large property, which had devolved
to him on the death of his father, was chiefly vested
in real estate in America, and his guardians, with
the consent of his mother, who herself remained
in England, had judiciously decided to educate
him where it would be most advantageous for him
finally to fix his residence.
The external circumstancesthe appliances and
means of the two young men, were certainly widely
different. Eliot Lee's parentage would not be
deemed illustrious, according to any artificial code;
but graduated by nature's aristocracy (nature alone
sets a seal to her patents of universal authority),
he should rank with the noble of every land. And
he might claim what is now considered as the
peculiar, the purest, the enduring, and in truth the
only
aristocracy of our own. He was a lineal
descendant from one of the renowned
pilgrim
fathers,
whose nobility, stamped in the principles
that are regenerating mankind, will be transmitted
by their sons on the Missouri and the Oregon,
when the stars and garters of Europe have perished
and are forgotten.
Colonel Lee, Eliot's father, was a laborious
New-England farmer, of sterling sense and
integrity
in
the phrase of his people, an
independent
,
fore-handed man; a phrase that implies
a property of four or five thousand dollars over and
above a good farm, unencumbered with debts, and
producing rather more than its proprietor, in his
frugal mode of life, has occasion to spend. Eliot's
mother was a woman of sound mind, and of that
quick and delicate perception of the beautiful in
nature and action, that is the attribute of sensibility
and the proof of its existence, though the possessor,
like Eliot's mother, may, from diffidence or
personal
awkwardness, never be able to imbody it in
graceful expression. She had a keen relish of
English literature, and rich acquisitions in it; such
as many of our ladies, who have been taught by a
dozen masters, and instructed in half as many
tongues, might well envy. With all this, she was
an actual operator in the arduous labours that fall
to the female department of a farming
establishment
plain
farmer Lee's plain wife. This is not
an uncommon combination of character and
condition
in New-England. We paint from life, if not
to the life: our fault is not extravagance of
colouring
.
It is unnecessary to enter into the details of Eliot
Lee's education. Circumstances combined to
produce
the happiest resultsto develop his physical,
intellectual, and moral powers; in short, to make
him a favourable specimen of the highest order of
New-England character. He had just entered on
his academic studies, when his father (as our
friend Effie intimated in her dark soothsaying) was
lost while crossing Massachusetts Bay during a
violent
thunder-storm. Fortunately, the good colonel's
forecast had so well provided for his heirs, that his
widow was able to maintain the respectable
position
of his family without recalling her son from
college. There, as many of our distinguished men
have done, he made his acquisitions available for
his support by teaching.
Meredith and Eliot Lee were soon acknowledged
to be the gifted young men of their class. Though
nearly equals in capacity, Eliot, being by far the
most patient and assiduous, bore off the college
honours. Meredith did not lack industry
certainly
not ambition; but he had not the hardihood
and self-discipline that it requires to forego an
attractive
pursuit for a dry study: and while Eliot,
denying his natural tastes, toiled by the midnight
lamp over the roughest academic course, he
gracefully
ran through the light and beaten path of
belles-lettres
.
They were both socialMeredith rather gay in
his disposition. Both had admirable tempers;
Meredith's was partly the result of early training
in the goodly seemings of the world, Eliot's the
gift of Heaven, and therefore the more perfect.
Eliot could not exist without self-respect. The
applause of society was essential to Meredith.
He certainly preferred a real to a merely apparent
elevation; but experience could alone decide whether
he were willing to pay its pricesustained effort,
and generous sacrifice. Both were endowed with
personal graces. Neither man nor woman, that
ever we could learn, is indifferent to these.
Before the young men had proceeded far in their
collegiate career they were friends, if that holy
relation may be predicated of those who are united
by accidental circumstances. That they were on
a confidential footing will be seen by the following
conversation. Meredith was in his room, when, on
hearing a tap at his door, he answered it by saying,
Come in, Eliot, my dear fellow. My good, or
your evil genius, has brought you to me at the
very moment when I am steeped to the lips in
trouble.
You in trouble! whywhat is the matter?
Diable! matter enough for song or sermon.
`Not a trouble abroad but it lights o' my shoulders'
First, here is a note from our reverend
Prses
.
`Mr. Jasper Meredith, junior classyou are fined,
by the proper authority, one pound ten, for going
into Boston last Thursday night, to an assembly
or ball, contrary to college lawsas this is the first
offence of the kind reported against you, we have,
though you have been guilty of a gross violation
of known duty, been lenient in fixing the amount
of your fine.'Lenient, good Prses!Take
instead
one pound ten ounces of my flesh. My
purse is far leaner than my person, though that
be rather of the Cassius order.Now, Eliot, is not
this a pretty bill for one night's sorry amusement
one pound ten, besides the price of two ball tickets,
and sundry confections.
How, two ball tickets, Meredith?
Why, I gave one to the tailor's pretty sister,
Sally Dunn.
Sally Dunn!Bravo, Meredith. Plebeian as
you think my notions, I should hardly have escorted
Sally Dunn to a ball.
My service to you, Eliot!do not fancy I
have been enacting a scene fit for Hogarth's idle
apprentice. Were I so absurd, do you fancy these
Boston patricians would admit a tailor's sister
within
their
taboed
circle?Nono, little Sally went
with company of her own cloth, and trimmings to
match (in her brother's slang)rosy milliners and
journeyman tailors, to a ball got up by her
compeers
.
I sent in to them lots of raisins and
almonds
,
which served as a love-token for Sally and
munching
for her companions.
You have, indeed, paid dear for your whistle,
Meredith.
Dear! you have not heard half yet. Sir
knight of the shears assailed me with a whining
complaint of my `paying attention,' as he called it,
to his sister Sally, and I could only get off by the
gravest assurances of my profound respect for the
whole Dunn concern, followed up by an order for
a new vest, that being the article the youth would
least mar in the making, and here is his billtwo
pounds two. This is to be added to my ball
expenses
,
fine, &c., and all, as our learned professor
would say, traced to the primum mobile, must be
charged to pretty Sally Dunn. Oh woman!
woman
!ever
the cause of man's folly, perplexity,
misery, and destruction!
You are getting pathetic, Meredith.
My dear friend, there is nothing affects a man's
sensibilities like an empty purseunless it be an
empty stomach. You have not heard half my
sorrows yet. Here is a bill, a yard long, from the
livery-stable, and here another from Monsieur Pat
et Confiture!
And your term-bills?
Oh! my term-bills I have forwarded, with the
dignity of a Sir Charles Grandison, to my uncle.
Now, Eliot, he continued, disbursing a few half
crowns and shillings on the table, and holding up
his empty purse, and throwing into his face an
expression
of mock misery, Now, Eliot, let us
resolve
ourselves into a committee of ways and
means, and tell me by what financial legerdemain I
can get affixed to these scrawls that happiest
combination
of words in the English languagethat
honeyed phrase, `
received payment in full
'`oh,
gentle shepherd, tell me where?'
Where deficits should always find supplies,
Meredith, in a friend's purse. I have just settled
the account of my pedagogue labours for the last
term, and as I have no extra bills to pay, I have
extra means quite at your service.
Meredith protested, and with truth, that nothing
was farther from his intentions than drawing on his
friend; and when Eliot persisted and counted out
the amount which Meredith said would relieve
his little embarrassments, he felt, and
magnanimously
expressed his admiration of those `
working-day
world virtues' (so he called them), industry
and frugality, which secured to Eliot the tranquillity
of independence, and the power of liberality. It
is possible that, at another time, and in another
humour, he might have led the laugh against the
sort of barter tradethe selling one kind or degree
of knowledge to procure another, by which a
Yankee youth, who is willing to live like an
anchorite
or a philosopher in the midst of untasted
pleasures
,
works his passage through college.
Subsequent instances occurred of similar but
temporary obligations on the part of Meredith.
Temporary of course, for Meredith was too
thoroughly
imbued with the sentiments of a gentleman
to extend a pecuniary obligation beyond the term
of his necessity.
VOI. I.C 5
CHAPTER III.
Hear me profess sincerelyhad I a dozen sons, each in my
love alike, I had rather had eleven die nobly for their country,
than one voluptuously surfeit out of action.
Shakspeare
.
The
following extracts are from a letter from
Bessie Lee to her friend Isabella Linwood.
Letter
Dearest Isabella,
You must love me, or you could not endure my
stupid lettersyou that can write so delightfully
about nothing, and have so much to write about,
while I can tell nothing but what I see, and I see
so little! The outward world does not much
interest
me. It is what I
feel
that I think of and
ponder over; but I know how you detest what you
call sentimental letters, so I try to avoid all such
subjects. Compared with you I am a childtwo
years at our age makes a great differenceI am
really very childish for a girl almost fourteen, and
yet, and yet, Isabella, I sometimes seem to myself
to have gone so far beyond childhood, that I have
almost forgotten that careless, light-hearted feeling
I used to have. I do not think I ever was so
light-hearted
as some children, and yet I was not
seriousat least, not in the right way. Many a
time, before I was ten years old, I have sat up in
my own little room till twelve o'clock Saturday
night, reading, and then slept for an hour and a
half through the whole sermon the next morning.
I do believe it is the natural depravity of my
heart. I never read over twice a piece of heathen
poetry that moves me but I can repeat itand
yet, I never could get past `what is effectual
calling
?'
in the Westminster Catechism; and I always
was in disgrace on Saturday, when parson Wilson
came to the school to hear us recite it:oh dear,
the sight of his wig and three-cornered hat
petrified
me!
Jasper Meredith is here, passing the vacation
with Eliot. I was frightened to death when Eliot
wrote us he was comingwe live in such a
homely wayonly one servant, and I remember
well how he used to laugh at every thing he called
la bourgeoise
. I felt this to be a foolish,
vulgar
pride, and did my best to suppress it; and since I
have found there was no occasion for it, for Jasper
seemed (I do not mean
seemed,
I think he is much
more sincere than he used to be) to miss nothing,
and to be delighted with being here. I do not
think he realizes that I am now three years older
than I was in New-York, for he treats me with
that sort of partialitydevotion you might almost
call itthat he used to there, especially when you
C 2
and he had had a falling out. He has been giving
me some lessons in Italian. He says I have a
wonderful talent for learning languages, but it is
not so: you know what hobbling work I made
with the French when you and I went to poor old
Mademoiselle AmandJasper is quite a different
teacher, and I never fancied French. He has been
teaching me to ride, toowe have a nice little
pony, and he has a beautiful horseso that we
have the most delightful gallops over the country
every day. It is very odd, though I am such a
desperate coward, I never feel the least timid when
I am riding with Jasperindeed, I do not think of
it. Eliot rarely finds time to go with uswhen
he is at home from college he has so much to do
for motherdear Eliot, he is husband, father,
brother, every thing to us.
I had not time, while Jasper and Eliot stayed,
to finish my letter, and since they went away I
have been so dull!The house seems like a tomb.
I go from room to room, but the spirit is not here.
Master Hale, the schoolmaster, boards with us,
and gives me lessons in some branches that Eliot
thinks me deficient in; but ah me! where are the
talents for acquisition that Jasper commended?
Did you ever know, dear Isabella, what it was to
have every thing affected by the departure of
friends, as nature is by the absence of lightall
fade into one dull uniform hue. When Eliot and
Jasper were here, all was bright and interesting
from the rising of the sun to the going down
thereof
now!ah
me!
I am shocked to find how much I have written
about myself. My best respects to your father
and mother, and love to Herbert. Burn this
worthless
scrawl without fail, dear Isabella, and believe
me ever most affectionately
Yours,
Bessie Lee
.
Jasper Meredith to Herbert Linwood.
Dear Linwood,
I have been enjoying a very pretty little
episode
in my college life, passing the vacation at
Westbrook, with your old friends the Lees. A
month in a dull little country town would once
have seemed to me penance enough for my worst
sin, but now it is heaven to get anywhere beyond
the sound of college bellsbeyond the reach of
automaton tutorsperiodical recitationschapel
prayers, and college rules.
I went to the Lees with the pious intention of
quizzing your rustics to the top o' my bent; but
Herbert, my dear fellow, I'll tell you a secret; when
people respect themselves, and value things
according
to their real intrinsic worth, it gives a shock to
our artificial and worldly estimates, and makes us
feel as if we stood upon a wonderful uncertain
5*
foundation. These Lees are so strong in their
simplicity
they
would so disdain aping and imitating
those that we (not they, be sure!) think above them
they are so sincere in all their waysno
awkward
consciousnessno shame-facedness
whatever
about the homely details of their family
affairs. By heavens, Herbert, I could not find a
follya meannessor even a ludicrous rusticity
at which to aim my ridicule.
I begin to thinkno, no, no, I do notbut, if
there were many such families as these Lees in
the world, an equality, independent of all
extraneous
circumstances (such as the politicians of this
country are now ranting about), might subsist on
the foundation of intellect and virtue.
After all, I see it is a mere illusion. Mrs. Lee's
rank, though in Westbrook she appears equal to
any Roman matron, is purely local. Hallowed as
she is in your boyish memory, Herbert, you must
confess she would cut a sorry figure in a
New-York
drawing-room.
Eliot might pass current anywhere; but then
he has had the advantage of Boston society, and
an intimacy withpardon my coxcombryyour
humble servant. Bessiesweet Bessie Lee, is a
gem fit to be set in a coronet. Don't be alarmed,
Herbert, you are welcome to have the setting of
her. There is metal,
as you know,
more attractive
to me. Bessie is not much grown since she was
in New-Yorkshe is still low in stature, and so
childish in her person, that I was sometimes in
danger of treating her like a childof forgetting
that she had come within the charmed circle of
proprieties. But, if she has still the freshness and
immaturity of the unfolding rose-budthe
mystical
charm of womanthe divinity stirring within
her beams through her exquisite features. Such
features! Phidias would have copied them in his
immortal marble. How in the world should such
a creature, all sentiment, refinement, imagination,
spring up in practical, prosaic New-England!
She is a wanderer from some other star. I am
writing like a lover, and not as I should to a lover.
But, on my honour, Herbert, I am no loverof
little Bessie I mean. I should as soon think of
being
enamoured of a rose, a lily, or a violet, an
exquisite
sonnet, or an abstraction.
It is an eternity since Isabella has written me
a postscriptwhy is this? Farewell, Linwood.
Yours, &c.
P.S.One word on politicsa subject I
detest
,
and meddle with as little as possible. There
must be an outbreakthere is no avoiding it. But
there can be no doubt which party will finally
prevail
.
The mother country has soldiers, money,
every thing; `'tis odds beyond arithmetic.' As one
of my friends said at a dinner in Boston the other
day, `the growling curs may bark for a while, but
they will be whipped into submission, and wear
their collars patiently for ever after.' I trust,
Herbert
,
you are already cured of what my uncle used
to call the `boy-fever'but if not, take my
advice
be
quiet, prudent,
neutral
. As long as we
are called boys, we are not expected to be patriots,
apostles, or martyrs. At this crisis your filial and
fraternal
duties require that you should suppress, if
not renounce, the opinions you used to be so fond
of blurting out on all occasions. I am no preacher
I have donea
word
to the wise.
M.
We resume the extracts from Bessie's letters.
Letter
Dear Isabella,
Never say another word to
me of what you hinted in your last letter: indeed,
I am too young; and besides, I never should feel
easy or happy again with Jasper, if I admitted
such a thought. I have had but one opinion since
our visit to Effie; not that I believed in herat
least, not much; but I have always known who
was first in his thoughtsheartopinion; and
besides
,
it would be folly in me, knowing his opinions
about rank, &c. Mother thinks him very proud,
and somewhat vain; and she begins not to be
pleased with his frequent visits to Westbrook. She
thinksno, fears, or rather she imagines, that
Jasper
and Ino, that Jasper
or
Ino, that I
it is quite too foolish to write, Isabellamother
does not realize what a wide world there is between
us. I might possibly, sometimes, think he loved
(this last word was carefully effaced, and cared
substituted) cared for me, if he did not know you.
How could Jasper tell you of Eliot's
prejudice
against you? Jasper himself infused it,
unwittingly
,
I am sure, by telling him that when
with you, I lived but to do `your best pleasure,
were it to fly, to swim, or dive into the fire.'
Eliot fancies that you are proud and overbearing
I insist, dear Isabella, that such as you are born
to rule such weak spirits as mine; but Eliot says
he does not like absolutism in any form, and
especially
in woman's. Ah, how differently he would
feel if he were to see youI am sure you would
like himI am not sure, even, that you would not
have preferred him to Jasper, had he been born
and bred in Jasper's circumstances. He has more
of some qualities that you particularly like,
frankness
and independenceand mother says (but
then mother is not at all partial to Jasper) he has
a thousand times more real sensibilityhe does,
perhaps, feel more for others. I should like to
know which you would think the handsomest.
Eliot is at least three inches the tallest; and, as
Jasper once said, `cast in the heroic mould, with
just enough, and not an ounce too much of
mortality'
but
then Jasper has such grace and
symmetry
just
what I fancy to be the beau-ideal of
the arts. Jasper's eyes are almost too blacktoo
piercing; and yet they are softened by his long
lashes, and his olive complexion, so expressive
C 3
like that fine old portrait in your drawing-room.
His mouth, too, is beautifulit has such a defined,
chiselled lookbut then do you not think that his
teeth being so delicately formed, and so very, very
white, is rather a defect? I don't know how to
describe
it, but there is rather an uncertain expression
about his mouth. Eliot's, particularly when he
smiles, is truth and kindness itselfand his deep,
deep blue eye, expresses every thing by turnsI
mean every thing that should come from a pure and
lofty spiritnow tender and pitiful enough for me,
and now superb and fiery enough for youbut what
a silly, girlish letter I am writing`Out of the
abundance of the heart,' you know! I see nobody
but Jasper and Eliot, and I think only of them.
We continue the extracts from Bessie's letters.
They were strictly feminine, even to their being
datelesswe cannot, therefore, ascertain the precise
period at which they were written, except by their
occasional allusions to contemporaneous events.
Thanks, dear Isabella, for your delightful letter
by Jasperno longer Jasper, I assure you to his
face, but Mr. Meredithoh, I often wish the time
back when I was a child, and might call him
Jasper
,
and feel the freedom of a child. I wonder if
I should dare to call you Belle now, or even
Isabella
?
Jasper, since his last visit at home, tells me
so much of your being `the mirror of fashion
the observed of all observers' (these are his own
wordsdrawing-room terms that were never heard
in Westbrook but from his lips), that I feel a sort of
fearful shrinking. It is not envyI am too happy
now to envy anybody in the wide world. Eliot is
at home, and Jasper is passing a week here. Is it
not strange they should be so intimate, when they
differ so widely on political topics? I suppose it
is because Jasper does not care much about the
matter; but this indifference sometimes provokes
Eliot. Jasper is very intimate with Pitcairn and
Lord Percy; and Eliot thinks they have more
influence
with him than the honour and interest of
his country. Oh, they talk it over for hours and
hours, and end, as men always do with their
arguments
,
just where they began. Jasper insists that
as long as the quarrel can be made up it is much
wisest to stand aloof, and not, `like mad boys, to
rush foremost into the first fray;' besides, he says
he is tied by a promise to his uncle that he will
have nothing to do with these agitating disputes
till his education is finished. Mother says (she
does not always judge Jasper kindly) that it is very
easy and
prudent
to bind your hands with a promise
when you do not choose to lift them.
Ah, there is a terrible storm gathering! Those
who have grown up together, lovingly interlacing
their tender branches, must be torn asundersome
swept away by the current, others dispersed by the
winds.
Letter
Dear Isabella,
The world seems turned
upside down since I began this letterwar (
war,
what an appalling sound) has begunblood has
been spilt, and our dear, dear Eliotbut I must
tell you first how it all was. Eliot and Jasper were
out shooting some miles from Cambridge, when, on
coming to the road, they perceived an unusual
commotion
old
men and young, and even boys, all
armed, in wagons, on horseback, and on foot, were
coming from all points, and all hurrying onward in
one direction. On inquiring into the hurly-burly,
they were told that Colonel Smith had marched to
Concord to destroy the military stores there; and
that our people were gathering from all quarters to
oppose his return. Eliot immediately joined them,
Jasper did not; but, dear Isabella, I that know
you so well, know, whatever others may think, that
tories may be true and noble. There was a fight
at Lexington. Our brave men had the best of it.
Eliot was the first to bring us the news. With
a severe wound in his arm, he came ten miles that
we need not be alarmed by any reports, knowing,
as he told mother, that she was no Spartan mother,
to be indifferent whether her son came home with
his shield or on his shield.
Jasper has not been to Westbrook since the
battle. My mind has been in such a state of alarm
since, I cannot return to my ordinary pursuits. I
was reading history with the children, and the
English
poets with mother, but I am quite broken up.
I do not think this horrid war should
separate
those who have been friends; thank God, my
dear Isabella, we of womankind are exemptsnot
called upon to take sidesour mission is to heal
wounds, not to make them; to keep alive and tend
with vestal fidelity the fires of charity and love.
My kindest remembrance to Herbert. I hope he
has renounced his whiggism; for if it must come
to that, he had better fight on the wrong side (
ignorantly
)
than break the third commandment.
Write soon, dear Isabella, and let me know if this
hurly-burly extends to New-Yorkdear, quiet
New-York! In war and in peace, in all the
chances and changes of this mortal life, your own
Bessie Lee
.
Miss Linwood to Bessie Lee
.
Exempts! my little spirit of peaceyour
vocation
it may be, my pretty dove, to sit on your
perch with an olive-branch in your bill, but not
mine. Oh for the glorious days of the Clorindas,
when a woman might put down her womanish
thoughts, and with helmet and lance in rest do
battle with the bravest! Why was the loyal spirit
of my race my exclusive patrimony? Can his
blood, who at his own cost raised a troop of horse
for our martyr king, flow in Herbert's veins? or
his who followed the fortunes of the unhappy
James? Is my father's son a renegadoa rebel?
Yes, Bessiemy blood burns in my cheeks while
6
I write it. Herbert, the only male scion of the
Linwoodsmy brotherour prideour hope has
declared himself of the rebel party`Ichabod,
Ichabod, the glory is departed, is written on our
door-posts.'
But to come down from my heroics; we are
in a desperate conditionsuch a scene as I have
just passed through! Judge Ellis was dining with
us, Jasper Meredith was spoken of. `In the
name of Heaven, Ellis,' said my father, `why do
you suffer your nephew to remain among the rebel
crew in that infected region?'
`I do not find,' replied the judge, glancing at
Herbert, `that any region is free from infection.'
`True, true,' said my father; `but the air of
the Yankee states is saturated with it. I would
not let an infant breathe it, lest rebellion should
break out when he came to man's estate.' I am
sorry to say it, dear Bessie; but my father traces
Herbert's delinquency to his sojourn at Westbrook.
I saw a tempest was brewing, and thinking to make
for a quiet harbour, I put in my oar, and repeated
the story you told me in your last letter of our
noncombatant
,
Mr. Jasper. The judge was charmed.
`Ah, he's a prudent fellow!' he said; `he'll not
commit himself!'
`Not commit himself!' exclaimed my father;
`by Jupiter, if he belonged to me, he should
commit
himself. I would rather he should jump the
wrong way than sit squat like a toad under a hedge,
till he was sure which side it was most
prudent
to
jump.' You see, Bessie, my father's words
implied
something like a commendation of Herbert.
I ventured to look uptheir eyes metI saw
a beam of pleasure flashing from them, and passing
like an electric spark from one heart to another.
Oh, why should this unholy quarrel tear asunder
such true hearts!
The judge's pride was touchedhe is a mean
wretch. `Ah, my dear sir,' he said, `it is very
well for you, who can do it with impunity, to
disregard
prudential considerations; for instance, you
remain true to the king, the royal power is
maintained
,
and your property is protected. Your son
I suppose a caseyour son joins the rebels,
the country is revolutionized, and your property is
secured as the reward of Mr. Herbert's patriotism.'
My father hardly heard him out. `Now, by
the Lord that made me!' he exclaimed, setting
down the decanter with a force that broke it in a
thousand pieces, `I would die of starvation before
I would taste a crumb of bread that was the reward
of rebellion.'
It was a frightful moment; but my father's
passion, you know, is like a whirlwind; one gust,
and it is over; and mamma is like those
short-stemmed
flowers that lie on the earth; no wind moves
her. So, though the judge was almost as much
disconcerted as the decanter, it seemed all to have
blown over, while mamma, as in case of any
ordinary
accident, was directing Jupe to remove the
fragments, change the cloth, etc. But alas! the
evil genius of our house triumphed; for even a
bottle of our oldest Madeira, which is usually to
my father like oil to the waves, failed to preserve
tranquillity. The glasses were filled, and my
father, according to his usual custom, gave `the
kingGod bless him.'
Now you must know, though he would not
confess he made any sacrifice to prudence, he has
for some weeks omitted to drink wine at all,
on some pretext or other, such as he had a
headache
,
or he had dined out the day before, or
expected
to the day after; and thus Herbert has
escaped the test. But now the toast was given,
and Herbert's glass remained untouched, while
he sat, not biting, but literally devouring his
nails. I saw the judge cast a sinister look at him,
and then a glance at my father. The storm was
gathering on my father's brow. `Herbert, my
son,' said mamma, `you will be too late for you
appointment.' Herbert moved his chair to rise,
when my father called out, `Stop, sirno
slinking
away under your mother's shieldhear me
no man who refuses to drink that toast at my table
shall eat of my bread or drink of my wine.'
`Then God forgive mefor I never will drink
itso help me Heaven!'
Herbert left the room by one doormy father
by anothermamma stayed calmly talking to
that fixture of a judge, and I ran to my room, where,
as soon as I had got through with a comfortable fit
of crying, I sat down to write you (who are on the
enemy's side) an account of the matter. What
will come of it, Heaven only knows!
But, my dear little gentle Bessie, I never think of
you as having any thing to do with these turbulent
matters; you are in the midst of fiery rebel spirits,
but you are too pure, too good to enter into their
counsels, and far too just for any self-originating
prejudices, such as this horrible one that pervades
the country, and fires New-England against the
legitimate rights of the mother country over her
wayward, ungrateful child. Don't trouble your
head about these squabbles, but cling to Master
Hale, your poetry, and history: by-the-way, I
laughed heartily that you, who have done
duty
reading
so virtuously all your life, should now
come to the conclusion `that history is dry.' I
met with a note in Herodotus, the most picturesque
of historians, the other day that charmed me. The
writer of the note says there is no mention
whatever
of Cyrus in the Persian history. If history
then is mere fiction, why may we not read romances
of our own choosing? My instincts have not
misguided
me, after all.
So, Miss Bessie, Jasper Meredith is in high
favour with you, and the friend of your nonpareil
brother. Jasper could always be irresistible when
he chose, and he seems to have been `i' the vein'
6*
at Westbrook. With all our impressions (are they
prejudices, Bessie?) against your Yankee land, we
thought him excessively improved by his residence
among you. Indeed, I think if he were never to
get another letter from his worldly icicle mother,
to live away from his time-serving uncle, and never
receive another importation of London
coxcombries
,
he would be what nature intended hima
paragon.
I love your sisterly enthusiasm. As to my
estimation of your brother being affected by the
accidents of birth and fortune, indeed, you were
not true to your friend when you intimated that.
Certainly, the views you tell me he takes of my
character are not particularly flattering, or even
conciliating. However, I have my revengeyou
paint him
en beau
the portrait is too beautiful
to be very like any man born and reared within
the disenchanted limits of New-England. I am
writing boldly, but no offence, dear Bessie; I do
not know your brother, and I haveyes, out with
it, with the exception of your precious little self
I have an
antipathy
to the New-Englandersa
disloyal race, and conceited, fancying themselves
more knowing in all matters, high and low,
especially
government and religion, than the rest of the
world`all-sufficient, self-sufficient, and
insufficient
.'
Pardon me, gentle BessieI am just now at
fever heat, and I could not like Gabriel if he were
whig and rebel. Ah, Herbert!but I loved him
before I ever heard these detestable words; and
once truly loving, especially if our hearts be knit
together by nature, I think the faults of the subject
do not diminish our affection, though they turn it
from its natural sweet uses to suffering.
Letter
Dear Bessie,
A weeka stormy, miserable
week has passed since I wrote the above, and it
has ended in Herbert's leaving us, and dishonouring
his father's name by taking a commission in the
rebel service. Papa has of course had a horrible
fit of the gout. He says he has for ever cast
Herbert out of his affections. Ah! I am not skilled
in metaphysics, but I
know
that we have no power
whatever over our affections. Mamma takes it all
patiently, and chiefly sorroweth for that Herbert
has lost caste by joining the insurgents, whom she
thinks little better than so many Jack Cades.
For myself, I would have poured out my blood
every drop of it, to have kept him true to his
king and country; but in my secret heart I glory
in him that he has honestly and boldly clung to his
opinions, to his own certain and infinite loss. I
have no heart to write more.
Yours truly,
Isabella Linwood
.
P.S.You may show the last paragraph (
confidentially
)
to Jasper; but don't let him know that
I wished him to see it.
I. L.
CHAPTER IV.
An' forward, though I canna
see,
I guess an'
fear
.
Burns
.
Three
years passed over without any marked
change in the external condition of our young friends.
Herbert Linwood endured the hardships of an
American officer during that most suffering period
of the war, and remained true to the cause he had
adopted, without any of those opportunities of
distinction
which are necessary to keep alive the fire
of ordinary patriotism.
It has been seen that Eliot Lee, with most of
the young men of the country (as might be
expected
from the insurgent and generous spirit of youth),
espoused the popular side. It ought not to have
been expected, that when the young country came
to the muscle and vigour of manhood, it should
continue to wear the leading-strings of its
childhood
,
or remain in the bondage and apprenticeship
of its youth. It has been justly said, that the seeds
of our revolution and future independence were
sown by the Pilgrims. The political institutions of
a people may be inferred from their religion.
Absolutism
,
as a mirror, reflects the Roman Catholic
faith. Whatever varieties of names were attached
to the religious sects of America, they were, with
the exception of a few Pepists, all Protestants
all, as Burke said of them, agreed (if agreeing
in nothing else) in the communion of the spirit of
libertytheirs was the Protestantism of the
Protestant
religionthe dissidence of dissent. It was
morally certain, that as soon as they came to man's
estate, their government would accord with this
spirit of liberty; would harmonize with the
independent
and republican spirit of the religion of
Christ, the only authority they admitted. The
fires of our republic were not then kindled by a
coal from the old altars of Greece and Rome, whose
freest government exalted the few, and retained
the many in grovelling ignorance and servitude:
ours came forth invincible in the declaration of
liberty to all, and equality of rights.
Such minds as Eliot Lee's, reasoning and
religious
,
were not so much moved by the sudden
impulses of enthusiasm as incited by the
convictions
of duty. His heart was devoted to his
country
,
his thoughts absorbed in her struggle; but he
quenched, or rather smothered his intense desire
to go forth with her champions, and remained
pursuing
his legal studies, near enough to his home
to perform his paramount but obscure duty to his
widowed mother and her young family.
Jasper Meredith's political preferences, if not
proclaimed, were easily guessed. It was obvious
that his tastes were aristocratic and feudalhis
sympathies with the monarch, not with the people.
New-York was the headquarters of the British
army, and Judge Ellis, his uncle, on the pretext
of keeping his nephew out of the way of the
seductions
of a very gay society, advised him to pursue
the study of the law in New-England, and thus for
a while he avoided pledging himself. He resided
in Boston or its vicinity, never far from Westbrook.
He had a certain
eclat
in the drawing-rooms of
Boston, but he was no favourite there. A
professed
neutrality was, if not suspicious, most
offensive
in the eyes of neck-or-nothing patriots.
But Meredith did not escape the whisper that his
neutrality was a mere mask. His accent, which
was ambitiously English, was criticised, and his
elaborate dress, manufactured by London
artists,
was particularly displeasing to the sons of the
Puritans, who, absorbed in great objects, were then
more impatient even than usual of extra sacrifices
to the graces.
The transition from Boston to Westbrook was
delightful
to Meredith. There was no censure of any
sort, but balm for the rankling wounds of vanity;
and it must be confessed that he not only appeared
better, but was better at Westbrook than elsewhere:
the best parts of his nature were called forth; he
was (if we may desecrate a technical expression)
in the exercise of grace. There is a certain moral
atmosphere, as propitious to moral wellbeing as a
genial temperature is to health. Vanity has a sort
of thermometer, which enables the possessor to
graduate and adapt himself to the dispositions, the
vanities (is there any gold in nature without this
alloy?) of others. Meredith, when he wished to be
so, was eminently agreeable. Those always stand
in a most fortunate light who vary the monotony
of a village existence, and he broke like a sunbeam
through the dull atmosphere that hung over
West-brook
.
He brought the freshest news, he studied
good Mrs. Lee's partialities and prejudices, and
(without her being aware of their existence)
accommodated
himself to them. He supplied to
Eliot what all social beings hanker after,
companionship
with one of his own age, pursuits, and
associations. The magnet that drew him to
West-brook
was never the acknowledged attraction.
Meredith was not in love with Bessie Lee. She
was too spiritual a creature for one of earth's mould;
but his self-love, his ruling passion, was flattered
by her. He saw and enjoyed (what, alas! no one
else then saw) his power over her. He saw it in
the mutations of her cheek, in the kindling of her
eye, in the changes of her voice. It was as if an
angel had left his sphere to incense him. Meredith
must be acquitted of a deliberate attempt to insnare
her affections. He thought not and cared not
for the future. He cared only for a present
selfish
gratification. A ride at twilight or a walk
by moonlight with this creature, all beauty,
refinement
,
and tenderness, was a poetic passage to him
to her it was fraught with life or death.
Poor Bessie! she should have been hardened
for the changing climate of this rough world; but
by a fatal, but very common error, she had been
cherished like a tropical bird, or an exotic plant.
She has such delicate health! she is so different
from my other children! said the mother.She
is so gentle and sensitive, said the brother. And
thus, with all their sound judgment, instead of
submitting
her to a hardening process, it seemed an
instinct with them, by every elaborate contrivance,
to fence her from the ordinary trials and evils of
life. Only when she was happy did they let her
alone; with Meredith she seemed happy, and
they were satisfied. Bessie shared this unfounded
tranquillity, arising with them partly from
confidence
in Meredith, and partly from the belief that
she was in no danger of suffering from an unrequited
love; but Bessie's arose from the most childlike
ignorance of that study puzzling to the wisest and
craftiestthe human heart. She was the most
modest and unexacting of human creaturesher
gentle spirit urged no rightsasked nothing,
expected
nothing beyond the present moment. The
worshipper was satisfied with the presence of the
idol. Her residence in New-York had impressed a
conviction that a disparity of birth and condition
was an impassable gulf. It was natural enough
that she should have imbibed this opinion; for,
being a child, the aristocratic opinions of the
society
she was in were expressed, unmitigated by
courtesy; they sunk deep in her susceptible mind,
a mind too humble to aspire above any barrier
that nature or society had set up.
There was another foundation of her fancied
security. This was shaken by the following
conversation
:Meredith
was looking over an old
pocketbook, when a card dropped from it on the
floor at Bessie's feet: she handed it to himhe
smiled as he looked at it, and held it up before her.
She glanced her eye over it, and saw it was a note
of the date of their visit to the soothsayer Effie,
and of Effie's prediction in relation to the dark
curling hair.
I had totally forgotten this, said he, carelessly.
Forgotten it! echoed Bessie, in a tone that
indicated
but too truly her feelings.
Certainly I hadand why not, pray?
Oh, because she hesitated.
Because what, Bessie?
Bessie was ashamed of her embarrassment, and
faltering the more the more she tried to shake it
off, she said, I did not suppose you could forget
any thing that concerned Isabella.
Upon my honour, you are very much
mistaken
;
I have scarcely thought of Effie and her
trumpery prediction since we were there.
Why have you preserved the card, then,
Jasper
?
asked Bessie, in all simplicity.
Jasper's complexion was not of the blushing
order, or he would have blushed as he replied, at
VOL. I.D 7
the same time replacing the cardOh, Lord, I
don't know! accidentthe card got in here among
these old memoranda and receipts, `trivial fond
records' all!
There preserve it, said Bessie, and we will
look at it one of these days.
When?
Whenas it surely will be, the prediction is
verified.
If not till then, he said, it will never again
see the lightthis is the oddest fancy of yours,
he added.
Not fancy, but faith.
Faith most unfoundedwhy, Bessie, Isabella
and I were always quarrelling.
And always making up. Do you ever quarrel
now, Jasper?
Oh, she is still of an April temper; but Ihe
looked most tenderly at Bessiehave lived too
much of late in a serene atmosphere to bear well
her fitful changes.
A long time had passed since Bessie had
mentioned
Isabella to Meredith. She knew not why,
but she had felt a growing reluctance to advert to
her friend even in thought; and she was now
conscious of a thrilling sensation at the careless,
cold manner in which Jasper spoke of her. It
seemed as if a load had fallen off her heart. She
felt like a mariner who has at length caught a
glimpse of what seems distant land, and is
bewildered
with new sensations, and uncertain whether
it be land or not. She was conscious Jasper's eye
was on hers, though her own was downcast. She
longed to escape from that burning glance, and
was relieved by a bustle in the next room, and her
two little sisters running in, one holding up a long
curling tress of her own beautiful hair, and crying
outDid not you give this to me, Bessie?
Is not it mine? said the competitor.
No, it is mine! exclaimed Jasper, snatching
it, and holding it beyond their reach.
The girls laughed, and were endeavouring to
regain it, when he slipped a ring from his finger,
and set it rolling on the floor, saying, The hair
is minethe ring belongs to whoever gets it.
The ring, obedient to the impulse he gave it, rolled
out of the room; the children eagerly followed,
he shut the door after them, and repeated, kissing
the lock of hairIt is mineis it not?
Oh, nono, Jaspergive it to me, cried
Bessie
,
excessively confused.
You will not give it to me!well`a fair
exchange
is no robbery,'  and taking the scissors
from Bessie's workbox, he cut off one of his own
luxuriant dark locks, and offered it to her. She
shook her head.
That is unkindmost unfriendly, Bessie
he paused a moment, and then, still holding both
locks, he extended the ends to Bessie, and asked
her if she could tie a true love-knot. Bessie's
D 2
heart was throbbing; she was frightened at her
own emotion; she was afraid of betraying it; and
she tied the knot as the natural thing for her to do.
There is but one altar for such a sacrifice as
this, said Meredith, and he was putting it into his
bosom, when Bessie snatched it from him, burst
into tears, and left the room.
After this, there was a change in Bessie's
manners
her
spirits became unequal, she was
nervous
and restlessMeredith, in the presence of
observers, was measured and cautious to the last
degree in his attentions to herwhen however they
were alone together, though not a sentence might
be uttered that a lawyer could have tortured into a
special plea, yet his words were fraught with looks
and tones that carried them to poor Bessie's heart
with a power that cannot be imagined by those
Who have ceased to hear such, or ne'er heard.
It was about this period that Meredith wrote the
following reply to a letter from his mother.
Letter
You say, my dear madam, that you have
heard `certain reports about me, which you are not
willing to believe, and yet cannot utterly discredit.'
You say, also, `that though you should revolt with
horror from sanctioning your son in those
liaisons
that are advised by Lord Chesterfield, and others
of your friends, yet you see no harm in'
loverlike
attentions `to young persons in inferior
stations
;
they serve' you add, `to keep alive and
cultivate
that delicate finesse so essential to the
success
of a man of the world, and, provided they
have no immoral purpose, are quite innocent,' as the
object of them must know there is an `impassable
gulf between her and her superiors in rank, and
is therefore responsible for her mistakes.' I have
been thus particular in echoing your words, that I
may assure you my conduct is in conformity to
their letter and spirit. Tranquillize yourself, my
dear madam. There is nothing, in any little
fooleries
I may be indulging in, to disquiet you for a
moment. The person in question is a divine little
creaturequite a prodigy for this part of the
world, where she lives in a seclusion almost equal to
that of Prospero's isle; so that your humble servant,
being scarce more than the `third man that e'er
she saw,' it would not be to marvel at `if he
should be the first that e'er she loved'and if I am,
it is my
destiny
my conscience is quite easy
I never have
committed
myself, nor ever shall:
time and absence will soon dissipate her illusions.
She is an unaspiring little person, quite aware of
the gulf, as you call it, between us. She believes
that even if I were lover and hero enough to play
the Leander and swim it, my destiny is fixed on
the other side. I have no distrust of myself, and I
beg you will have none; I am saved from all
responsibility
as to involving the happiness of this
lily of the valley, by her very clear-sighted mother,
7*
and her sage of a brother, her natural
guardians
.
It is yet problematical whether, as you
suppose
,
a certain lady's fortune will be made by the
apostacy of her disinherited brother. If the rebels
win the day, the property of the tories will be
confiscated
,
or transferred to the rebel heir. But all
that is in futurofortune is a fickle goddess; we
can only be sure of her present favours and deserve
the future by our devotion.
With profound gratitude and affection,
Yours, my dear mother,
J. Meredith
.
P. S.My warmest thanks for the inestimable
box, which escaped the sea and land harpies, and
came safe to hand. The Artois buckle is a
chef
d'uvre,
worthy the inventive genius of the royal
count whose taste rules the civilized world. The
scarlet frock-coat, with its unimitated, if not
inimitable
,
capes, `does credit (as friend Rivington would
say in one of his flashy advertisements) to the most
elegant operator of Leicester-fields.' I must
reserve
it till I go to New-York, where they always
take the lead in this sort of civilizationthe boys
would mob me if I wore it in Boston. The
umbrella
,
a rare invention! is a curiosity here. I
understand they have been introduced into
New-York
by the British officers. Novelty as it is, I
venture to spread it here, as its utility commends it
to these rationalists, who reason about an article
of dress as they would concerning an article of
faith.
Once more, your devoted son, M.
Meredith's conscience was easy! He had not
committed himself!
Ah, let man beware how he
wilfully or carelessly perverts and blinds God's
vicegerent, conscience.
Meredith was suddenly recalled to New-York,
and Bessie Lee was left to ponder on the past, and
weave the future of shattered faith and blighted
hopes. The scales fell too late from the eyes of
her mother and brother. They reproached
themselves
,
but never poor Bessie. They hoped that
time, operating on her gentle, unresisting temper,
would restore her serenity. She, like a stricken
deer, took refuge under the shadow of their love,
she was too affectionate, too generous, to resign
herself to wretchedness without an effort. She
wasted her strength in concealing the wound that
rankled at her heart.
CHAPTER V.
I, considering how honour would become such a person, was
pleased to let him seek danger, where he was like to find fame.
Shakspeare
.
Another
sorrow soon overtook poor Bessie; but
now she had a right to feel, and might express all
she felt, and look full in the face of her friends
for sympathy, for they shared the burden with her.
In the year 1778, letters were sent by General
Washington to the governors of the several states,
earnestly entreating them to re-enforce the army.
The urgency of this call was acknowledged by
every patriotic individual; and never did heart more
joyously leap than Eliot Lee's, when his mother
said to himMy son, I have long had misgivings
about keeping you at home; but last night, after
reading the general's letter, I could not sleep; I
felt for him, for the country; my conscience told
me you ought to go, Eliot; even the images of the
children, for whose sake only I have thought it
right you should stay with us, rose up against me:
we should pay our portion for the privileges they
are to enjoy. I have made up my mind to it, and
on my knees I have given you to my country.
The widow's son, she continued, clearing her
voice, is something more than the widow's mite,
Eliot; but I have given you up, and now I have
done with feelingsnothing is to be said or thought
of but how we shall soonest and best get you
ready.
Eliot was deeply affected by his mother's
decision
,
voluntary and unasked; but he did not express
his satisfaction, his delight, till he ascertained that
she had well considered the amount of the sacrifice
and was willing to meet it. Then he confessed
that nothing but a controlling sense of his filial duty
had enabled him to endure loitering at the fireside,
when his country needed the aid he withheld.
The decision made, no time was lost. Letters
were obtained from the best sources to General
Washington, and in less than a week Eliot was
ready for his departure.
It was a transparent morning, late in autumn, in
bleak, wild, fitful, poetic November. The vault
of heaven was spotless; a purple light danced
over the mountain summits; the mist was
condensed
in the hollows of the hills, and wound them
round like drapery of silver tissue. The smokes
from the village chimneys ascended through the
clear atmosphere in straight columns; the trees
on the mountains, banded together, still preserved
a portion of their summer wealth, though now
faded to dun and dull orange, marked and set off
by the surrounding evergreens. Here and there a
solitary elm stood bravely up against the sky,
D 3
every limb, every stem defined; a naked form,
showing the beautiful symmetry that had made its
summer garments hang so gracefully. Fruits and
flowers, even the hardy ones that venture on the
frontiers of winter, had disappeared from the
gardens
;
the seeds had dropped from their cups; the
grass of the turf-borders was dank and matted
down; all nature was stamped with the signet seal
of autumn,
memory
and
hope
. Eliot had performed
the last provident offices for his mother; every
thing about her cheerful dwelling had the look
of being kindly cared for. The strawberry-beds
were covered, the raspberries neatly trimmed out,
the earth well spaded and freshly turned; no gate
was off its hinges, no fence down, no window
unglazed
,
no crack unstopped.
A fine black saddle-horse, well equipped, was at
the door. Little Fanny Lee stood by him, patting
him, and laying her head, with its shining flaxen
locks, to his sideRover, she said, with a
trembling
voice, be a good Roverwon't you? and
when the naughty regulars come, canter off with
Eliot as fast as you can.
Hey! that's fine! retorted her brother, a year
younger than herself. No, no, Rover, canter up
to them, and over them, and never dare to canter
back here if you turn tail on them, Rover.
Oh, Sam! how awful; would you have Eliot
killed?
No, indeed, but I had rather he'd come deused
near it than to have him a coward.
Don't talk so loud, SamBessie will hear
you.
But the young belligerant was not to be silenced.
He threw open the dwelling-room door, to appeal
to Eliot himself. The half-uttered sentence died
away on his lips. He entered the apartment,
Fanny followed; they gently closed the door, drew
their footstools to Eliot's feet, and quietly sat down
there. How instinctive is the sympathy of
children
!
how plain, and yet how delicate its
manifestations
!
Bessie was sitting beside her brother, her head on
his shoulder, and crying as if her heart went out
with every sob. The youngest boy, Hal, sat on
Eliot's knee, with one arm around his neck, his
cheek lying on Bessie's, dropping tear after tear,
sighing, and half-wondering why it was so.
The good mother had arrived at that age when
grief rather congeals the spirit than melts it. Her
lips were compressed, her eyes tearless, and her
movements tremulous. She was busying herself
in the last offices, doing up parcels, taking last
stitches, and performing those services that seem
to have been assigned to women as safety-valves
for their ever effervescing feelings.
A neat table was spread with ham, bread,
sweetmeats
,
cakes, and every delicacy the house afforded
all were untasted. Not a word was heard
except
such broken sentences as Come, Bessie, I
will promise to be good if you will to be happy!
Eliot, how easy for youhow impossible for
me!
Dear Bessie, do be firmer, for mother's sake.
For ever! oh no, my dear sister, it will not be
very long before I return to you; and while I
am gone, you must be every thing to mother.
I! I never was good for any thing, Eliotand
now
Bessie, my dear child, hushyou have been
you always will be a blessing to me. Don't
put any anxious thoughts into Eliot's mindwe
shall do very well without him.
Noble, disinterested mother! trembled on
Eliot's lips; but he suppressed words that might
imply reproach to Bessie.
The sacred scene was now broken in upon by
some well-meaning but untimely visiters. Eliot's
approaching departure had created a sensation in
Westbrook; the good people of that rustic place
not having arrived at the refined stage in the
progress
of society, when emotion and fellow-feeling are
not expressed, or expressed only by certain
conventional
forms. First entered Master Hale, with Miss
Sally Ryal. Master Hale hoped it was no
intrusion
;
and Miss Sally answered, by no means; she
had come to lend a helping hand, and not to intrude
whereupon she bustled about, helped herself and
her companion to chairs, and unsettled everybody
else in the room. Mrs. Lee assumed a more
tranquil
mien; poor Bessie suppressed her sobs, and
withdrew to a window, and Eliot tried to look
composed
and manly. The children, like springs
relieved
from a pressure, reverted to their natural
state, dashed off their tears, and began
whispering
among themselves. Miss Sally produced from
her workbag a comforter for Mr. Eliot, of her own
knitting, which she trusted would keep out the
cold and rheumatism: and she was kindly
showing
him how to adjust it, when she spied a chain of
braided hair around his neckAh, ha, Mr. Eliot,
a love-token! she exclaimed.
Yes, it is, said little Fanny, who was
watching
her proceedings; Bessie and I cut locks of
hair from all the children's heads and mother's, and
braided it for him; and I guess it will warm his
bosom more than your comforter will, Miss Sally.
It was evident, from the look of ineffable
tenderness
Eliot turned on Fanny, that he guessed so
too; but he nevertheless received the comforter
graciously, hinting, that a lady who had been able
to protect her own bosom from the most subtle
enemy, must know how to defend another's from
common assaults. Miss Sally hemmed, looked at
Master Hale, muttered something of her not
always
having been invulnerable; and finally
succeeded
in recalling to Eliot's recollection a tradition
of a love-passage between Miss Sally and the
pedagogue
.
A little girl now came trotting in, with
grandmother's
8
love, and a vial of her
mixture
for Mr.
Eliotgood against camp-distemper and the like.
Eliot received the
mixture
as if he had all
grandmother's
faith in it, slipped a bright shilling into
the child's hand for a keepsake, kissed her rosy
cheek, and set her down with the children.
Visiters now began to throng. One man in a
green old age, who had lost a leg at Bunker's Hill,
came hobbling in, and clapping Eliot on the
shoulder
,
said, this is you, my boy! This is what I
wanted to see your father's son a-doing: I'd go too,
if the rascals had left me both my legs. Cheer
up, widow, and thank the Lord you've got such a
son to offer up to your countrythe richer the
gift, the better the giver, you know; but I don't
wonder you feel kind o' qualmish at the thoughts
of losing the lad. Come, Master Hale, can't you
say something? A little bit of Greek, or Latin,
or 'most any thing, to keep up their
sperits
at the
last gasp, as it were.
I was just going to observe, Major Avery, to
Mrs. Lee, respecting our esteemed young friend,
Mr. Eliot, that I, who have known him from the
beginning, as it were, having taught him his
alphabet
,
which may be said to be the first round of the
ladder of learning (which he has mounted by my
help), or rather (if you will allow me, ma'am, to
mend my figure) the poles that support all the
rounds; having had, as I observed, a primordial
acquaintance
with him, I can testify that he is worthy
every honourable adjective in the language, and we
have every reason to hope that his future tense
will be as perfect as his past.
Wheugh! exclaimed the major, a pretty
long march you have had through that speech!
The good schoolmaster, quite unruffled,
proceeded
to offer Eliot a time-worn Virgil; and
finished by expressing his hopes that he would
imitate Csar in maintaining his studies in the
camp, and keep the scholar even-handed with the
soldier.
Eliot charmed the old pedagogue, by assuring
him that he should be more apt at imitating Csar's
studies than his soldiership, and himself bestowed
Virgil in his portmanteau.
A good lady now stepped forth, and seeming
somewhat scandalized that, as she said, no
serious
truth had been spoken at this peculiar season,
she concluded a technical exhortation by giving
Eliot a pair of stockings, into which she had
wrought St. Paul's description of the gospel
armour
.
The Scripture, she feared, did not
often find its way to the camp; and she thought
a passage might be blessed, as a single kernel of
wheat, even sowed among tares, sometimes
produced
its like.
Eliot thanked her, said it was impossible to
have too much of the best thing in the world; but
he hoped she would have less solicitude about him,
when he assured her that his mother had found
place for a pocket Bible in his portmanteau.
A meek-looking creature now stole up to Mrs.
Lee, and putting a roll of closely-compressed lint.
into her hand, said, tuck it in with his things,
Miss
Lee. Don't let it scare youI trust he will dress
other people's wounds, not his own, with it.My!
that will come natural to him. It's made from the
shirt Mr. Eliot stripped from himself, and tore into
bandages for my poor Sam, that time he was
scalt. Mr. Eliot was a boy then, but he has the
same heart now.
Mrs. Lee dropped a tear on the lint, as she stowed
it away in the closely-packed portmanteau.
There comes crazy Anny! exclaimed the
children; and a woman appeared at the door,
scarcely past middle age, carrying in her hand a
pole, on which she had tied thirteen strips of cloth
of every colour, and stuck them over with white
paper stars. Her face was pale and weatherworn,
and her eye sunken, but brilliant with the wild
flashing light that marks insanity. The moment
her eye fell on Eliot, her imagination was excited
Glory to the Lord! she criedglory to the
Lord! A leader hath come forth from among my
people! Go on, Eliot Lee, and we will gird thee
about with the prayers of the widow and the
blessings of the childless! This is comfort! But
you could not comfort me, Eliot Lee, though you
spoke like an angel that time you was sent to me
with the news the boys was shot. I remember you
shed tears, and it seemed to me there was a hissing
in here (she put her hand on her head) as they fell.
My eyes were dryI did not shed one tear, though
the doctor bid me. I cried them all out when
he (she advanced to Eliot, and lowered her voice),
the grand officer in the reg'lars, you know, decoyed
away my poor Susy, the prettiest and kindest
creature that ever went into Westbrook meeting;
fair as Bessie Lee, and far more plump and rosy
to be sure Susy was but a servant-girl, but she
raised her voice to a shriek, I shall never lay
down my head in peace till they are all driven into
the salt sea, where my Susy was buried.
We'll drive them all there, said Eliot,
soothingly
,
laying his hand on her armevery mother's
son of them, Annynow be quiet, and go home,
Anny.
Yes, sirthank you, sir,yes, sir! said she,
calmed and courtesying again and againoh, I
forgot
,
Mr. Eliot! she drew from her bosom an old
rag, in which she had tied some kernels of
butter-nuts
give
my duty to General Washington, and
give him these butternut meatsit's all I have to
send himI did give him my bestthey were
nice boys, for allwer'n't they, Bob and Pete?
And whimpering and trailing her banner after her,
the poor bereft creature left the house.
A loud official rap was heard at the door, and
immediately recognised as the signal of the
minister's
8*
approach. We must claim indulgence while
we linger for a moment with this reverend divine,
for the race of which he was an honoured member
is fast disappearing from our land. Peace be with
them! Ill would they have brooked these days of
unquestioned equality of rights, of
anti-monopolies
,
of free publishing and freer thinking, of
universal suffrage, of steam-engines, rail-roads, and
spinning-jennies,all indirect contrivances to raze
those fortunate eminences, by mounting which
little
men became great, and lorded it over their
fellows
:
but peace be with them! How should they
have known (till it began to tremble under them)
that the height on which they stood was an
artificial
,
not a natural elevation. They preached equality
in Heaven, but little thought it was the kingdom
to come on earth. They were the electric chain,
unconscious of the celestial fire they transmitted.
We would give them honour due; and to them
belongs the honour of having been the zealous
champions of their country's cause, and of having
fought bravely with the weapons of the church
militant
.
Our good parson Wilson was an Apollo in
little
;
being not more than five feet four in height,
and perfectly well made,a fact of which he
betrayed
the consciousness, by the exact adjustment
of every article of his apparel, even to his long
blue yarn stockings, drawn over the knee, and kept
sleek by the well-turned leg, without the aid of
garters. On entering Mrs. Lee's parlour, he gave
his three-cornered hat, gold-headed cane, and
buck-skin-gloves
to little Fanny, who, with the rest of
the children, had at his approach slunk into a
corner
(they need not, for never was there a kinder
heart than parson Wilson's, though somewhat in
the position of vitality enclosed in a petrefaction),
and then giving a general bow to the company, he
went to the glass, took a comb from his
waistcoat-pocket
,
and smoothed his hair to an equatorial line
around his forehead; he then crossed the room to
Mrs. Lee with some commonplace consolation on
his lips; but the face of the mother spoke too
eloquently
,
and he was compelled to turn away,
wipe his eyes, and clear his throat, before he could
recover his official composure. Mr. Eliot, he
then began, though a minister of the gospel of
peace, I heartily approve your going forth in the
present warfare, for surely it is lawful to defend
that which is our own; no man has a right to that
for which he did not labour; to cities which he built
not; to olive-yards and vineyards which he planted
not.
I don't know about olive-yards and vineyards,
interposed the major, never having seen such
things; but I'm thinking we can eat our corn and
potatoes without their help that have neither planted
nor gathered them.
The parson gave an acquiescent nod to the
major's
emendation of his text, and proceeded:I
have wished, my young friend, to strengthen you in
the righteous cause in which you are taking up
arms; and, to that end, besides the prayers which
I shall daily offer for you and yours at the throne
of divine grace, I have made up a book for you
(here he tendered a package, large enough to fill
half the portmanteau of our equestrian traveller),
consisting of extracts selected from three thousand
eight hundred and ninety-seven sermons, preached
on the Sabbaths throughout my ministry of
forty-eight
years, besides occasional discourses for peace
and war, thanksgivings and fasts, associations and
funerals. As you will often be out of reach of
preaching privileges, I have provided here a word
in season for every occasion, which I trust you
may find both teaching and refreshing after a weary
day's service.
Eliot received the treasure with suitable
expressions
of gratitude. The good man continued:
I could not, my friends, do this for another; but
you know that, speaking after the manner of men,
we look upon this dear youth as the pride and glory
of our society.
And I'm thinking, reverend sir, said the
major
,
with that tone of familiarity authorized by
age (but stared at by the children), I'm thinking
you'll not be called on again for a like service; for
after Eliot Lee is gone, there's not another what
you can raly call a
man
in the parish. To begin
with yourself, reverend sir; you've never been a
fighting character, which I take to be, humanly
speaking, a necessary part of a man; then there's
myself, minus a leg; and Master Hale here, who
I respect you for all, Master Halenever was
born to be handy with a smarter weapon than a
ferule; then comes blind Billy, and limping Harris,
and, to bring up the rear, Deacon Allen and the
doctor. Here the major chuckled: They both
say they would join the army if 'twas not as it is;
but they have been dreadful near-sighted since the
war broke out. That's all of `mankind,' as you may
say, that's left in the bounds of Westbrook. Oh,
I forgot Kiselpoor Kisel! Truly, he seems to
have been made up of leavings. Kisel would not
make a bad soldier either, if it were one crack and
done. He is brave at a go-off, but he can't bear
the sight o'blood; and if he shoots as crooked as
he talks, he'd be as like to shoot himself as
anybody
else. But sometimes the fellow's tongue
does hit the mark in a kind of providential manner.
By the LorJiminy, I mean!there he comes, on
Granny Larkin's colt!
The person in question now halted before Mrs.
Lee's door, mounted on an unbroken, ragged,
party-coloured
animal, such as is called, in country
phrase, a wishing horse, evidently equipped for
travelling. His bridle was compounded of alternate
bits of rope and leather; a sheepskin served him
for a saddle, behind which hung on either side a
meal-bag, filled with all his worldly substance.
His own costume was in keeping; an
over-garment
,
made of an old blanket, a sort of long
roundabout, was fastened at the waist with a
wampum belt, which, tied in many a
fantastical
knot, dangled below his knees; his
undergarments
were a pair of holyday leather breeches,
and yarn stockings of deep red; a conical cap,
composed of alternate bits of scarlet and blue cloth,
covered his head, and was drawn close over his
eyebrows.Nature had reduced his brow to the
narrowest precincts; his face was concave; his
eyes sparkling, and in incessant motion; his nose
thin and sharp; a pale, clean-looking skin, and a
mouth with more of the characteristics of the brute
than the human animal, complete the portrait of
Kisel, who, leaping like a cat from his horse,
appeared at the door, screaming out, in a cracked
voice, Ready, Misser Eliot?
While all were exchanging inquiring glances,
and the children whispering, Hush, Kiseldon't
you see Dr. Wilson? Eliot, who comprehended
the strange apparition at a glance, came forward
and said
No, Kisel; I am not ready.
Well, wellall sameKisel can wait, and
Beauty toohey!
No, no, Kisel, replied Eliot, kindly taking
the lad's hand, you must not waityou must give
this up, my good fellow.
Give it up!Diddle me if I dono, I told
you that all the devils and angels to bargain should
not stop me, noyou go, I gothat's it, hey!
Here Major Avery, who sat near the door, his
mouth wide open with amazement, burst into a
hoarse laugh, at which Kisel, his eyes flashing
fire, gave him a smart switch with his riding-whip
(a willow wand) over the face. The
good-humoured
man, deeming the poor lad no subject for
resentment, passed his hand over his face as if a
moscheto had stung him, sayingWell, now,
Kisel, that was not fair, my boy; I was only
smiling that such a harlequin-looking thing as you
should think of being waiter to Mr. Eliot. He
might as well take a bat, or a woodpecker.
Eliot did not need his poor friend should be
placed in this ludicrous aspect to strengthen the
decision which he had already expressed to him;
and drawing him aside beyond the irritation of the
major's gibes, he saidIt is impossible, Kisel
I cannot consent to your going with me.
Can't, hey! can't! can't!and for a few
moments the poor fellow hung his head,
whimpering
;
then suddenly elevating it, he cried, Then
I go 'out consentI go, anyhow; and springing
back to the door, he called out
Miss
Lee, hear
meMiss Bessie, you too, and you, parson Wilson,
for I speak gospel. When I boy, all boys laugh
at me, knock me here, kick therewho took
my part?Misser Eliot, hey! When they tied
me to old Roan, Beauty's mother, head to tail, who
licked the whole tote of 'em?Misser Eliot. I
sick, nobody care I live or dieMisser Eliot stay
by me all night. When everybody laugh at me,
plague me, hate me, I wish me dead, Misser
Eliot talk to me, make me feel good, glad, make
me warm here. He laid his hand on his bosom
He gone, I can't live!but I'll follow him
I'll be his dog, fetch, carry, lay down at his feet.
S'pose he sick, Miss Lee? everybody say I good
in sicknessS'pose, Miss Bessie, he lie on the
ground, bleeding, horses trampling, soldiers flying,
hey!I bind him up, bring water, carry him in
my armsif he die, I die too!
The picture Kisel rudely sketched struck the
imaginations of mother and daughter. They knew
his devotion to Eliot, and that in emergencies he
had gleams of shrewdness that seemed supernatural.
They were too much absorbed in serious emotions
to be susceptible of the ludicrous; and both joined
in earnestly entreating Eliot not to oppose Kisel's
wishes. Dr. Wilson supported their intercession
by remarking, that it seemed quite providential
he should have been able to prepare for such an
expedition. The major took off the edge of this
argument by communicating what he had hastily
ascertained, that Kisel had bartered away his
patrimony
for Granny Larkin's wishing horse, yclept
Beauty; but he added two suggestions that had
much force with Eliot, particularly the last; for if
there was a virtue that had supremacy in his
well-ordered
character, it was humanity. The lad,
Mr. Lee, he said, may be of use, after all. It
takes a great many sorts of folks to make a world,
and so to make up an army. There's a lack of
hands in camp, and his may come in play. Kisel is
keen at a sudden calland besides, he added, in
a lower voice to Eliot, it's true what the
creatur
says, when you are gone he'll be good for nothing
like a vine when the tree it clung to is removed,
withering on the ground. Say you'll take him, and
we'll rig him out according to Gunter.
Thus beset, Eliot consented to what half an
hour before had appeared to him absurd; and the
major bestirring himself, from his own and Mrs.
Lee's stores soon rectified Kisel's equipment in all
important particulars, to suit either honourable
character
of volunteer soldier or volunteer attendant
on Mr. Eliot Lee. This done, nothing remained
but the customary devotional service, still
performed
by the village pastor on all extraordinary
occasions. On this, Doctor Wilson's feelings
over-powered
his technicalities. His prayer, sublimed
by the touching language of Scripture, melted the
coldest heart, and raised the most dejected. After
bestowing their farewell blessing the neighbours
withdrew, all treasuring in their hearts some last
word of kindness from Eliot Lee, long remembered,
and often referred to.
The family were now left to a sacred service
more informal, and far more intensely felt. Eliot,
VOL. I.E
locking his mother and sister in his arms, and the
little ones gathered around him, with manly faith
commended them to God their Father; and
receiving
their last embraces, sprang on to his horse
conscious of nothing but confused sensations of
grief, till having passed far beyond the bounds of
Westbrook, he heard his companion lightly
singing
I
cries for nobody, and nobody cries for
Kisel!
CHAPTER VI.
I do not, brother,
Infer, as if I thought my sister's state
Secure, without all doubt or controversy;
Yet, where an equal poise of hope and fear
Does arbitrate the event, my nature is,
That I incline to hope rather than fear."
Milton
.
Eliot Lee to his Mother
.
Town
, 1778.
I have
arrived thus far, my dear mother, on
my journey; and, according to my promise, am
beginning the correspondence which is to soften
our separation.
My spirits have been heavy. My anxious
thoughts lingered with you, brooded over dear
Bessie and the little troop, and dwelt on our home
affairs.
I feared Harris would neglect the thrashing,
and the wheat might not turn out as well as we
hoped; that the major might forget his promise
about the husking bee; that the pumpkins might
freeze in the loft (pray have them brought down,
I forgot it!); that the cows might fail sooner than
you expected; that the sheep might torment you.
E 2
In short, dear mother, the grief of parting seemed
to spread its shadows far and wide. If Master
Hale could have penetrated my mental processes,
he would have deemed his last admonition, to
deport myself in
thought,
word, and deed, like a
scholar, a soldier, and a gentleman, quite lost upon
me. I was an anxious wretch, and nothing else.
Poor Kisel did not serve as a tranquillizer. His
light wits were throwing off their fermentation, in
whistling, laughing, and soliloquizing: and this,
with
Beauty's
shambling gait, neither trot, canter,
nor pace, but something compounded of all,
irritated
my nerves. Never were horse and rider
better matched. Together, they make a fair
centaur
;
the animal not more than half a horse, and
Kisel not more than half a man; there is a
ludicrous correspondence between them; neither
vicious, but both unbreakable, and full of all
manner
of tricks.
Our land at this moment teems with scenes
of moral and poetic interest. We made our first
stop at the little inn in R. The landlord's
son was just setting off to join the quota to be sent
from-that county. The father, a stout old man,
was trying to suppress his emotion by bustling
about, talking loud, whistling, hemming, and
coughing
.
The mother, her tears dropping like rain,
was standing at the fire, feeling over and over again
the shirts she was airing for the knapsack. `He's
our youngest,' whispered the old man to me, `and
mammy is dreadful tender of him, poor boy!'
`Not mammy alone,' thought I, as the old man
turned away to brush off his starting tears. The
sisters were each putting some love-token, socks,
mittens, and nutcakes into the knapsack, which they
looked hardy enough to have shouldered, while one
poor girl sat with her face buried in her
handkerchief
,
weeping most bitterly. The old man patted
her on the neck`Come, Letty, cheer up!' said
he; `Jo may never have another chance to fight
for his country, and marrying can be done any day
in the year.' He turned to me with an explanatory
whisper; `'Tis tough for allJo and Letty are
published, and we were to have the wedding
thanks-giving
evening.'
All this was rather too much for me to bear,
in addition to the load already pressing on my
heart; so without waiting for my horse to be fed,
I mounted him and proceeded.
My next stop was in H. There the
company
had mustered on the green, in readiness to
begin their march. Some infirm old men, a few
young mothers, with babies in their arms, and all
the boys in the town, had gathered for the last
farewell
.
The soldiers were resting on their muskets,
and the clergyman imploring the benediction of
Heaven on their heads. `Can England,' thought
I, `hope to subdue a country that sends forth its
defenders in such a spirit, with arms of such a
9*
temper?' Oh, why does she not respect in her
children the transmitted character of their fathers!
I arrived at Mrs. Ashley's just as the family
were sitting down to tea. She and the girls are
in fine spirits, having recently received from the
colonel accounts of some fortunate skirmishes with
the British. The changed aspect of her once
sumptuous tea-table at first shocked me; but my
keen appetite (for the first time in my life, my
dear mother, I had fasted all day) quite overcame
my sensibilities; the honest pride with which my
patriotic hostess told me she had converted all her
table-cloths into shirts for her husband's men, and
the complacency with which she commended her
sage tea, magnified the virtues of her brown bread,
and self-sweetened sweetmeats would have given
a relish to coarser fare more coarsely served.
I have been pondering on the character of
our New-England people during my ride. The
aspect of our society is quiet, and, to a cursory
observer, it appears tame. We seem to have the
plodding, safe,
self-preserving
virtues; to be
industrious
,
frugal, provident, and cautious; but to
want the enthusiasm that gives to life all its poetry
and almost all its charms. But it is not so; there
is a strong under-current. Let the individual or
the people be roused by a motive that approves
itself to the reasoning and religious mind, a fervid
energy, an all-subduing enthusiasm bursts forth,
not like an accidental and transient conflagration,
but operating, like the elements, to great effects, and
irresistibly. This enthusiasm, this central fire,
is now at its height. It not only inflames the
eloquence of the orator, kindles the heart of the
soldier, the beacon-lights and strong defences of
our land; but it lights the temple of God, and
burns on the family altar. The old man throws
away his crutch; the yeoman leaves the plough in
the half-turned furrow; and the loving, quiet matron
like you, my dear mother, lays aside her domestic
anxieties, dispenses with her household comforts,
and gives the God-speed to her sons to go forth
and battle it for their country. The nature of the
contest in which we are engaged illustrates my
idea. Its sublimity is sometimes obscured by the
extravagance of party zeal. We have not been
goaded to resistance by oppression, nor fretted and
chafed, with bits and collars, to madness; but our
sages, bold with the transmitted spirit of freedom,
sown at broadcast by our Pilgrim fathers, have
reflected on the past and calculated the future; and
coolly estimating the worth of independence and
the right of self-government, are willing to hazard
all in the hope of gaining all; to sacrifice
themselves
for the prospective good of their children.
This is the dignified resolve of thinking beings,
not the angry impatience of overburdened animals.
But good-night, dear mother. After this I
shall have incidents, and not reflections merely, to
send you. The pine-knot, by the light of which
I have written this, is just flickering its last flame.
`I cannot afford you a candle,' said my good hostess
when she bade me good-night; `we sold our tallow
to purchase necessaries for the colonel's menpoor
fellows, some of them are yet barefooted!'
I shall enclose a line to Bessieperhaps she
will show it to you; but do not ask it of her. Tell
dear Fan I shall remember her charge, and give
the socks she knit to the first `brave barefooted
soldier'
I see. Sam must feed Steady for me; and
dear little Hal must continue, as he has begun, to
couple brother Eliot with the `poor soldiers' in his
prayers. Again farewell, dear mother. Your
little Bible is before me; my eye rests on the
few lines you traced on the title-page; and as I
press my lips to them, they inspire holy
resolutions
.
God grant I may not mistake their
freshness
for vigour. What I may be is uncertain;
but I shall ever remain, as I am now, dearest
mother,
Your devoted son,
Eliot Lee
.
Eliot found his letter to his sister a difficult task.
He was to treat a malady, the existence of which
the patient had never acknowledged to him. He
wrote, effaced, and re-wrote, and finally sent the
following:
Letter
My sweet sister Bessie, nothing has afflicted
me so much in leaving home as parting from you.
I am inclined to believe there can be no stronger
nor tenderer affection than that of brother and
sister; the sense of protection on one part, and
dependance on the other; the sweet recollections
of childhood; the unity of interest; and the
communion
of memory and hope, blend their hearts
together into one existence. So it is with usis
it not, my dear sister? With me, certainly; for
though, like most young men, I have had my
fancies, they have passed by like the summer
breeze, and left no trace of their passage. All the
love, liking (I cannot find a word to express the
essential volatility of the sentiment in my
experience
of it) that I have ever felt for all my
favourites, brown and fair, does not amount to one
thousandth part of the immutable affection that I
bear you, my dear sister. I speak only of my
own experience, Bessie, and, as I well know,
against the faith of the world. I should be told
that my fraternal love would pale in the fires of
another passion, as does a lamp at the shining of
the sun; but I don't believe a word of itdo
you,
Bessie? I am not, my dear sister, playing the
inquisitor with you, but fearfully and awkwardly
enough approaching a subject on which I thought
it would be easier to write than to speak; but I
find it cannot be easy to do that, in any mode,
which may pain you.
I have neglected the duty I owed you; and
yet, perhaps, no vigilance could have prevented
E 3
the natural consequence of your intercourse with
one of the most fascinating men in the world.
There, it is out!and now I can write freely. I
said I had neglected my duty; but I was not
conscious
of this till too late. The truth is, my mind
has been so engrossed with political subjects, so
harassed with importunate cravings and conflicting
duties, that I was for a long time unobservant of
what was passing under my eye. I awoke as from
a dream, and found (or feared) that my sister's
happiness was at stake; that she had given, and
given to one unworthy, the irrequitable boon of
her affections; irrequitable, but, thank Heaven,
not irrecoverable. No, I do not believe one word
of all the trumpery about incurable love. I will
not adopt a faith, however old and prevailing,
which calls in question our moral power to achieve
any conquest over ourselves. For my own part,
I do not think we have any power over our
affections
to give or withdraw them, or even to
measure
their amount. This may seem a startling
assertion, and contradictory of what I have said
above; but it is not. The sentiment I there
alluded
to is generated by accidental circumstances,
is half illusion, unsustained by reason,
unauthorized
by realitiesnot the immortal love infused
by Heaven and sustained by truth; but a disease
very mortal and very curable, dear Bessie, believe
me. Such a mind as yours, so pure, so elevated,
has a self-rectifying power. You have felt the
influence of the delightful qualities which M
undoubtedly possesses; and why should you not,
for who is more susceptible to grace and
refinement
than yourself? Heaven has so arranged the
relations of affections and qualities, that, as I have
said above, we can neither give nor withhold our
lovethe heart has no tenants at will. If M
has assumed, or you have imputed to him qualities
which he does not possess, your affection will be
dissipated with the illusion. But if the spell still
remains unbroken, I entreat you, my dear sister,
not to waste your sensibility, the precious food
of life, the life of life, in moping melancholy.
`Attach thee firmly (I quote from memory) to the
virtuous
deeds
And offices of loveto love itself,
With all its vain and transient joys, sit loose.'
I have long had a lurking distrust of M. He
has acted too cautious a part in politics for a sound
heart. Let a man run the risk of hanging for it
either way; but if he have a spark of generosity, he
will be either a whole-souled whig or a loyal tory
in these times.
I know what Mhas so often reiterated.
`He had a mother in England; all his friends were
on the royal side; and, on the other hand, his
property
was here, and might depend on the favour of
the rebels; and indeed, there was so much to be
said on both sides, that a man might well pause!'
There are moments in men's histories when none
but cowards or knaves, or (worse than either)
cold-blooded
,
selfish wretches, would
pause!
It is possible that I misjudge him; Heaven
grant it! All that I
know
is, that he is in New-York
no longer,
pausing,
but the aid of General Clinton.
It is barely possible that he has written; letters are
not transmitted with any security in these times;
but why did he not speak before he went? why, up
to the very hour of his departure (as my mother
says, you know I was absent), did he continue a
devotion which must end in suffering and
disappointment
to you? There is a vicious vanity and
selfishness in this, most unmanly and detestable.
Do not think, dearest Bessie, that I am anxious to
prove him unworthyAlas, alas! I was far too
slow to believe him so; and I now only set before
you these inevitable inferences from his conduct, in
the hope that your illusion will sooner vanish, and
you will the sooner recover your tranquillity.
I am writing without a ray of light, except
what comes from the embers on the hearth.
Perhaps
you will think I am in Egyptian mental
darkness
.
No, Bessie, I must be clear-sighted when I
have nothing in view but your honour and
happiness
.
They shall ever be my care, even more than
my own. But why do I separate that which is one
and indivisible? Good-night, dear sister. Let me
fancy you listening to me; your sweet eye fixed on
me; no dejected nor averted look; your face
beaming
,
as I have often seen it, with the tenderness
so dangerous here, so safe in heaven; the hope so
often defeated here, there ever brightening; the
joy so transient here, there enduring!Let me see
this blessed vision, and I shall sleep sweetly and
sweetly dream of home.
Ever thine, Bessie,
E. L.
Bessie read her brother's letter with mixed
emotions
.
At first it called forth tenderness for him;
then she thought he judged Meredith precipitately,
harshly even; and after confirming herself in this
opinion, by thinking of him over and over again in
the false lights in which he had shown himself,
she said, even Eliot allows that we can neither
give nor withhold our love; then how is Jasper to
blame for not giving it to one so humble, so inferior
as I am? and how could I withhold mine? Poor
Bessie! it is a common trick of human nature to
snatch from an argument whatever coincides with
our own views, and leave the rest. If, she
continued
in her reflections, he had ever made any
declarations, or asked any confessionsbut I gave
my whole heart unasked and silently. She could
have recalled passionate declarations in his eye,
prayers in his devotion; but her love had the
essential
characteristics of true passion; it was humble,
generous, and self-condemning.
10
CHAPTER VII.
Si tout le monde vous ressembloit, un roman seroit bientot
fini
!
Moliere
.
November's
leaden clouds and fitful gleams of
sunshine, coming like visitations of heaven-inspired
thoughts, and vanishing, alas! like illusions,
harmonized
with the state of Bessie's mind. She was
much abroad, rambling alone over her favourite
haunts, and living over the dangerous past. This
was at least a present relief and solace; and her
mother, though she feared it might minister to the
morbid state of her child's feelings, had not the
resolution to interpose her authority to prevent it.
Bessie was one evening at twilight returning
homeward
by a road (if road that might be called which
was merely a horse-path) that communicated at the
distance of a mile and a half with the main road to
Boston. It led by the margin of a little brook,
through a pine wood that was just now powdered
over with a light snow. Meredith and Bessie had
always taken their way through this sequestered
wood in their walks and rides, going and returning;
not a step of it but was eloquent with some
treasured
word, some well-remembered emotion. Bessie
had seated herself on a fallen trunk, an accustomed
resting-place, and was looking at a bunch of ground
pine and wild periwinkles as if she were perusing
them; the sensations of happier hours had stolen
over her, the painful present and uncertain future
were forgotten, when she was roused from her
dreamy state by the trampling of an approaching
horse. Women, most women, are cowards on
instinct
.
Bessie cast one glance backward, and saw
the horse was ridden by a person in a military dress.
A stranger in this private path was rather an
alarming
apparition, and she started homeward with hasty
steps. The rider mended his horse's pace, and
was soon even with her, and in another instant had
dismounted and exclaimedBessie Lee!It is
you, BessieI cannot be mistaken!
Bessie smiled at this familiar salutation, and did
not refuse her hand to the stranger, who with eager
cordiality offered his; but not being in the least a
woman of the world, it was plain she explored his
face in vain for some recognisable feature.No,
you do not remember methat is evident, he said,
with a tone of disappointment. Is there not a
vestige, Bessie, of your old playmate, in the
whiskered
,
weather-beaten personage before you?
Herbert Linwood! she exclaimed, and a glow
of glad recognition mounted from her heart to her
cheek.
Ah, thank you, Bessie, better late than never;
but it is sad to be forgotten. You are much less
changed than I, undoubtedly; but I should have
known you if nothing were unaltered save the
colour of your eye; however, I have always worn
your likeness here, he gallantly added, putting his
hand to his heart, and in truth, you are but the
opening bud expanded to the flower, while I have
undergone a change like the chestnut, from the
tassel to the bearded husk. Bessie soon began to
perceive familiar tones and expression, and she
consoled Herbert with the assurance that it was
only her surprise, his growth, change of dress, &c.,
that prevented her from knowing him at once.
They soon passed to mutual inquiries, by which it
appeared that Herbert had come to Massachusetts
on military business. The visit to Westbrook was
a little episode of his own insertion. He was to
return in a few weeks to West Point, where he
was charmed to hear he should meet Eliot.
I am cut off from my own family, he said,
and really, I pine for a friend. I gather from
Belle's letters that my father is more and more
estranged
from me. While he thought I was
fighting
on the losing side, and in peril of my head, his
generous spirit was placable; but since the result
of our contest has become doubtful, even to him,
he has waxed hotter and hotter against me; and if
we finally prevail, and prevail we must, he will
never forgive me.
Oh, do not say sohe cannot be so
unrelenting
;
and if he were, Isabella can persuade him
she can do any thing she pleases.
Yes, a pretty potent person is that sister of
mine. But when my father sets his foot down, the
devilI beg your pardon Bessie, and Belle's too
I mean his metal is of such a temper that an angel
could not bend him.
Isabella is certainly the angel, not its
opposite
.
Why yes, she is, God bless her! But yet,
Bessie, she is pretty well spiced with humanity.
If she were not, she would not be so attractive
to a certain friend of ours, who is merely human.
Bessie's heart beat quicker; she knew, or feared
she knew, what Herbert meant; and after a pause,
full of sensation to her, she ventured to ask if he
heard often from New-York?
Yes, we get rumours from there every day
nothing very satisfactory. Belle, in spite of her
toryism, is a loving sister, and writes me as often
as she can; but as the letters run the risk of being
read by friends and foes, they are about as
domestic
and private as if they were endited for
Rivington's
Gazette.
Then, said Bessie, quite boldly, for she felt a
sensible relief, you have no news to tell me?
Nono, nothing official, he replied, with a
smile; Belle writes exultingly of Meredith
having
,
since his return to New-York, come out on the
right side, as she calls itand of my father's
pleasure
and pride in him, &c. Of course she says not
a word of her own sentiments. I hear from an
old friend of mine, who was brought in a prisoner
10*
the other day, that Meredith has been devoted to
her ever since his return. They were always
lovers after an April-day fashion, you know, Bessie,
and I should not be surprised to hear of their
engagement
at any timeshould you?
Fortunately for poor Bessie, her hood sheltered
the rapid mutations of her cheek; resolution or
pride she had not, but a certain sense of maidenly
decorum came to her aid, and she faintly answered,
No, I should not. If this were a slight
departure
from truth, every woman (every young one)
will forgive her, for it was a case of
self-preservation
.
Linwood was so absorbed in the happiness
of being near her, of having her arm in his, that he
scarcely noticed how that arm trembled, and how
her voice faltered. He afterward recalled it.
Herbert's visit to the Lees was like a saint's
day to good Catholics after a long penance. He
had in his boyhood been a prime favourite with
Mrs. Leeshe was delighted to see him again, and
thought the man even more charming than the boy.
She made every effort to show off her hospitable
home to Linwood in its old aspect of abundance
and cheerfulness; and, in spite of war and actual
changes, she succeeded. She had the skilful
housewife's
gift to make the worse appear the better,
far more difficult in housewifery than in
metaphysics
.
Herbert enjoyed, to her kind heart's content,
the result of her efforts. The poor fellow's
appetite
had been so long mortified with the sorry fare
of the American camp, that no Roman epicurean
ever relished the dainties of an emperor's table
(such as canaries' eyes and peacocks' brains) more
keenly than he did the plain but excellent provisions
at Lee farm; the incomparable bread and butter,
ham, apple-sauce, and cream, the nuts the children
cracked, and the sparkling cider they drew for him.
We are quite aware that a hero on a sentimental
visit should be indifferent to these gross matters,
but our friend Herbert was no hero, no romantic
abstraction, but a good, honest, natural fellow,
compounded
of body and spirit, each element bearing
its due proportion in the composition.
Bessie yielded to the influence of old associations,
and, as her mother thought, was more light-hearted,
more
herself,
than she had been for many a weary
month. After all, she said, anxiously revolving
the subject in her mind, it may come out right
yet. Bessie cannot help preferring Herbert
Linwood
,
so good-humoured and open-hearted as he
is, to Meredith, with his studied elegance, his
hollow
phrases, and expressive looks. Herbert's heart
is in his hand; and hand and heart he'll not be too
proud to offer her; for he sees things in their true
lights, and not with the world's eye.
Mrs. Lee was delicate and prudent; but she
could not help intimating her own sentiments to
Bessie. From that moment a change came over
her. Her spirits vanished like the rosy hues from
the sunset clouds. Herbert wondered, but he had
no time to lose in speculation. He threw himself
at Bessie's feet, and there poured out his tale of
love and devotion. At first he received nothing in
return but silence and tears; and, when he became
more importunate, broken protestations of her
gratitude
and ill desert; which he misunderstood, and
answered by declaring she owed him no gratitude;
that he was but too bold to aspire to her, poor
wretch of broken fortunes that he was; but, please
Heaven, he would mend them under her auspices.
She dared not put him off with pretences. She
only wept, and said she had no heart to give; and
then left him, feeling much like some poor mariner,
who, as he is joyously sailing into a long-desired
port, is suddenly enveloped in impenetrable mist.
Herbert was not of a temper to remain tranquil
in this position. He knew nothing of the blessing
promised to those that wait, for he had never
waited for any thing; and he at once told his
perplexities
to Mrs. Lee, who, herself most grieved
and mortified, communicated slight hints which, by
furnishing a key to certain observations of his own,
put him sufficiently in possession of the truth.
Without again seeing Bessie, he left Westbrook
with the common conviction of even common lovers
in fresh disappointments, that there was no more
happiness for him in this world.
Mrs. Lee uttered no word of expostulation or
reproach to Bessie; but her sad looks, like the old
mother's in the ballad, gaed near to break her
heart.
There are few greater trials to a tender hearted,
conscientious creature like Bessie Lee, than to
defeat
the hopes and disappoint the expectations of
friends, by opposing those circumstances which,
as it seems to them, will best promote our honour
and happiness. Eliot, said Bessie, in her secret
meditations, thinks I am weakly cherishing an
unworthy
passionmy mother believes that I have
voluntarily thrown away my own advantage and
happinessthank Heaven, the wretchedness, as
well as the fault, is all my own.
Many may condemn Bessie's unresisting
weakness
;
but who will venture to graduate the scale of
human virtue? to decide in a given case how much
is bodily infirmity, and how much defect of
resolution
.
Certain are we, that when fragility of
constitution
,
tenderness of conscience, and
susceptibility
of heart, meet in one person, the sooner the
trials of life are over the better.
CHAPTER VIII.
A name which every wind to Heaven would bear,
Which men to speak, and angels joy to hear.
Another
letter from Eliot broke like a
sunbeam
through the monotonous clouds that hung
over the Lees.
Letter
My Dearest Mother,
I arrived safely at
headquarters on the 22d. Colonel Ashley
received
me with open arms. He applauded my
resolution to join the army, and bestowed his curses
liberally (as is his wont on whatever displeases him)
on the young men who linger at home, while the
gallant spirits of France and Poland are crossing
the ocean to volunteer in our cause. He rubbed
his hands exultingly when I told him that it was
your self-originating decision that I should leave
you. `The only son of your motherthat is, the
only one to speak of' (forgive him, Sam and Hal),
`and she a widow!' he exclaimed. `Let them talk
about their Spartan mothers, half men and
demimonsters
;
but look at our women-folks, as tender
and as timid of their broods as hens, and as bold
and self-sacrificing as martyrs! You come of a
good stock, my boy, and so I shall tell the gin'ral.
He's old Virginia, my lad; and looks well to blood
in man and horse.'
The next morning he called, his kind heart
raying out through his jolly face, to present me to
General Washington. If ever I go into battle,
which Heaven of its loving mercy grant, I pray
my heart may not thump as it did when I
approached
the mean little habitation, now the
residence
of our noble leader. `You tremble, Eliot,'
said my colonel, as we reached the door-step. `I
don't wonderI always feel my joints give a little
when I go before him. I venerate him next to
the Deity; but it is not easy to get used to him as
you do to other men.'
When we entered, the general was writing. If
Sam wishes to know whether my courage returned
when I was actually in his presence, tell him I
then forgot myselfforgot I had an impression to
make. The general requested us to be seated
while he finished his despatches. The copies were
before him, all in his own hand. `Every
t
crossed,
and every
i
dotted,' whispered the colonel, pointing
to the papers. `He's godlike in that; he finishes
off little things as completely as great.' I could
not but smile at the comparison, though it was
both striking and just. When the general had
finished, and had read the letters of introduction
from Governor Hancock and Mr. Adams, which I
presented, `You see, sir,' said my kind patron,
`that my young friend here is calculating to enter
the army; I'll answer for him, he'll prove good
and true; up to the mark, as his father Sam Lee
was before him. He, that is, Sam Lee, and I,
fit
side by side in the French war; I was no flincher,
you know, sir, and he was as brave as Julius Csar,
Sam was; so I think my friend Eliot here has a
pretty considerable claim.'
`But, my good sir,' said the general, `you
know we are contending against hereditary claims.'
`That's true, sir; and thank the Lord, he can
stand on his own ground; he shot one of the first
guns at Lexington, and got pretty well
peppered
too, though he was a lad then, with a face as smooth
as the palm of my hand.'
`Something too much of this,' thought I; and I
attempted to stop my trumpeter's mouth by saying
`I had no claims on the score of the affair at
Lexington
;
that my being there was accidental, and
I fought on instinct.'
`Ah, my boy,' said the colonel, determined to
tell his tale out, `you may say thatthere's no
courage like that that comes by
natur,
gin'ral; he
stood within two feet of me, as straight as a
tombstone
,
when a spent ball bounding near him, he
caught it in his hands just as if he'd been
playing
wicket, and said, you may throw down your
bat, my boys, I've caught you out!was not that
metal?'
General Washington's countenance relaxed as
the colonel proceeded (I ventured a side glance),
and at the conclusion he gave two or three
emphatic
and pleased nods; but his grave aspect
returned immediately, and he said, as I thought, in
a most frigid manner, `the request, Mr. Lee, of my
friends of Massachusetts, that you may receive
a commission in the service, deserves attention;
Colonel Ashley is a substantial voucher for your
personal merit. Are you aware, sir, that a post of
honour in our army involves arduous labour,
hardships
,
and self-denial? Do you know the actual
condition of our officersthat their pay is in
arrears
,
and their private resources exhausted? There
are among them men who have bravely served
their country from the beginning of this contest;
gentlemen who have not a change of linen; to
whom I have even been compelled to deny,
because
I had not the power to divert them from
their original destination, the coarse clothes
provided
for the soldiers. This is an affecting, but a
true view of our actual condition. Should the
Almighty prosper our cause, as, if we are true to
ourselves, he assuredly will, these matters will
improve
;
but I have no lure to hold out to you, no
encouragement but the sense of performing your
duty to your country. Perhaps, Mr. Lee, you
would prefer to reflect further, before you assume
new obligations?'
`Not a moment, sir. I came here determined
to serve my country at any post you should assign
me. If a command is given me, I shall be
grateful
VOL. I.F 11
for it: if not, I shall enter the ranks as a private
soldier.'
General Washington exchanged glances with
the colonel, that implied approbation of my
resolution
,
but not one syllable dropped of
encouragement
as to the commission; and it being evident that
he had no leisure to protract our audience, we took
our leave.
I confess I came away rather crest-fallen. I
am not such a puppy, my dear mother, as to
suppose
my single arm of much consequence to my
country, but I felt an agreeable, perhaps an
exaggerated
consciousness, that I deservednot
applause
,
but some token of encouragement.
However
,
the colonel said this was his way; `he
never
disappoints an expectation,seldom authorizes one.'
`Is he cold-hearted?' I asked.
`The Lord forgive you! Eliot,' he replied.
`Cold-hearted!No, his heat does not go off by
flashes, but keeps the furnace hot out of which the
pure gold comes. Lads never think there is any
fire unless they see the sparks and hear the roar.'
`But, sir,' said I, `I believe there is a very
common impression that General Washington is
of a reserved, cold temperament'
`The devil take common impressions. They
are made on sand, and are both false and fleeting.
Wait, Eliotyou are true metal, and I will venture
your impressions when you shall know our noble
commander better. Cold, egad,' he half muttered
to himself; `where the deuse, then, has the heat
come from that has cemented our army together,
and kept their spirits up when their fingers and
toes were freezing?'
Give me joy, my dear mother; a kiss, Bessie; a
good hug, my dear little sisters; and a huzza, boys!
General Washington has sent me a lieutenant's
commission, and a particularly kind note with it.
So, it appears, that while I was thinking him so
lukewarm to my application, he lost no time in
transmitting it to Congress, and enforcing it by his
recommendation. Our camp is all bustle.
Soldiers
,
just trained and fit for service, are departing,
their term of enlistment having expired. The
new quotas are coming in, raw, undisciplined
troops. The general preserves a calm, unaltered
mien; but his officers fret and fume in private, and
say that nothing effective will ever be achieved
while Congress permits these short enlistments.
Thanks to you, dear mother; my funds have
enabled me to purchase a uniform. I have just
tried it on. I wish you could all see me in it.
`Every woman is at heart a rake,' says Pope; that
every man is at heart a coxcomb, is just about as
F 2
true. My new dress will lose its holyday gloss
before we meet again, but the freshness of my
love for you will never be dimmed, my dear
mother
;
for Bessie, and for all the little band, whose
bright faces are even now before my swimming
eyes.
Yours devotedly,
Eliot Lee
.
P. S.My poor jack-o'-lantern, Kisel, is of
course of no use to me, neither does he give me much
trouble. He is a sort of mountebank among the
soldiers, merry himself and making others merry.
If he is a benefactor who makes two blades of
grass grow where but one grew before, Kisel
certainly
is, while he produces smiles where rugged
toil and want have stamped a scowl of discontent.
In this letter to his mother, Eliot enclosed one
to Bessie; reiterating even more forcibly and
tenderly
what he had before said. It served no
purpose
but to aggravate her self-reproaches.
CHAPTER IX.
Come not near our fairy queen.
Before
mid-winter, Linwood joined Eliot Lee
at West Point, and the young men renewed their
acquaintance on the footing of friends. There was
just that degree of similarity and difference
between
them that inspires mutual confidence and
begets
interest. Herbert, with characteristic
frankness
,
told the story of his love, disappointment and
all. Eliot felt a true sympathy for his friend, whose
deserts he thought would so well have harmonized
with Bessie's advantage and happiness; but this
feeling was subordinate to his keen anxiety for his
sister. This anxiety was not appeased by
intelligence
from home. Letters were rare blessings
in those daysscarcely to him blessings. His
mother wrote about every thing but Bessie, and his
sister's letters were brief and vague, and most
unsatisfactory
.
The winter, however, passed rapidly
away. Though in winter quarters, he had
incessant
occupation; and the exciting novelty of military
life, with the deep interest of the times, to an ardent
and patriotic spirit, kept every feeling on the strain.
Eliot had that intimate acquaintance with nature
that makes one look upon and love all its aspects,
11*
as upon the changing expressions of a friend's face;
and as that most interests us in its soul-fraught
seriousness, so he delighted even more in the wild
gleams of beauty that are shot over the winter
landscape, than in all its summer wealth. To eyes
like his, faithful ministers to the soul, the scenery
of West Point was a perpetual banquet.
Nature, in our spring-time, as we all know (
especially
in this blessed year of our Lord 1835), rises
as slowly and reluctantly from her long winter's
sleep as any other sluggard. On looking back to
our hero's spring at West Point, we find she must
have been at her work earlier than is her wont; for
April was not far gone when Eliot, after looking
in vain for Linwood to accompany him, sauntered
into the woods, where the buds were swelling and
the rills gushing. At first his pleasure was marred
by his friend not being with him, and he now for
the first time called to mind Linwood's frequent
and unexplained absences for the last few days.
Linwood was so essentially a social being, that
Eliot's curiosity was naturally excited by this
sudden
manifestation of a love of solitude and secrecy.
He however pursued his way; and having
reached the cascade which is now the resort of
holyday visiters, he forgot his friend. The soil
under his feet, released from the iron grasp of
winter, was soft and spongy, and the tokens of
spring were around him like the first mellow smile
of dawn. The rills that spring together like
laughing
children just out of school (we borrow the
obvious simile from a poetic child), and at their
junction form the cascade, were then filled to
the brim from their just unsealed fountains. Eliot
followed the streamlet where it pursues its
headlong
course, dancing, singing, and shouting, as it
flings itself over the rocks, as if it spurned their
cold and stern companionship, and was impatiently
running away from the leafless woods to a holyday
in a summer region. He forced his way through
the obstructions that impeded his descent, and was
standing on a jutting point which the stream again
divided, looking up at the snow-white and feathery
water, as he caught a glimpse of it here and there
through the intersecting branches of hemlocks,
and wondering why it was that he instinctively
infused his own nature into the outward world:
why the rocks seemed to him to look sternly on
the frolicking stream that capered over them, and
the fresh white blossoms of the early flowering
shrubs seemed to yearn with a kindred spirit
towards it, when his speculations were broken by
human voices mingling with the sound of the
waterfall
.
He looked in the direction whence they
came, and fancied he saw a white dress. It might
be the cascade, for that at a little distance did not
look unlike a white robe floating over the gray
rocks, but it might be a fair lady's gown, and that
was a sight rare enough to provoke the curiosity
of a young knight-errant. So Eliot, quickening
his footsteps, reached the point where the streamlet
ceases its din, and steals loiteringly through the
deep narrow glen, now called Washington's
Valley
.
He had pressed on unwittingly, for he was
now within a few yards of two persons on whom
he would not voluntarily have intruded. One was
a lady (a lady certainly, for a well-practised ear
can graduate the degree of refinement by a single
tone of the voice), the other party to the
tte--tte
was his truant friend Linwood. The lady was
seated with her back towards Eliot, in a grape-vine
that hung, a sylvan swing, from the trees; and
Linwood, his face also turned from Eliot, was
decking his companion's pretty hair with wood
anemones, and (ominous it was when Herbert
Linwood
made sentimental sallies) saying very soft
and pretty things of their starry eyes. Eliot was
making a quiet retreat, when, to his utter
consternation
,
a lady on his right, till then unseen
by him, addressed him, saying, she believed she
had the pleasure of speaking to Lieutenant Lee.
Eliot bowed; whereupon she added, that she was
sure, from Captain Linwood's description, that it
must be his friend. Captain Linwood is there
with my sister, you perceive, she continued; and
as he is our friend, and you are his, you will do us
the favour to go home and take tea with us.
By this time the
tte--tte
party, though
sufficiently
absorbed in each other, was aroused, and
both turning their head, perceived Eliot. The
lady said nothing; Linwood looked disconcerted,
and merely nodded without speaking to his friend.
The lady rose, and with a spirited step walked
towards
a farmhouse on the margin of the Hudson,
the only tenement of this secluded and most lovely
little glen. Linwood followed her, and seemed
earnestly
addressing her in a low voice. By this time
Eliot had sufficiently recovered his senses to
remember
that the farmhouse, which was visible
from West Point, had been pointed out to him as
the temporary residence of a Mr. Grenville Ruthven.
Mr. Ruthven was a native of Virginia, who some
years before had, in consequence of pecuniary
misfortunes
,
removed to New-York, where he had held
an office under the king till the commencement of
the war. His only son was in the English navy, and
the father was suspected of being at heart a
royalist
.
His political partialities, however, were not so
strong but that they might be deferred to prudence:
so he took her counsel, and retired with his wife
and two daughters to this safe nook on the
Hudson
,
till the troubles should be overpast.
Eliot could not be insensible to the friendly and
volunteered greeting of his pretty lady patroness,
and a social pleasure was never more inviting than
now when he was famishing for it; but it was so
manifest that his presence was any thing but
desirable
to Linwood and his companion, that he was
making his acknowledgments and turning away,
when the young lady, declaring she would not take
no for an answer, called out, Stop, Helen
pray, stopcome back, Captain Linwood, and
introduce
F 3
us regularly to your friend; he is so
ceremonious
that he will not go on with an acquaintance
that is not begun in due form.
Thus compelled, Miss Ruthven stopped and
submitted gracefully to an introduction, which
Linwood
was in fact at the moment urging, and she
peremptorily refusing.
Now, here we are, just at our own door, said
Miss Charlotte Ruthven to Eliot, and you must
positively come in and take tea with us. Eliot
still hesitated.
Why, in the name of wonder, should you not?
said Linwood, who appeared just coming to himself.
You must come with us, said Miss Ruthven,
for the first time speaking, and let me show your
friend how very magnanimous I can be.
Indeed, you must not refuse us, urged Miss
Charlotte.
I cannot, replied Eliot, gallantly, though it is
not very flattering to begin an acquaintance with
testing the magnanimity of your sister.
Helen Ruthven bowed, smiled, and coloured; and
at the first opportunity said to Linwood, your
friend is certainly the most civilized of all the
eastern savages I have yet seen, and, as
your
friend,
I will try to tolerate him. She soon, however,
seemed to forget his presence, and to forget every
thing else, in an absorbing and half-whispered
conversation
with Linwood, interrupted only by
singing
snatches of sentimental songs, accompanying
herself on the piano, and giving them the
expressive
application that eloquent eyes can give. In
the meanwhile Eliot was left to Miss Charlotte, a
commonplace, frank, and good-humoured person,
particularly well pleased at being relieved from the
rle
she had lately played, a cipher in a trio.
Mr. and Mrs. Ruthven made their appearance
with the tea-service. Mr. Ruthven, though verging
towards sixty, was still in the unimpaired vigour of
manhood, and was marked by the general
characteristics
,
physical and moral, of a Virginian: the
lofty stature, strong and well-built frame, the open
brow, and expression of nobleness and kindness of
disposition, and a certain something, not vanity, nor
pride, nor in the least approaching to
superciliousness
,
but a certain happy sense of the superiority,
not of the individual, but of the great mass of
which he is a component part.
His wife, unhappily, was not of this noble stock.
She was of French descent, and a native of one of
our cities. At sixteen, with but a modicum of
beauty, and coquetry enough for half her sex, she
succeeded, Mr. Ruthven being then a widower, in
making him commit the folly of marrying her, after
a six weeks' acquaintance. She was still in the
prime of life, and as impatient as a caged bird of
her country seclusion, or, as she called it,
imprisonment
,
where her daughters were losing every
opportunity
of achieving what she considered the chief
end of a woman's life.
Aware of her eldest daughter's propensity to
convert acquaintances into lovers, and looking
down upon all rebels as most unprofitable suiters,
she had sedulously guarded against any intercourse
with the officers at the Point.
Of late, she had begun to despair of a
favourable
change in their position; and Miss Ruthven
having accidentally renewed an old acquaintance
with Herbert Linwood, her mother encouraged his
visits from that admirable policy of maternal
man
uvrers,
which wisely keeps a
pis-aller
in reserve.
Helen Ruthven was one of those persons, most
uncomfortable
in domestic life, who profess always
to require an object (which means something out
of a woman's natural, safe, and quiet orbit) on
which to exhaust their engrossing and exacting
desires. Mr. Ruthven felt there was a very
sudden
change in his domestic atmosphere, and though
it was as incomprehensible to him as a change in
the weather, he enjoyed it without asking or caring
for an explanation. Always hospitably inclined, he
was charmed with Linwood's good-fellowship; and
while he discussed a favourite dish, obtained with
infinite trouble, or drained a bottle of Madeira with
him, he was as unobservant of his wife's tactics
and his daughters' coquetries as the eagle is of the
modus operandi
of the mole. And all the while,
and in his presence, Helen was lavishing her
flatteries
with infinite finesse and grace. Her words,
glances, tones of voice even, might have turned a
steadier head than Linwood's. Her father, good,
confiding man, was not suspicious, but vexed when
she called his companion away, just, as he said,
as they were beginning to enjoy themselves, to
scramble over frozen ground or look at a wintry
prospect! or to play over, for the fortieth time, a
trumpery song. Helen, however, would throw her
arms around her father's neck, kiss him into
good-humour
,
and carry her point; that is, secure the
undivided
attentions of Herbert Linwood. Matters
were at this point, after a fortnight's intercourse,
when Eliot entered upon the scene; and, though
his friend Miss Charlotte kept up an even flow of
talk, before the evening was over he had taken
some very accurate observations.
When they took their leave, and twice after they
had shut the outer door, Helen called Linwood
back for some last word that seemed to mean
nothing, and yet clearly meant that her heart went
with him: and then
So fondly she bade him adieu,
It seemed that she bade him return.
The young men had a long, dark, and at first
rather an unsocial walk. Both were thinking of
the same subject, and both were embarrassed by it.
Linwood, after whipping his boots for ten minutes,
said, Hang it, Eliot, we may as well speak out;
I suppose you think it deused queer that I said
nothing to you of my visits to the Ruthvens?
Why, yes, Linwoodto speak out frankly,
I do.
12
Well, it is, I confess it. At first my silence
was accidentalno, that is not plummet and line
truth; for from the first I had a sort of a fearno,
not fear, but a sheepish feeling, that you might
think the pleasure I took in visiting the Ruthvens
quite inconsistent with the misery I had seemed to
feel, and, by Heavens, did feel, to my heart's core,
about that affair at Westbrook.
No, Linwoodwhatever else I may doubt, I
never shall doubt your sincerity.
But my constancy you do? Eliot made no
reply, and Linwood proceeded: Upon my soul, I
have not the slightest idea of falling in love with
either of these girls, but I find it exceedingly
pleasant
to go there. To tell the truth, Eliot, I am
wretched without the society of womankind; Adam
was a good sensible fellow not to find even
Paradise
tolerable without them. I knew the
Ruthvens
in New-York: I believe they like me the
better, apostate as they consider me, for belonging
to a tory family; and looking upon me, as they must,
as a diseased branch from a sound root, they
certainly
are very kind to me, especially the old
gentleman
a
fine old fellow, is he not?
YesI liked him particularly.
And madame is piquant and agreeable, and
very polite to me; and the girls, of course, are
pleased to have their hermitage enlivened by an
old acquaintance.
Linwood's slender artifice in saying the girls,
when it was apparent that Miss Ruthven was the
magnet, operated like the subtlety of a child,
betraying
what he would fain conceal. Without
appearing
to perceive the truth, Eliot said, Miss
Ruthven seems to restrict her hospitality to
old
acquaintance. It was manifest that she did not
voluntarily extend it to me.
No, she did not. Helen Ruthven's heart is in
her hand, and she makes no secret of her
antipathy
to a rebel
per se
a rebel; however, her likes
and dislikes are both harmlessshe is only the
more attractive for them.
Herbert had not been the first to mention Helen
Ruthven; he seemed now well enough pleased to
dwell upon the subject. How did you like her
singing, Eliot? he asked.
Why, pretty well; she sings with expression.
Does she not? infinite!and then what an
accompaniment are those brilliant eyes of hers.
With their speechless messages, Linwood?
Linwood merely hemmed in reply, and Eliot added,
Do you like the expression of her mouth?
No, not entirelythere is a little spice of the
devil about her mouth; but when you are well
acquainted
with her you don't perceive it.
If you are undergoing a blinding process,
thought Eliot. When the friends arrived at their
quarters, and separated for the night, Linwood
asked and Eliot gave a promise to repeat his visit
the next evening to the glen.
CHAPTER X.
He is a good man.
Have you heard any imputation to the contrary?
From
this period Linwood was every day at the
glen, and Eliot as often as his very strict
performance
of his duties permitted. He was charmed
with the warm-hearted hospitality of Mr. Ruthven,
and not quite insensible to the evident partiality
of Miss Charlotte. She did not pass the vestibule
of his heart to the holy of holies, but in the
vestibule
(of even the best of hearts) vanity is apt to
lurk. If Eliot therefore was not insensible to the
favour of Miss Charlotte, an every-day character,
Linwood could not be expected to resist the
dazzling
influence of her potent sister. A more wary
youth might have been scorched in the focus of
her charms. Helen Ruthven was some three or
four years older than Linwood,a great advantage
when the subject to be practised on combines
simplicity
and credulity with inexperience. Without
being beautiful, by the help of grace and versatility,
and artful adaptation of the aids and artifices of the
toilet, Miss Ruthven produced the effect of beauty.
Never was there a more skilful manager of the
blandishments of her sex. She knew how to
infuse
into a glance thoughts that breathe,how
to play off those flatteries that create an
atmosphere
of perfume and beauty,how to make her
presence felt as the soul of life, and life in her
absence
a dreary day of nothingness. She had little
true sensibility or generosity (they go together); but
selecting a single object on which to lavish her
feeling, like a shallow stream compressed into a
narrow channel, it made great show and noise.
Eliot stood on disenchanted ground; and, while
looking on the real shape, was compelled to see
his credulous and impulsive friend becoming from
day to day more and more inthralled by the false
semblance. Is man's heart, he asked himself,
a mere surface, over which one shadow chaseth
another? No. But men's hearts have different
depths. In some, like Eliot Lee's (who was destined
to love once and for ever), love strikes a deep and
ineradicable root; interweaves itself with the very
fibres of life, and becomes a portion of the undying
soul.
In other circumstances Eliot would have obeyed
his impulses, and endeavoured to dissolve the spell
for his friend; but he was deterred by the
consciousness
of disappointment that his sister was so soon
superseded, and by his secret wish that Linwood
should remain free till a more auspicious day should
rectify all mischances. Happily, Providence
sometimes
interposes to do that for us which we neglect
to do for ourselves.
12*
As has been said, Linwood devoted every leisure
hour to Helen Ruthven. Sometimes accompanied
by Charlotte and Eliot, but oftener without them,
they visited the almost unattainable heights, the
springs and waterfalls, in the neighbourhood of
West Point, now so well known to summer
travellers
that we have no apology for lingering to
describe
them. They scaled the coal-black summits
of the Devil's Peak; went as far heavenward as
the highest height of the Crow's Nest; visited
Bull-Hill, Butter-Hill, and Break-neck,places
that must have been named long before our day of
classic, heathenish, picturesque, and most
ambitious
christening of this new world.
Helen Ruthven did not affect this scrambling
thorough bush, thorough brier, through streamlet,
snow, and mud, from a pure love of nature. Oh,
no, simple reader! but because at her home in the
glen there was but one parlourthere, from
morning
till bedtime, sat her fatherthere, of course,
must sit her mother; and Miss Ruthven's charms,
like those of other conjurers, depended for their
success on being exercised within a magic circle,
within which no observer might come. She seemed
to live and breathe alone for Herbert Linwood. A
hundred times he was on the point of offering the
devotion of his life to her, when the image of his
long-loved Bessie Lee rose before him, and, like
the timely intervention of the divinities of the
ancient
creed, saved him from impending danger.
This could not last much longer. On each
successive
occasion the image was less vivid, and must
soon cease to be effective.
Spring was advancing, and active military
operations
were about to commence. A British
sloop-of-war
had come up the river, and lay at anchor in
Haverstraw Bay. Simultaneously with the
appearance
of this vessel there was a manifest
change in the spirits of the family at the glena
fall in their mercury. Though they were still
kind, their reception of our friends ceased to be
cordial, and they were no longer urged, or even
asked, to repeat their visits. Charlotte, who, like
her father, was warm and true-hearted, ventured to
intimate that this change of manner did not
originate
in any diminution of friendliness; but, save
this, there was no approach to an explanation; and
Eliot ceased to pay visits that, it was obvious, were
no longer acceptable. The mystery, as he thought,
was explained, when they incidentally learned that
Captain Ruthven, the only son of their friend, was
an officer on board the vessel anchored in
Haverstraw
Bay. This solution did not satisfy Linwood.
How, in Heaven's name, he asked, should
that affect their intercourse with us? It might, to
be sure, agitate them; but, upon my word, I don't
believe they even know it; and, in the simplicity
of his heart, he forthwith set off to give them
information
of the fact. Mr. Ruthven told him, frankly
and at once, that he was already aware of it,and
Helen scrawled on a music-book which lay before
them, Do you remember Hamlet? `ten thousand
brothers!'  What she exactly meant was not
plain; but he guessed her intimation to be, that
ten thousand brothers and their love were not to be
weighed against him. Notwithstanding this kind
intimation, he saw her thenceforth unfrequently.
If he called, she was not at home; if she made an
appointment with him, she sent him some
plausible
excuse for not keeping it; and if they met,
she was silent and abstracted, and no longer kept
up a show of the passion that a few weeks before
had inspired her words, looks, and movements.
Herbert was not destined to be one of love's few
martyrs; and he was fast reverting to a sound
state, only retarded by the mystery in which
the affair was still involved. Since the
beginning
of his intercourse with the family, his
Sunday
evenings had been invariably spent at the
glen; and now he received a note from Miss
Ruthven
(not, as had been her wont, crossed and
double-crossed
),
containing two lines, saying her father
was ill, and as she was obliged to attend him, she
regretted to beg Mr. Linwood to omit his usual
Sunday evening visit! Linwood had a lurking
suspicionhe was just beginning to suspectthat
this was a mere pretext; and he resolved to go to
the glen, ostensibly to inquire after Mr. Ruthven,
but really to satisfy his doubts. It was early in
the evening when he reached there. The
cheerful
light that usually shot forth its welcome from
the parlour window was goneall was darkness.
I was a rascal to distrust her! thought Linwood,
and he hastened on, fearing good Mr. Ruthven
was extremely ill. As he approached the house
he perceived that, for the first time, the
window-shutters
were closed, and that a bright light
gleamed
through their crevices. He put his hand on
the latch of the door to open it, as was his
custom
,
without rapping; but no longer, as if
instinct
with the hospitality of the house, did it
yield to his touch. It was bolted! He
hesitated
for a moment whether to knock for
admittance
,
and endeavour to satisfy his curiosity, or to
return as wise as he came. His delicacy decided
on the latter course; and he was turning away,
when a sudden gust of wind blew open one of the
rickety blinds, and instinctively he looked through
the window, and for a moment was riveted by the
scene disclosed within. Mr. Ruthven sat at a table
on which were bottles of wine, olives, oranges, and
other most rare luxuries. Beside him sat a young
manhis younger self. Linwood did not need a
second glance to assure him this was Captain
Ruthven. On a stool at her brother's feet sat
Charlotte, her arm lovingly resting on his knee.
Mrs. Ruthven was at the other extremity of the
table, examining, with enraptured eye, caps,
feathers
,
and flowers, which, as appeared from the boxes
and cords beside her, had just been opened.
But the parties that fixed Linwood's attention
were Helen Ruthven and a very handsome young
man, who was leaning over her chair while she
was playing on the piano, and bestowing on him
those wondrous glances that Linwood had verily
believed never met an eye but his! What a
sudden
disenchantment was that! Linwood's blood
rushed to his head. He stood as if he were
transfixed
,
till a sudden movement within recalling him
to himself, he sprang from the steps and retraced
his way up the hill-side:the spell that had
wellnigh
bound him to Helen Ruthven was broken for
ever. No man likes to be duped,no man likes
to feel how much his own vanity has had to do
with preparing the trap that insnared him.
Linwood
,
after revolving the past, after looking back
upon the lures and deceptions that had been
practised
upon him, after comparing his passion for
Helen Ruthven with his sentiments for Bessie
Lee, came to the consoling conclusion that he had
never loved Miss Ruthven. He was rightand
that night, for the first time in many weeks, he
fell asleep thinking of Bessie Lee.
On the following morning Linwood confided to
Eliot the
denument
of his little romance. Eliot
was rejoiced that his friend's illusion should be
dispelled
in any mode. After some discussion of
the matter, they came to the natural conclusion
that a clandestine intercourse had been for some
time maintained by the family at the glen with
the strangers on board the sloop-of-war, and that
there were reasons for shaking Linwood and Eliot
off more serious than Linwood's flirtation having
been superseded by a fresher and more exciting
one.
In the course of the morning Eliot, in returning
from a ride, at a sudden turn in the road came
upon General Washington and Mr. Ruthven, who
had just met. Eliot was making his passing
salutation when General Washington said, Stop
a moment, Mr. Lee, we will ride in together.
While Eliot paused, he heard Mr. Ruthven say,
You will not disappoint me, general,
Wednesday
evening, and a quiet hournot with hat and
whip in hand, but time enough to drink a fair
bottle of `Helicon,' as poor Randolph used to
call itthere are but two left, and we shall ne'er
look upon its like again. Wednesday evening
remember. General Washington assented, and
the parties were separating, when Mr. Ruthven,
in his cordial manner, stretched out his hand to
Eliot, saying, My dear fellow, I should ask you
too; but the general and I are old friends, and I
want a little talk with him, by ourselves, of old
times. Besides, no man, minus forty, must have a
drop of my `Helicon;' but come down soon and
see the girls,they are Helicon enough for you
young fellows, hey?
As Mr. Ruthven rode away, There goes, said
General Washington, as true-hearted a man as
ever breathed. We were born on neighbouring
plantations. Our fathers and grandfathers were
friends. Our hearts were cemented in our youth,
or at least in my youth, for he is much my elder,
but his is a heart always fusible. Poor man, he
has had much ill-luck in life; but the worst, and
the worst, let me tell you, my young friend, that can
befall any man, was an ill-starred marriage. His
wife is the daughter of a good-for-nothing
Frenchman
;
bad blood, Mr. Lee. The children show
the crossI beg Miss Charlotte's pardon, she is a
nice girl, fair Virginia stock; but Miss Helen is
very like her mother. The son I do not know; but
his fighting against his country is
prim facie
evidence
against him.
The conversation then diverged to other topics.
There was in Eliot that union of good sense, keen
intelligence, manliness, and modesty, that excited
Washington's esteem, and drew him out; and Eliot
had the happiness, for a half hour, of hearing him
whom of all men he most honoured, talk freely, and
of assuring himself that this great man did not, as
was sometimes said of him,
A wilful stillness entertain,
With purpose to be dress'd in an opinion
Of wisdom;
but that his taciturnity was the result of profound
thought, anxiously employed on the most serious
subjects.
Late in the afternoon of the same day, Linwood
received a note from Helen Ruthven, enclosing one
to General Washington, of which, after entreating
him to deliver it immediately, she thus explained
the purport. It contains a simple request to your
mighty commander-in-chief, to permit me to visit
my brother on board his vessel. I know that
Washington's heart is as hard as Pharaoh's, and as
unrelenting as Brutus's; still it is not, it cannot be
in man to refuse such a request to the daughter of
an old friend. Do, dear, kind Linwood, urge it for
me, and win the everlasting gratitude of your
unworthy
but always devoted friend,
Helen
Ruthven
.
Urge
it! exclaimed Linwood, as he finished
the note, urge General Washington! I should as
soon think of urging the sun to go backward or
forward; but I'll present it for you, my `devoted
friend, Helen,' and in merely doing that my heart
will be in my mouth.
He obtained an audience. General
Washington
read the note, and turning to Linwood, asked
him if he knew its purport.
Yes, sir, replied Linwood, and I cannot,
he ventured to add, but hope you will find it
fitting to gratify a desire so natural.
Perfectly natural; Miss Ruthven tells me she
has not seen her brother for four years. Linwood
felt his honest blood rush to his face at this flat
falsehood from his friend Helen. Washington
perceived the suffusion and misinterpreted it.
VOL. I.G 13
You think it a hard case, Mr. Linwood; it is so,
but there are many hard cases in this unnatural
war. It grieves me to refuse Helen Ruthven
the child of my good friend. He passed his eye
again over the note, and there was an expression
of displeasure and contempt in his curling lip as he
read such expressions as the following: I cannot
be disappointed, for I am addressing one who
unites all virtues, whose mercy even surpasses his
justice.I write on my knees to him who is
the minister of Providence, dispensing good and
evil, light and blessing, with a word. General
Washington threw down the note, saying, Miss
Ruthven should remember that flattery corrupts
the giver as well as the receiver. I have no choice
in this matter. We have an inflexible rule
prohibiting
all intercourse with the enemy.
He then wrote a concise reply, which Linwood
sent to the lady in a blank envelope.
Ah! thought Helen Ruthven, as she opened
it, this would not have been blank three weeks
ago,
mais n'importe
. Mr. Herbert Linwood, you
may run free now; I have nobler prey in my toils.
She unsealed General Washington's note, and after
glancing her eye over it, she tore it into fragments
and dispersed it to the winds, exclaiming, I'll risk
my life to carry my point; and if I do, I'll humble
you, and have a glorious revenge!
She spent a sleepless night in contriving,
revolving
,
and dismissing plans on which, as she fancied,
the destiny of the nation hung, and, what was far
more important in her eyes, Helen Ruthven's
destiny. She at last adopted the boldest that had
occurred, and which, from being the boldest, best
suited her dauntless temper.
The next morning, Tuesday, with her mother's
aid and applause, she effected her preparations; and
having fortunately learned, during her residence on
the river, to row and manage a boat, she embarked
alone in a little skiff, and stealing out of a nook near
the glen, she rowed into the current and dropped
down the river. She did not expect to escape
observation
,
for though the encampment did not command
a view of the Hudson, there were sentinels posted
at points that overlooked it, and batteries that
commanded
its passage. But rightly calculating on
the general humanity that governed our people, she
had no apprehensions they would fire on a
defenceless
woman, and very little fear that they would
think it worth while to pursue her, to prevent that
which she dared to do before their eyes and in the
face of day.
Her calculations proved just. The sentinels
levelled their guns at her, in token not to proceed;
and she in return dropped her head, raised her
hands deprecatingly, and passed on unmolested.
At a short distance below the Point there is a
remarkable spot, scooped out by nature in the
rocky bank, always beautiful, and now a
consecrated
shrinea Mecca of the mind. On the
G 2
memorable morning of Miss Ruthven's enterprise,
the welcome beams of the spring sun, as he rose
in the heavens, casting behind him a soft veil of
light clouds, shone on the gray rocks, freshening
herbage, and still disrobed trees of this lovely recess.
From crevices in the perpendicular rocks that wall
up the table-land above, hung a sylvan canopy;
cedars, studded with their blue berries, wild
raspberries
,
and wild rose-bushes; and each moist and
sunny nook was gemmed with violets and wild
geraniums. The harmonies of nature's orchestra
were the only and the fitting sounds in this seclusion:
the early wooing of the birds; the water from
the fountains of the heights, that, filtering through
the rocks, dropped from ledge to ledge with the
regularity of a water-clock; the ripple of the waves
as they broke on the rocky points of the shore, or
softly kissed its pebbly margin; and the voice of the
tiny stream, that, gliding down a dark, deep, and
almost
hidden channel in the rocks, disappeared, and
welled up again in the centre of the turfy slope,
stole over it, and trickled down the lower ledge of
granite to the river. Tradition has named this
little green shelf on the rocks Kosciusko's
Garden
;
but as no traces have been discovered of
any other than nature's plantings, it was probably
merely his favourite retreat, and as such is a
monument
of his taste and love of nature.
The spring is now enclosed in a marble basin,
and inscribed with his name who then lay extended
beside it: Kosciusko, the patriot of his own country,
the friend of ours, the philanthropist of all, the
enemy only of those aliens from the human family
who are the tyrants of their kind. An unopen
book lay beside him, while, gazing up through the
willows that drooped over the fountain, he
perused
that surpassing book of nature, informed by
the spirit and written by the finger of Goda
Book of revelations of his wisdom, and power,
and goodness.
Suddenly his musings were disturbed by
approaching
footsteps; and looking up, he saw
Linwood
and Eliot winding down the steep
pathway
between the piled rocks. He had scarcely
exchanged salutations with them, when the little
boat in which Helen Ruthven was embarked shot
out from behind the dark ledge that bounded their
upward view of the river. They sprang forward
to the very edge of the sloping ground. Helen
Ruthven would most gladly have escaped their
observation, but that she perceived was impossible;
and making the very best of her dilemma, she
tossed her head exultingly, and waved her
handkerchief
.
The young men instinctively returned
her greeting. A gallant creature, by Heaven!
exclaimed the Pole; God speed you, my girl!
And when Linwood told him who she was, and her
enterprise, so far as he thought fit to disclose it,
13*
he reiterated, Again then, I say, God speed her!
The sweetest affections of nature should be free
as this gushing rill, that the rocks and the earth can't
keep back; I am glad when they throw off the
shackles imposed by the cruel but inevitable laws
of war. They continued to gaze after the boat
till it turned and disappeared with the river in its
winding passage through the mountains.
On Wednesday morning it appeared that the
sloop-of-war had changed her position, and
approached
as nearly to West Point as was possible
without coming within the range of its guns. I
am convinced, said Linwood to Eliot, taking up
the thread of conversation where they had dropped
it the day before, I am convinced there is a
plot brewing.
I am apprehensive of it too. Our obvious
duty, Linwood, is to go to General Washington, and
tell him all we know of the Ruthvens.
My service to you!no, he is the wariest of
human beings, and has grounds enough for
suspicion
without our prompting. Can't he put this
and that togetherthe old man's pressing
invitation
,
Helen's flight, and the movement of the
vessel?
Ah, if his suspicions were excited, as ours are,
by previous circumstances, these would suffice;
but he has entire confidence in his old friend; he
is uninformed of the strong tory predilections of
the whole family; and, though he does not like
Helen Ruthven, he has no conception of what we
have tolerable proof, that she has the talents of
a regular bred French intriguer. Besides, as
the fact of your having seen those men at the
glen proves the practicability of their visiting it
again, the general should certainly be apprized
of it.`'
No, Eliot, I'll not consent to itthis is my
game, and I must control it. It is a violation of
the Arab bread-and-salt rule, to communicate that
which was obtained by our friendly intimacy at the
glen.
I think you are wrong, Linwood; it is a case
where an inferior obligation should yield to a
superior
one.
I don't comprehend your metaphysical
reasoning
,
Eliot; I govern myself by the obligations I
feel.
By the dictates of your conscience, my dear
fellow? so do I; therefore I shall go immediately
to the general, with or without you.
Not with meno, I'll not tell him what I know,
that's flat; and as to being questioned and
cross-questioned
by him, heavens and earth! when he but
bends his awful brow upon me, I feel as if my
heart were turning inside out. No, I'll not go
near him. Why can't we write an anonymous
letter?
I do not like anonymous lettersmy course
appears plain to me, so good morning to you.
One moment, Eliotremember, not a word of
what I saw through the window at the glen.
Certainly not, if you insist. Eliot then went
to the general's markee, and was told he would see
him in two hours. Eliot returned at the precise
moment, and was admitted. You are punctual,
Mr. Lee, said the commander, and I thank you
for it. A young man should be as exact in
military
life as the play requires the lover to be! `he
should not break a part of the thousandth part of
a minute.' Your business, sir?
Eliot was beginning to disclose it, when they
were interrupted by a servant, who handed General
Washington a note. A single involuntary glance
at the superscription assured Eliot it was from
Linwood. General Washington opened it, and
looked first for the signature, as one naturally does
at receiving a letter in an unknown hand.
Anonymous
!
he said; and refolding without reading a
word of it, he lighted it in a candle, still burning
on the desk where he had been sealing letters, and
suffered it to consume; saying, This is the way
I now serve all anonymous letters, Mr. Lee. Men
in public life are liable to receive many such
communications
,
and to have their minds disturbed, and
sometimes poisoned, by them. They are the resort
of the cowardly or the malignant. An honest man
will sustain by his name what he thinks proper to
communicate.
There is no rule of universal application to the
versatile mind of man, thought Eliot, and his heart
burned to justify his friend; when the general
reminding
him they had no time to lose, he
proceeded
concisely to state his apprehensions and their
grounds. Washington listened to him without
interruption
,
but not without an appaling change of
countenance. I have heard you through, Mr.
Lee, he said; your apprehensions are perhaps
natural; at any rate, I thank you for frankly
communicating
them to me; but, be assured, your
suspicions
have no foundation. Do you think such
vile treachery could be plotted by a Virginian, my
neighbour, my friend of thirty years, my father's
friend, when all the grievous trials of this war
have not produced a single traitor? No, no, Mr.
Lee, I would venture my lifemy country, on the
cast of Ruthven's integrity. If I do not lightly
give my confidence, I do not lightly withdraw it;
and once withdrawn it is never restored.
Eliot left Washington's presence, half
convinced
himself that his suspicions were
unfounded
.
It never occurred to Washington or to Eliot
that there might be a conspiracy without Mr.
Ruthven being a party to it, and the supposition
that he was so invalidated all the evidences of a
plot.
In the afternoon Kisel asked leave to avail
himself
of a permit which Eliot had obtained for him,
to go on the opposite side of the river to a little
brook, whence he had often brought a mess of
G 3
trout for the officers' table; for our friend Kisel
was skilled in the craft of angling, and might have
served Cruikshank for an illustration of Johnson's
definition of the word, a fishing-rod, with a bait at
one end and a fool at the other; but happily, as it
proved, our fool had some subtlety in his
simplicity
.
Eliot gave him the permission, with
directions to row up to the glen when he returned,
and await him there.
Eliot determined to go to the glen, and station
himself on the margin of the river, where, in case
(a chance that seemed to him at least possible) of
the approach of an enemy's boat, he should descry
it in time to give Washington warning. He went
in search of Linwood, to ask him to accompany
him; but Linwood was nowhere to be found. He
deliberated whether to communicate his
apprehensions
to some other officer. The confidence the
general had manifested had nearly dissipated his
apprehensions, and he feared to do what might
appear
like officiousness, or like a distrust of
Washington's
prudence; that virtue, which, to remain, as
it then was, the bulwark of his country's safety,
must continue unsuspected.
Eliot in his anxiety had reached the glen while
it was yet daylight; and, careful to escape
observation
,
he stole along the little strip of pebbly beach
where a mimic bay sets in, and seated himself on
a pile of rocks, the extreme point of a hill that
descends abruptly to the Hudson. Here the river,
hemmed in by the curvatures of the mountains,
has the appearance of a lake; for the passage is so
narrow and winding through which it forces its
way, that the eye scarcely detects it. Eliot for a
while forgot the tediousness of his watch in
looking
around him. The mountains at the entrance
of the Hudson into the highlands, which stand
like giant sentinels jealously guarding the narrow
portal, appeared, whence he saw them, like a
magnificent framework to a beautiful picture. An
April shower had just passed over, and the mist
was rolling away like the soft folds of a
curtain
from the village of Newburgh, which looked
like the abode of all country contentments, as
the setting sun shone cheerily on its gentle slopes
and white houses, contrasting it with the stern
features
of the mountains. Far in the distance, the
Catskills, belted by clouds, appeared as if their
blue heads were suspended in the atmosphere and
mingling with the sky, from which an eye
familiar
with their beautiful outline could alone
distinguish
them. But the foreground of his picture
was most interesting to Eliot; and as his eye
again fell on the little glen sleeping in the
silvery
arms of the rills between which it lies
can this place, he thought, so steeped in
nature's
loveliness, so enshrined in her temple, be
the abode of treachery! It has been of
heartlessness
,
coquetry, duplicityah, there is no power
in nature, in the outward world, to convert the
badblessings it has; blessings manifold, for the
good.
The spirit of man, alone in nature's solitudes, is
an instrument which she manages at will; and Eliot,
in his deepening seriousness and anxiety, felt
himself
answering to her changing aspect. The young
foliage of the well-wooded little knoll that rises
over the glen had looked fresh and feathery, and
as bright as an infant awaking to happy
consciousness
;
but as the sun withdrew its beams, it
appeared
as dreary as if it had parted from a smiling
friend. And when the last gleams of day had
stolen up the side of the Crow's Nest, shot over the
summit of Break-neck, flushed the clouds and
disappeared
,
and the wavy lines and natural terraces
beyond Cold Spring, and the mass of rocks and
pines of Constitution Island. were wrapped in
sadcoloured
uniform, Eliot shrunk from the influence
of the general desolateness, and became impatient
of his voluntary watch.
One after another the kindly-beaming
homelights
shot forth from hill and valley, and Eliot's
eye catching that which flashed from Mr.
Ruthven's
window, he determined on a reconnoitre; and
passing in front of the house he saw Washington
and his host seated at a table, served with wine
and nuts, but none of those tropical luxuries
that had been manifestly brought to the glen
by the stranger-guests from the sloop-of-war.
Eliot's heart gladdened at seeing the friends
enjoying
one of those smooth and delicious passages
that sometimes vary the ruggedest path of life.
That expression of repelling and immoveable
gravity
,
that look of tension (with him the bow was
always
strained) that characterized Washington's
face, had vanished like a cloud; and it now
serenely
reflected the social affections (bright and
gentle spirits!) that, for the time, mastered his
perplexing
cares. He was retracing the period of his
boyhood; a period, however, cloudy in its passage,
always bright when surveyed over the shoulder.
He recalled his first field-sports, in which Ruthven
had been his companion and teacher; and they
laughingly reviewed many an accident by flood
and field. No wonder, thought Eliot, as in
passing
he glanced at Ruthven's honest, jocund face;
no wonder Washington would not distrust him!
Eliot returned to his post. The stars had come
out, and looked down coldly and dimly through a
hazy atmosphere. The night was becoming
obscure
.
A mist was rising; and shortly after a
heavy fog covered the surface of the river. Eliot
wondered that Kisel had not made his appearance;
for, desultory as the fellow was, he was as true to
his master as the magnet to the pole. Darkness
is a wonderful magnifier of apprehended danger;
and, as it deepened, Eliot felt as if enemies were
approaching from every quarter. Listening
intently
,
he heard a distant sound of oars. He was
all ear. Thank Heaven! he exclaimed, it is
14
Kisela single pair of oars, and his plashy
irregular
dip! In a few moments he was discernible;
and nearing the shore, he jumped upon the rock
where Eliot stood, crying out exultingly, I've
dodged 'em, hey!
Softly, Kisel; who have you dodged?
Them red birds in their borrowed feathers.
Cheat me? No. Can't I tell them that chops,
and reaps, and mows, and thrashes, from them that
only handles a sword or a gun, let 'em put on what
ev'yday clothes they will?
Tell me, Kisel, plainly and quickly, what you
mean.
A command from Eliot, uttered in a tone of even
slight displeasure, had a marvellous effect in
steadying
Kisel's wits; and he answered with tolerable
clearness and precision:I was cutting 'cross lots
before sunset with a mess of trout, long as my
armshiners! when I stumbled on a bunch of
fellows squatted 'mong high bushes. They held
me by the leg, and said they'd come down with
provisions for Square Ruthven's folks; and they
had not got a pass, and so must wait for nightfall;
and they'd have me stay and guide 'em across, for
they knew they might ground at low water if they
did not get the right track. I mistrusted 'em. I
knew by their tongues they came from below; and
so I cried, and told 'em I should get a whipping
if I didn't get home afore sundown; and one of
'em held a pistol to my head, loaded, primed, and
cocked, and told me he'd shoot my brains out if
I didn't do as he bid me. `Lo'd o' massy!' says I,
`don't shoot'twon't do any good, for I hant got no
brains, hey!'
Never mind what you said or they said; what
did you do?
I didn't do nothing. They held me fast till
night; and then they pushed their boat out of a
kind o' hiding-place, and come alongside mine,
and put me into it, and told me to pilot 'em. You
know that sandy strip a bit off t'other shore? I
knew my boat would swim over it like a cob,and
I guessed they'd swamp, and they did; diddle me
if they didn't!
Are they there now?
There! not if they've the wit of sucking
turkeys
.
The river there is not deep enough to drown
a dead dog, and they might jump in and pull the
boat out.
A slight westerly breeze was now rising,
which lifted and wafted the fog so that half the
width of the river was suddenly unveiled, and
Eliot descried a boat making towards the glen.
By Heaven! there they are! he exclaimed;
follow me, Kisel; and without entering the
house, he ran to the stable close by. Fortunately,
often having had occasion, during his visits at the
glen, to bestow his own horse, he was familiar
with the whereabouts; and in one instant
General
Washington's charger was bridled and at the
door, held by Kisel; while Eliot rushed into the
house, and in ten words communicated the danger
and the means of escape. General Washington
said not a word till, as he sprang on the horse,
Ruthven, on whose astounded mind the truth
dawned, exclaimed, I am innocent. He replied,
I believe you.
Washington immediately galloped up the steep
imbowered road to the Point. Eliot hesitated for
a moment, doubting whether to attempt a retreat
or remain where he was, when Mr. Ruthven
grasped his arm, exclaiming, Stay, for God's
sake, Mr. Lee; stay, and witness to my innocence.
The imploring agony with which he spoke would
have persuaded a more inflexible person than Eliot
Lee. In truth, there was little use in attempting
to fly, for the footsteps of the party were already
heard approaching the house. They entered, five
armed men, and were laying their hands on Eliot,
when Mr. Ruthven's frantic gestures, and his
shouts of He's safehe's safehe's escaped
ye! revealed to them the truth; and they
perceived
what in their impetuosity they had over
looked, that they held an unknown young man in
their grasp instead of the priceless Washington!
Deep were the oaths they swore as they dispersed
to search the premises, all excepting one young
man, whose arm Mr. Ruthven had grasped, and to
whom he said, Harry, you've ruined meyou've
made me a traitor in the eyes of Washingtonthe
basest traitor! He said, God bless him! that he
believed me innocent; but he will not when he
reflects that it was I who invited himwho pressed
him to come here this eveningthe conspiracy
seems evidentundeniable! Oh, Harry, Harry,
you and your mad sister have ruined me!
The young man seemed deeply affected by his
father's emotion. He attempted to justify himself
on the plea that he dared not set his filial feeling
against the importance of ending the war by a
single
stroke; but this plea neither convinced nor
consoled his father. Young Ruthven's associates
soon returned, having abandoned their search, and
announced the necessity of their immediate return
to the boat. You must go with us, sir, said
Ruthven to his father; for, blameless as you are,
you will be treated by the rebels as guilty of
treason.
By Heaven, Harry, I'll not go. I had rather
die a thousand deathson the gallows, if I must
I'll not budge a foot.
He must gothere is no alternativeyou
must aid me, said young Ruthven to his
companions
.
They advanced to seize his father. Off
off! he cried, struggling against them. I'll not
go a living man.
Eliot interposed; and addressing himself to
young Ruthven, said, Believe me, sir, you are
mistaking your duty. Your father's good name
must be dearer to you than his life; and his good
14*
name is blasted for ever if in these
circumstances
he leaves here. But his life is in no danger
none whateverhe is in the hands of his friend,
and that friend the most generous, as well as just, of
all human beings. You misunderstand the temper of
General Washington, if you think he would
believe
your father guilty of the vilest treachery
without
damning proof. Young Ruthven was more
than half convinced by Eliot, and his companions
had by this time become impatient of delay. Their
spirit had gone with the hope that inspired their
enterprise, and they were now only anxious to
secure a retreat to their vessel. They had some
little debate among themselves whether they should
make Eliot prisoner; but, on young Ruthven's
suggestion that Lieutenant Lee's testimony might
be important to his father, they consented to leave
himone of them expressing in a whisper the
prevailing sentiment, We should feel sheepish
enough to gain but a paltry knight when we
expected
a checkmate by our move.
In a few moments more they were off; but not
till young Ruthven had vainly tried to get a kind
parting word from his father. No, Harry, he
said, I'll not forgive youI can't; you've put
my honour in jeopardyno, never; and as his
son turned sorrowfully away, he added, Never,
Hal, till this cursed war is at an end.
Early next morning Eliot Lee requested an
audience of Washington, and was immediately
admitted, and most cordially received. Think
God, my dear young friend, he said, you are
safe, and here. I sent repeatedly to your lodgings
last night, and hearing nothing, I have been
exceedingly
anxious. Satisfy me on one point, and
then tell me what happened after my forced
retreat
.
I trust in Heaven this affair is not bruited.
Eliot assured him he had not spoken of it to a
human beingnot even to Linwood; and that he
had enjoined strict secrecy on Kisel, on whose
obedience he could rely.
Thank youthank you, Mr. Lee, said
Washington
,
with a warmth startling from him, I should
have expected this from youthe generous
devotion
of youth, and the coolness and prudence of
ripe agea rare union.
Such words from him who
never
flattered and
rarely praised, might well, as they did, make the
blood gush from the heart to the cheeks. I am
most grateful for this approbation, sir, said Eliot.
Grateful! Would to Heaven I had some
return
to make for the immense favour you have done
me, beside words; but the importance of keeping
the affair secret precludes all other return. I think
it will not transpire from the enemy,they are
not like to publish a baffled enterprise. I am
most particularly pleased that you went alone to
the glen. In this instance I almost agree with
Cardinal de Retz, who says, `he held men in
greater esteem for what they forbore to do than
for what they did.' I now see where I erred
yesterday. It did not occur to me that there could
be a plot without my friend being accessory to it.
I did not err in trusting him. This war has cost
me dear; but, thank Heaven, it has not shaken,
but fortified, my confidence in human virtue!
Washington then proceeded to inquire into the
occurrences
at the glen after he left there, and ended
with giving Eliot a note to deliver to Mr. Ruthven,
which proved a healing balm to the good man's
wounds.
Our revolutionary contest, by placing men in
new relations, often exhibited in new force and
beauty the ties that bind together the human family.
Sometimes, it is true, they were lightly snapped
asunder, but oftener they manifested an
all-resisting
force, and a union that, as in some chymical
combinations, no test could dissolve.
CHAPTER XI.
Our will we can command. The effects of our actions we
cannot foresee.
Montaigne
.
Herbert Linwood to his Sister.
July
30
th,
1779.
Dearest Belle,
I write under the inspiration
of the agreeable consciousness that my letter may
pass under the sublime eye of your
commander-in-chief
,
or be scanned and sifted by his underlings.
I wish to Heaven that, without endangering your
bright orbs, I could infuse some retributive virtue
into my ink to strike them blind. But the deuse
take them. I defy their oversight. I am not
discreet
enough to be trusted with military or
political
secrets, and therefore, like Hotspur's Kate, I
can betray none. As to my own private affairs,
though I do not flatter myself I have attained a
moral eminence which I may challenge the world
to survey, yet I'll expose nothing to you, dear Belle,
whose opinion I care more for than that of king,
lords, and commons, which the whole world may
not know without your loving brother being
dishonoured
thereby: so, on in my usual `streak o'
lightning style,' with facts and feelings.
You have before this seen the official account
of our successful attack on Stony Point, and have
doubtless been favoured with the additional light
of Rivington's comments, your veritable editor.
These thralls of party editors! The light they emit
is like that of conjurers, intended to produce false
impressions.
Do not imagine I am going to send you a regular
report of the battle. With all due deference to
your superior mental faculties, my dear, you are
but a woman, and these concernments of `vile
guns' must for ever remain mysteries to you. But,
Belle, I'll give you the romance of the affair`thy
vocation, Hal.'
My friend Eliot Lee has a vein of quixotism,
that reminds me of the inflammable gas I have seen
issuing from a cool healthy spring. Doctor Kissam,
you know, used to say every man had his insanity.
Eliot's appears in his affection for a half-witted
follower, one Kisel; the oddest fellow in this world.
His life is a series of consecutive accidents, of good
and bad
luck
.
On the 10th he had been out on the other side
of the river,
vagrantizing
in his usual fashion, and
returning late to his little boat, and, as we suspect,
having fallen asleep, he drifted ashore at Stony
Point. There he came upon the fort, and a string
of trout (which he is seldom without) serving him
as a passport, he was admitted within the walls,
His simplicity, unique and inimitable, shielded him
from suspicion, and a certain inspiration which
seems always to come direct from Heaven at the
moment of his necessity, saved him from betraying
the fact that he belonged to our army, and he was
suffered to depart in peace. The observations he
made (he is often acute) were of course
communicated
to his master, and by him made available to our
enterprise. Eliot and myself were among the
volunteers
.
He, profiting by Kisel's hints, guided us
safely through some `sloughs of despond.' With
all his skill, we had a killing scramble over
pathless
mountains, and through treacherous swamps,
under a burning sun, the mercury ranging
somewhere
between one and two hundred, so that my
sal volatile blood seemed to have exhaled in vapour,
and my poor body to be a burning coal, whose next
state would be ashes.
Our General Wayne (you will understand his
temper from his
nom de guerre,
`mad Anthony')
had ordered us to advance with unloaded muskets
and fixed bayonets. He was above all things
anxious to avoid an accidental discharge, which
might alarm the garrison. At eight in the evening
we were within a mile and a half of the fort, and
there the detachment halted; while Wayne, with
Eliot and some other officers, went to reconnoitre.
They had approached within gunshot of the works,
when poor Kisel, who away from Eliot is like an
unweaned child, and who had been all day
wandering
in search of him, suddenly emerged from the
wood, and in a paroxysm of joy discharged his
musket. Wayne sprang forward, and would have
transfixed him with his bayonet, had not Eliot
thrown himself before Kisel, and turned aside
Wayne's arm: some angry words followed, but it
ended in the general leaving Kisel to be managed
by Eliot's discretion. The general's displeasure,
however, against Eliot, did not subside at once.
When the moment for attack came, I felt
myself
shivering, not with fear, no, `
franchement
' (as
our old teacher Dubois used to say on the few
occasions when he meant to tell the truth),
franchement
,
not with fear, but with the recollection of my
father's last words to me. The uncertain chances
of a fierce contest were before me, and my father's
curse
rung in my ears like the voices that
turned
the poor wretches in the Arabian tale into
stone. Once in the fight, it was forgotten; all men
are bulldogs then, and think of nothing past or to
come.
They opened a tremendous fire upon us; it was
the dead of night, Belle, and rather a solemn time,
I assure you. Our commander was wounded by
a musket ball: he fell, and instantly rising on one
knee, he cried, `Forward, my brave boys,
forward
.'
The gallant shout gave us a new impulse;
and we rushed forward, while Eliot Lee, with that
singular blending of cool courage and generosity
which marks him, paused and assisted the general's
aid in bearing him on, in compliance with the wish
he had expressed (believing himself mortally
wounded), that he might die in the fort. Thank
God, he survived; and being as magnanimous as he
is brave, he reported to the commander-in-chief
Eliot's gallantry and good conduct throughout the
whole affair, and particularly dwelt on the aid he
had given him, after having received from him
injurious
epithets. In consequence of all this, Eliot
is advanced to the rank of captain. Luck is a
lord, Belle; I would fain have distinguished myself,
but I merely, like the rest, performed my part
honourably, for which I received the thanks of
General Washington, and got my name blazoned
in the report to Congress.
I hear that Helen Ruthven is dashing away in
New-York, not, as I expected, after her romantic
departure hence, as the honourable Mrs. O.
Well! all kind vestals guard her! Heaven knows
she needs their vigilance. Rumour says, too, that
you are shortly to vow allegiance to my royalist
friend. God bless you! my dear sister. If it
were true (alas! nothing is more false) that matches
are made in Heaven, I know
who
would be your
liege-lord. Another match there was, that in my
boyhoodmy boyhood! my youth, my maturity,
I believed Heaven had surely made. It is a musty
proverb, that. Farewell, Belle; kiss my dear
mother
for me, and tell her I would not have her, like
the old Scotch woman, pray for our side, `right or
wrong,' but let her pray for the right side, and then
VOL. I.H 15
her poor son will be sure to prosper. Oh, would
that I could, without violating my duty to my
country
,
throw myself at my father's feet. His loyalty
is not truer to King George, than mine to him.
Dearest Belle, may Heaven reunite us all.
Yours,
H.
Linwood
.
P. S.Kind love, don't forge it, to Rose.
A day or two after Herbert's letter was
despatched
,
Eliot received a summons from Washington;
and on his appearing before him, the general said,
I have important business to be transacted in
New-York, Captain Lee. I have despatches to
transmit to Sir Henry Clinton. My agent must be
intrusted with discretionary powers. An
expedition
to New-York, even with the protection of a
flag of truce, is hazardous. The intervening
country
is infested with outlaws, who respect no
civilized
usages. My emissary must be both intrepid
and prudent. I have therefore selected you. Will
you accept the mission?
Most gratefully, sirbut
But what? if you have scruples, name them.
None in the world, sir; on my own account I
should be most happy, but I should be still happier
if the office might be assigned to Linwood. It
would afford him the opportunity he pines for, of
seeing his family.
That is a reason, if there were no other, why
Captain Linwood should not go. Some
embarrassment
might arise. Your friend has not the
coolness essential in exigencies.
Eliot well knew that Washington was not a man
with whom to bandy arguments, and he at once
declared himself ready to discharge, to the best of
his ability, whatever duty should be imposed on
him; and it was settled that he should depart as
soon as his instructions could be made out.
Eliot soon after met Linwood, and
communicated
his intended expedition. You are always
under a lucky star, said Linwood; I would have
given all I am worth for this appointment.
And you certainly should have it if it were
mine to bestow.
I do not doubt it, not in the least; but is it not
hard? Eliot, I am such a light-hearted wretch, for
the most part, that you really have no conception
how miserable my father's displeasure makes me.
I don't understand how it is. The laws of Heaven
are harmonious, and certainly my conscience acquits
me, yet I suffer most cruelly for my breach of filial
obedience. If I could but see my father, eye to
eye, I am sure I could persuade him to recall that
curse, that rings in my ears even now like a
death-knell
.
Oh, one half hour in New-York would be
my salvation! The sight of Belle and my mother
would be heaven to me! Don't laugh at me, Eliot,
he continued, wiping his eyes, I am a calf when
I think of them all.
Laugh at you, Linwood! I could cry with
H 2
joy if I could give my place to you; as it is, I must
hasten my preparations. I have obtained leave to
take Kisel with me.
Kisel! heaven forefend, Eliot. Do you know
what ridicule such a valet-de-place as Kisel will
call down on your head from those lordly British
officers?
Yes, I have thought of that, and it would be
sheer affectation to pretend to be indifferent to it;
but I can bear it. Providence has cast Kisel upon
my protection, and if I leave him he will be sure
to run his witless head into some scrape that will
give me ten times more trouble than his
attendance
.
Well, as you please; you gentle people are
always wilful. After a few moments' thoughtful
silence, he added, How long before you start,
Eliot?
The general said it might be two hours before
my instructions and passports were made out.
It will be dark then, and, added Linwood,
after a keen survey of the heavens, I think, very
dark.
Like enough; but that is not so very agreeable
a prospect as one would infer from the tone of your
voice.
Pardon me, my dear fellow; it was New-York
I was thinking of, and not any inconvenience you
might encounter from the obscurity of the night
Your passports are not made out?
Not yet.
Do me a favour, thenlet Kisel ride my gray.
I cannot endure the thought of the harlequin
spectacle you'll furnish forth, riding down the
Broadway with your squire mounted on Beauty;
besides, the animal is not equal to the expedition.
Thank you, Linwood. I accept your kindness
as freely as you offer it. You have relieved me
of my only serious embarrassment. Now get
your letters ready; any thing unsealed (my orders
are restricted to that) I will take charge of, and
deliver at your father's door.
My father's door! exclaimed Linwood,
snapping
his fingers with a sort of wild exultation that
made Eliot stare, oh, what a host of images those
words call up! but as to the letters, there is no
pleasure in unsealed ones; I sent a bulletin of my
health to Belle yesterday; I have an engagement
that will occupy me till after your departure; so
farewell, and good luck to you, Eliot. The friends
shook hands and parted.
The twilight was fading into night when Eliot
was ready for his departure. To his great
vexation
Kisel was missing; and he was told he had
ridden forward, and had left word that he would
await his master at a certain point about three
miles on their way. The poor fellow's habits
were so desultory that they never excited surprise,
though they would have been intolerable to one
less kind-tempered than Eliot Lee. He found him
15*
at the point named. He had reined his horse up
against the fence, and was awaiting his master, as
Eliot saw, for he could just descry the outline of
his person lying back to back to the horse, his legs
encircling the animal's neck.
Sit up, Kisel, said his master, in an irritated
tone; remember you are riding a gentleman's
horse that's not accustomed to such tricks. And
now I tell you, once for all, that unless you
behave
yourself quietly and reasonably, I will send
you adrift.
Kisel whistled. He always either replied by a
whistle or tears to Eliot's reproof, and the whistle
now, as usual, was followed by a fit of sulkiness.
The night was misty and very dark. Kisel, in
spite of sundry kind overtures from his master,
remained
doggedly silent, or only answered in a
muttered monosyllable. Thus they travelled all
night, merely stopping at the farmhouses to which
they had been directed to refresh their horses.
On these occasions Kisel was unusually zealous in
performing the office of groom, and seemed to
have made a most useful transfer of the
nimbleness
of his tongue to his hands.
The dawn found them within the enemy's lines,
at twenty miles distance from the city of
New-York
,
and in sight of a British post designated in
their instructions where they were to stop, exhibit
their flag of truce, show their passports, and obtain
others to the city. Now, Kisel, said Eliot, you
must have done with your fooleries; you will
disgrace
me if you do not behave like a man; pull up
your capdo not bury your face so in the collar
of your coatsit upright.
Kisel threw the reins upon his horse's neck,
affected to arrange his cap and coat, and in doing
so dropped his whip. This obliged him to
dismount
and go back a few yards, which he did as
if he had clogs at his heels. In the meantime
Eliot spurred on his horse, and rode up to the door
where the enemy's guard was stationed. His
passports were examined, and returned to him
countersigned. He passed on; and the guard was
giving a cursory glance at the attendant, when it
seemed to strike him there was some discrepance
between the description and the actual person.
Stop, my man, said he, let's have another
glance. `Crooked, ill-made person;' yes, crooked
enough`sandy hair;' yes, by Jove, sandy as a
Scotchman's`gray eyes, small and sunken;'
gray to be sure, but neither small nor sunken.
Well, now, said Kisel, with beseeching
simplicity
,
and looking eagerly after Eliot, who was
watering his horse at a brook a few rods in
advance
of him; well, now, I say, don't
hender
mesmallness is according as people thinks. My
eye ant so big as an ox's, nor tant so small as a
mole's; and folks will dispute all the way 'twixt
the two: so what signifies keeping captain waiting?
Well, well, it must be rightgo on. I don't
know, though, muttered the inquisitor, as Kisel
rode off at a sharp trotdn these Yankees,
they'd cheat the devil. The passport said, `a
turnup
nose'this fellow's is as straight as an arrow.
Here, halloo, sirs,back. But Kisel, instead of
heeding the recall, though seconded by his master,
galloped forward, making antic gestures, laughing
and shouting; and Eliot, bitterly repenting his
indiscretion
in bringing him, retraced his steps. He
found the inspector's faculties all awakened by
the suspicion that he had been outwitted. My
friend, said Eliot, reproducing his passports, this
detention is unnecessary and discourteous. You
see I am, beyond a question, the person here
described
;
and I give you my honour that my
companion
is the attendant specified. He is a fellow
of weak wits, as you may see by his absurd
conduct
,
who can impose on no one, much less on a
person of your keenness.
That is to say, if he is he. But I suppose
you know, sir, that a wolf can wear a sheep's
clothing. There are so many rebels that have
connexions
in the city, outside friends to his majesty,
that we are obliged to keep a sharp look-out.
Certainly, my friend: all that you say is
perfectly
reasonable, and I respect you for doing your
duty. But you must be satisfied now, and will
have the goodness to permit me to proceed.
The man was conciliated; and after making an
entry in his note-book, he again returned the
passports
.
Eliot put spurs to his horse; and as the
man gazed after him, he said, A noble-looking
youth. The Almighty has written his passport on
that face; but that won't serve him now-a-days
without endorsements. That other fellow I doubt.
Well, I'll just forward these notes I have taken
down to Colonel Robertson, and he'll be on the
look-out.
In the meantime Eliot followed Kisel at full
speed; but, after approaching him within a few
yards, he perceived he did not gain an inch on him;
and, apprehensive that such forced riding might
injure Linwood's horse, or, at any rate, that the
smoking sides of both the steeds would excite
suspicion
,
he reined his in, and wondered what new
demon had taken possession of Kisel; for, while
he now rode at a moderate pace, he had the
mortification
of seeing that Kisel exactly, and with an
accuracy he had never manifested in any other
operation, measured his horse's speed by his
master's
,
so as to preserve an undeviating distance
from him. Thus they proceeded till they
approached
Kingsbridge, where a British picket was
stationed. Here Kisel managed so as to come up
with his horse abreast to Eliot's. The horse
seemed to take alarm at the colours that were
flying
from the British flagstaff, and reared, whirled
around, and curvetted, so as to require all his
rider's adroitness to keep on his back.
Meanwhile
the passports were being examined, and
H 3
they were suffered to proceed without a particular
investigation.
They had passed the bridge, and beyond
observation
,
when Eliot, who was still in advance of his
attendant, turned suddenly round with the intention
of trying the whole force of a moral battery; but
he was surprised by a
coup de main
that produced
a sudden and not very agreeable shock to his
ideas.
His follower's slouched and clownish attitude
was gone; and in its place an erect and cavalier
bearing. His head was raised from the muffler that
had half buried ithis cap pushed back, and from
beneath shone the bright laughing eye of Herbert
Linwood.
Now, Eliot, my dear fellow, he said,
stretching
out his hand to him, do not look so, as if you
liked the knave less than the fool.
If I do look so, Linwood, it is because fools
are easier protected than knaves. It is impossible
to foresee what may be the consequence of this
rash business.
Oh, hang the consequence. I wish you would
get over that Yankee fashion of weighing every
possible danger; you are such a cautious race.
Granted, Linwood, we are; and I think it will
take all my caution to get us out of a scrape that
your heroism has plunged us into.
The first shaft of Linwood's petulance had
glanced off from the shield of his friend's
good-temper
,
and he had not another. I confess, he
said, in an altered voice, that the boldness is
worse than questionable that involves others in
our own danger. But consider my temptations,
and then try, my dear fellow, to pardon my
selfishness
.
I have lived three years in exileI, who
never before passsed a night out of my father's house.
I am suffering the wretchedness of his displeasure;
and am absolutely famishing for the faces and
voices of home. I could live a week upon the
ticking of the old hall-clock.
But what satisfaction can you expect,
Linwood
?
You have always told me you believed
your father's displeasure was invincible
Oh, I don't know that. His bark is worse
than his bite. I cannot calculate probabilities.
One possibility outweighs a million of them. I
shall at any rate see my sistermy peerless,
glorious
sister, and my mother. And, after all, what
is the risk? If you did not detect me, others
will not, surely.
You did not give me a chance.
Nor will I them. The only catastrophe I fear
is the possibility of General Washington finding
me out. But it was deused crabbed of him not
to give me the commission. He ought to know
that a man can't live on self-sacrifice.
General Washington requires no more than he
performs.
That is true enough; but is it reasonable to
require of children to bear the burdens of men?
of common men to do the deeds of heroes?
I believe there is no limit, but in our will, to
our moral power.
Pshaw!and I believe the moral power of
each individual can be measured as accurately as
his stature. But we are running our heads into
metaphysics, and shall get lost in a fog.
A New-England fog, Linwood?
They prevail there, he answered, with a
quizzical
smile. But we are wandering from the
point. I really have taken all possible precautions
to keep my secret. I obtained leave for four days'
absence on the pretext that I was going up the
river on my private business. The only danger
arises from my having been compelled to make a
confidant of Kisel.
That occurred to me. How in the name of
wonder did you manage him?
Oh, I conjured in your name. I made him
believe that your safety depended on his implicitly
obeying my directions; so I obtained his holyday
suit (which you must confess is a complete disguise),
and sent him on a fool's errand up the river.
The friends entered the city by passing the
pickets at the Bowery. They were admitted
without
scruple:letting animals into a cage is a very
different affair from letting them out. At
Linwood's
suggestion they crossed into Queen-street.
That great mart, now stored with the products of
the commercial world, and supplying millions from
its packed warehouses, was then chiefly occupied
by the residences of the provincial gentry.
Linwood
had resumed his mufflers and his clownish
air; but the true man from the false exterior
growled forth many an anathema as he passed
house after house belonging to the whig absentees
his former familiar hauntsnow occupied, and, as
he thought, desecrated by British officers, or
resident
royalists whose loyalty was thus cheaply paid.
Look not to the right nor left, I pray you,
Linwood
,
said Eliot; you are now in danger of
being
recognised. We are to stop at Mrs. Billings's,
in Broad-street.
Just above my father's house, replied
Linwood
,
in a sad tone. They rode on briskly; for
they perceived that Eliot's American uniform and
grotesque attendant attracted observation. They
had entered Broad-street, and were near a large
double house, with the carving about the doors and
windows that distinguished the more ambitious
edifices of the provincialists. Two horses,
equipped
for their riders, stood at the door, and a black
servant in faded livery beside them. The door
opened; and a gentleman of lofty stature, attended
by a young lady, came forth. She patted the
animal
that awaited her, and sprang into the saddle.
It must be Isabella Linwood! thought Eliot,
turning his asking eye to his companion, who, he
now perceived, had reined in his horse towards the
16
flagging opposite that where the parties who had
attracted his observation were. He is right and
careful for once, thought Eliot. That Eliot would
have thought it both right and inevitable to have
indulged
himself in a nearer survey of the beautiful
young lady, we do not doubt; but as he again turned,
her horse suddenly reared his hind legs in the air.
Her father screamedthere were several persons
passingno one dared approach the animal, who
was whirling, floundering, and kicking furiously.
Some, gazing at Miss Linwood, exclaimed, She'll
be dashed to pieces!and others, Lord, how
she sits! She did sit bravely; her face
colourless
as marble, and her dark eyes flashing
fire-Eliot
and Linwood instinctively dismounted, and
at the risk of their lives rushed to her rescue;
and, at one breath's intermission of the kicking,
stood on either side of the animal's head. She
was an old acquaintance and favourite of
Linwood
,
and with admirable presence of mind (
inspiration
he afterward called it) he addressed her
in a loud tone, in his accustomed phrase,
Jennet
Jennet,
softlysoftly! The animal was
quieted
;
and, as Linwood afterward affirmed, spoke
as plainly to him with her eye as ever human
voice spoke. At any rate, she stood perfectly
still while Eliot assisted the young lady to dismount.
The people now gathered round; and at the first
burst of inquiry and congratulation, Herbert
disappeared
.
Thank God. you are not hurt, Belle!
exclaimed her father, whose voice, though choked
with emotion, was heard above all others. What
in Heaven's name possessed Jennet?she never
kicked before; and how in the world did you
quiet her, sir? turning to Eliot. It was most
courageously done!
Miraculously! said Miss Linwood; her face,
as she turned it to Eliot, beaming with gratitude.
There are voices that, at their first sound, seem to
strike a new chord that ever after vibrates; and this
first word that Eliot heard pronounced by Isabella
Linwood, often afterward rung in his ears like a
remembered strain of sweet music. There were
persons present, however, not occupied with such
high emotions; and while Eliot was putting in a
disclaimer, and saying, if there were any merit
attending
arresting the horse, it was his servant's,
diligent search was making into the cause of the
animal's transgression, which soon appeared in
the form of a thorn, that, being entangled in the
saddle-cloth, had pierced her side.
The first flow of Mr. Linwood's gratitude seemed
to have been suddenly checked. Papa has seen
the blue coat, thought Isabella; and the gushings
of his heart are turned to icicles! And infusing
into her own manner the warmth lacking in his,
she asked what name she should associate with
her preservation.
My name is Lee.
A very short one. May we prefix Harry or
Charles? alluding to two distinguished
commanders
in the American army.
Neither. Mine is a name unknown to fame.
Eliot.
Eliot Lee!Herbert's friend!Bessie's
brother
!
Papa, you do not understand. Mr. Lee is
the brother of your little pet, Bessie Lee, and,
she added, Herbert's best friend.
Her father coloured; and civilly hoped Miss
Bessie Lee was well.
Well! that is nothing, exclaimed Miss
Linwood
.
We hope all the world is well; but I
must know where Bessie iswhat she is doing
how she is looking, and a thousand million et
ceteras
.
Papa, Mr. Lee must come home with us.
Certainly, Isabella, if Mr. Lee chooses.
Thus bidden, Mr. Lee could only choose to
refuse, which he did; alleging that he had no time
at his own disposal.
Isabella looked pained, and Mr. Linwood felt
uncomfortable; and making an effort at an
amende
honorable,
he said, Pray send your servant to
me, sir; I shall be happy to express my
obligations
to him.
Heaven smiles on Herbert! thought Eliot;
and he replied eagerly, I will most certainly send
him, sir, this evening, at eight o'clock. He then
bowed to Mr. Linwood, took Isabella's hand,
which she again graciously extended to him, and
thanking her for her last kind wordsBestbest
love to Bessie; be sure you don't forget it, he
mounted his horse and was off.
Send him! said Mr. Linwood, reiterating
Eliot's last words. I'll warrant him!trust a
Yankee for not letting slip a shilling.
He is quite right, papa. If he cannot obtain
the courtesy due to the gentleman in return for the
service he has rendered, he is right to secure the
reward of the menial. You were savage, sir
absolutely savage. Mr. Lee will think we are
barbariansheathensany thing but Christians.
And so am I, and so will I be to these fellows.
This young man did only what any other young
man would have done upon instinct; so don't
pester me any more about him. You know, Belle,
I have sworn no rebel shall enter my doors.
And you know, sir, that I havenot sworn;
oh, no! but resolved, and my resolve is the feminine
of my father's oath, that you shall hang me on a
gallows high as Haman's, before I cease to plead
that our doors may be opened to one rebel at
least.
Never, never! replied her father, shutting his
hall-door after him as he spoke, as if all the rebel
world were on the other side of it.
16*
CHAPTER XII.
Oui, je suis sr que vous m'aimez, mais je ne le suis pas que
vous m'aimiez toujours
.
Moliere
.
When
Eliot rejoined his friend at the appointed
rendezvous, Mrs. Billings's, Herbert listened most
eagerly to every particular of Eliot's meeting
with his father and sister, and thanked him over
and over again for so thoughtfully smoothing the
way for his interview with them in the evening.
Oh, Eliot, he said, may you never have such
a hurricane in your bosom as I had when I stood
by my father and Belle, and longed to throw
myself
at his feet, and take my sister into my arms.
I believe I did kiss Jennetwhat the deuse ailed
the jade? she is the gentlest creature that ever
stepped. Never doubt my self-control after this,
Eliot! Eliot's apprehensions were not so easily
removed. He perceived that Herbert was in a
frame of mind unsuited to the cautious part he
was to act. His feelings had been excited by his
rencounter with his father and sister, and though he
had passed through that trial with surprising
self-possession
,
it had quite unfitted him for
encountering
the botheration (so he called it) that awaited
him at Mrs. Billings's.
We are in a beautiful predicament here, he
said; our landlady, who is one of your `'cute
Yankees,' will not let us in till she has sent our
names and a description of our persons to the
Commandant Robertson's:this, she says, being
according to his order. Now this cannot beI will
not implicate youthus far I have proceeded on my
sole responsibility, and if any thing happens, I
alone am liable for the consequences. Are your
instructions to stop at this house positive?
Yes; and if they were not, we might not be
better able to evade this police regulation
elsewhere
.
I will see my countrywoman`hawks
won't pick out hawks' e'en,' you know they say;
perhaps one Yankee hawk may blind another.
A loud rap brought the hostess herself to the door,
a sleek lady, who, Eliot thought, looked as if she
might be
diplomatized,
though a Yankee, and
entitled
to the discretion of at least forty-five years.
Mrs. Billings, I presume?
The same, sirwill you walk in?
Thank you, madam. Kisel, remain here while
I speak with the lady. Mrs. Billings looked at
the master, then at the man, then hemmed, which
being interpreted, meant, I understand your
mutual
relations, and then conducted Eliot to her
little parlour, furnished with all the display she
could command, and the frugality to which she
was enforced, a combination not uncommon in
more recent times. A carpet covered the middle
of the floor, and just reached to the stately chairs
that stood like grenadiers around the room,
guarding
the uncovered boards, the test of the
house-wife's
neatness. One corner was occupied by a
high Chinese lackered clock; and another by a
buffet filled with articles, like the poor vicar's,
wisely kept for show, because good for nothing
else; and between them was the chest of drawers,
that so mysteriously combined the uses which
modern artisans have distributed over sideboards,
wardrobes, &c. The snugness, order, and
sufficiency
of Mrs. Billings's household certainly did
present a striking contrast to the nakedness and
desolation of our soldier's quarters, and the pleased
and admiring glances with which Eliot surveyed
the apartment were quite unaffected.
You are very pleasantly situated here, madam,
he said.
Why, yes; as comfortably as I could expect.
You are from Rhode Island, I believe, Mrs.
Billings?
I am happy to own I am, sir; the expression
of hostility with which the lady had begun the
conference
abated. It is agreeable to have such
cardinal
points in one's history as where one comes
from knownan indirect flattery, quite
unequivocal
.
I have been told, madam, continued Eliot,
that you were a sufferer in the royal cause before
you left your native state?
Yes, sir, I may say that; but I have never
regretted it.
The lady's loyalty is more conspicuous than her
conjugal devotion, thought Eliot, who remembered
to have heard that, with some other property, she
had lost her husband.
No, madam, he replied, one cannot regret
sacrifices in a cause conscientiously espoused.
Your sentiments meet my views, sir, exactly.
But your sacrifices have been uncommon, Mrs.
Billings; you have left a lovely part of our country
to shut yourself up here.
That's true, sir; but you know one can do a
great deal from a sense of duty. I am not a
person
that thinks of myself; I feel as if I ought to
be useful while I am spared. Our self-sacrificing
philanthropist was driving a business, the gains of
which she had never dreamed of on her steril
New-England farm.
I am glad to perceive, Mrs. Billings, that your
sacrifices are in some measure rewarded. You
have, I believe, the best patronage in the city?
Yes, sir; I accommodate as many as I think
it my duty to; my lodgers are very genteel persons
and good pay. Still, I must say, it is a pleasure to
converse with one's own people. The British
officers are not sociable except among
themselves
.
I assure you our meeting is a mutual pleasure,
Mrs. Billings. May I hope for the
accommodation
of a room under your roof for a day or two?
I should be very happy to oblige you, sir. It
appears to me to be a Christian duty to treat even
our enemies kindly; but our officersI mean no
offence, sirlook down upon the rebels, and I
could not find it suitable to do what they would
not approve.
As to that, Mrs. Billings, you know we are
liable to optical illusions in measuring heights
that nearest seems most lofty. Eliot paused, for
he felt he had struck too high a note for his auditor;
and lowering his pitch, he added, you are a
New-England woman, Mrs. Billings, and know we
are not troubled by inequalities that are imaginary.
Very true, sir.
If you find it convenient to oblige me, I shall
not intrude on your lodgers, as I prefer taking my
meals in my own room. This arrangement
obviated
all objection on the part of the lady, and the
matter was settled after she had hinted that a
private table demanded extra pay. Eliot perceived
he was in that common case where a man must
pay his
quid pro quo,
and acknowledge an
irrequitable
obligation into the bargain: he therefore
submitted graciously, acceded to the lady's terms,
and was profuse in thanks.
Looking over the mantel-piece, and seeming to
see, for the first time, a framed advertisement
suspended
there, I perceive, madam, he said, that
your lodgers are required to report themselves to
the commandant; but as my errand is from General
Washington to Sir Henry Clinton, I imagine this
ceremony will be superfluous; somewhat like going
to your servants for leave to stay in your house.
After obtaining it from you, madam, the honoured
commander-in-chief?
That would be foolish.
Then all is settled, Mrs. Billings. As my man
is a stranger in the city, you will allow one of your
servants to take a note for me to Sir Henry
Clinton?
Certainly, sir.
Thus Eliot had secured an important point by
adroitly and humanely addressing himself to the
social sympathies of the good woman, who, though
ycleped a 'cute calculating Yankee, was just that
complex being found all the world over, made up
of conceit, self-esteem, and good feeling; with this
difference, that, like most of her country people,
she had been trained to the devotion of her faculties
to the provident arts of
getting along
.
In conformity to the answer received to his note,
Eliot was at Sir Henry Clinton's door precisely at
half past one, and was shown into the library, there
to await Sir Henry.
The house then occupied by the English
commander-in-chief
,
and afterward consecrated by the
occupancy of Washington, is still standing at the
southwestern extremity of Broadway, having been
respectfully permitted by its proprietors to retain
its primitive form, and fortunately spared the
profane
touch of the demon of change (
soi-disant
improvement
)
presiding over the city corporation.
In the centre of the library, which Eliot found
unoccupied, was a table covered with the
freshest
English journals and other late publications:
among them, Johnson's political pamphlets, and a
poetic emission of light from the star just then
risen above the literary horizonHannah More.
Eliot amused himself for a half hour with tossing
these over, and then retired to an alcove formed
by a temporary damask drapery, enclosing some
bookcases, a sofa, and a window. This window
commanded a view of the Battery, the Sound,
indenting
the romantic shores of Long Island, the
generous Hudson, pouring into the bay its
tributary
waters, and both enfolding in their arms the
infant city, ordained by nature to be the queen of
our country. Ah! thought Eliot, as his eye
passed exultingly over the beautiful scene, and
rested on one of his majesty's ships that lay
anchored in the bay, How long are we to be
shackled and sentinelled by a foreign power! how
long before we may look out upon this avenue
to the ocean as the entrance to our independent
homes, and open or shut it, as pleases us, to the
commerce and friendship of the world!
His natural revery was broken by steps in the
adjoining drawing-roomthe communicating door
was open, and he heard a servant say, Sir Henry
bids me tell you, sir, he shall be detained in the
council-room for half an hour, and begs you will
excuse the delay of dinner.
Easier excused than endured! said a voice,
as soon as the servant had closed the door, which
Eliot immediately recognised to be Mr. Linwood's.
I'll take a stroll up the street, Bellea half hour
is an eternity to sit waiting for dinner!
If Dante had found my father in his Inferno,
thought Isabella, he certainly would have found
him
waiting
for dinner!
The young lady, left to herself, did what we
believe
all young ladies do in the like casewalked
up to the mirror, and there, while she was
readjusting
a sprig of jessamine with a pearl arrow
that attached it to her hair, Eliot, from his
fortunate
position, contemplated at leisure her image.
The years that had glided away since we first
introduced
our heroine on her vist to Effie, had
advanced her to the ripe beauty of maturity. The
freshness, purity, and frankness of childhood
remained
;
but there was a superadded grace, an
expression of sentiment, of thought, feelings, hopes,
purposes, and responsibilities, that come not within
the ken of childhood. Form and colouring may
be described. Miss Linwood's hair was dark, and,
contrary to the fashion of the times (she was no
thrall of fashion), unpowdered, uncurled, and
unfrizzed
,
and so closely arranged in braids as to
VOL. I.I 17
define (that rare beauty) the Grecian outline of her
head. Her complexion had the clearness and
purity
that indicates health and cheerfulness. How
soon, thought Eliot, as he caught a certain look
of abstraction to which of late she was much
addicted
,
how soon she has ceased to gaze at her
own image; is it that she is musing, or have her
eyes a sibylline gaze into futurity! Those eyes
were indeed the eloquent medium of a soul that
aspired to Heaven; but that was not, alas! above
the carking cares of earth.
We must paint truly, though we paint the lady
of our love; and therefore we must confess that our
heroine was not among the few favoured mortals
whose noses have escaped the general
imperfection
of that feature. Hers was slightlythe least
in the worldbut incontrovertibly of the shrewish
order; and her mouth could express pride and
appalling disdain, but only did so when some
unworthy
subject made these merely human emotions
triumph over the good-humour and sweet affections
that played about this, their natural organ and
interpreter
.
Her person was rather above the ordinary height,
and approaching nearer to
embonpoint
than is
common
in our
lean
climate; but it had that grace and
flexibility that make one forget critically to mark
proportions and dimensions, and to conclude, from
the effect produced, that they must be perfect. We
said we could describe form and colour; but who
shall describe that mysterious changing and
all-powerful
beauty of the soul, to which form and
colour are but the obedient ministers?who, by
giving the form and dimensions of the temple, can
give an idea of the exquisite spirits that look from
its portals?
Eliot was not long in making up his mind to
emerge from his hiding-place, and was rising, when
he was checked by the opening of the library door,
and the exclamation, in a voice that made his pulses
throbNymph, in thy orisons be all my sins
remembered!
All,
Jasper? replied Miss Linwood, starting
from her meditations, and blushing as deeply as if
she had betrayed them
all
thy sins; I should
be loath to charge my prayers with such a burden.
Not one committed against you, Isabella,
replied Meredith, in a tone that made it very
awkward for Eliot to present himself.
It would make no essential difference in my
estimation of a fault whether it were committed
against myself or another.
Perhaps so!
Miss Linwood took up one gazette, and
Meredith
another. Suddenly recollecting herselfOh,
do you know, she said, that Eliot Lee is in town?
Now, thought Eliot, is my time.
God forbid! exclaimed Meredith. Miss
Linwood
looked at him with an expression of question
and astonishment, and he adroitly added, Of course,
I 2
if he is in town he is a prisoner, and I am truly
sorry for it.
Spare your regretshe comes in the
honourable
capacity of an emissary from his general to
ours.
It is extraordinary that he has not apprized me
of his arrivalyou must be misinformed.
Isabella recounted the adventure of the morning,
and concluded by saying, He must have some
reason for withholding himselfyou were friends?
Yes, college friendsboy friendship, which
passes off with other morning mistsa friendship
not originating in congeniality, but growing out of
circumstancesa chance.
Chancefriendship! exclaimed Isabella, in
a half suppressed tone, that was echoed from the
depths of Eliot's heart. He held his breath as she
continuedI do not understand thisthe
instincts
of childhood and youth are true and safe.
I love every thing and everybody I loved when
I was a child. I now dread the effect of
adventitious
circumstancesthe flattering illusions of
societythe frauds that are committed on the
imagination by the seeming beautiful. Isabella
was perhaps conscious that she was mentally
giving
a personal investment to these abstractions,
for her voice faltered; but she soon continued with
more steadiness and emphasis, and a searching of
the eye that affected Meredith like an
overpowering
light
chance
friendship! This chance
friendship
may remind you of a chance love, growing out
of
circumstances
too.
No, no, Isabella, on my honour, no. In these
serious matters I am a devout believer in the
divinity
that shapes our ends. The concerns of my
heart never were, never could be at the mercy of
the blind, blundering blockhead chance.
Then, if it existed, continued Isabella, her eye
still riveted to Meredith's face, where the pale olive
had become lividif it had existed you would
notor rather, if you speak truly, you could not
cast aside love for the sister as carelessly as you
do friendship for the brother.
If it existed!my thanks to you for putting
the question hypothetically; you cannot for a
moment
believe that I ever offered serious homage to
that pretty little piece of rurality, Bessie Lee!
Certainly, I found her an interesting exception
to the prosaic world she lives ina sunbeam
breaking through those leaden New-England clouds
a wild rose-bud amid the corn and potatoes of
her mother's garden-patch. She relieved the
inexpressible
dulness of my position and pursuits. It
was like finding a pastoral in the leaves of a
statute-book
Aminte
in Blackstone.
Poor Eliot: his ears tingled, his brain was giddy.
The case may have been reversed to Bessie,
answered Isabella, and you may have been the
statute-book that gave laws to her submissive heart.
a peut-tre!
replied Meredith; but he
immediately
checked the coxcomb smile that curled
17 *
his lips, for it was very plain that Miss Linwood
would bear no levity on the subject of her friend;
and he added, apparently anxiously recalling the
past,Noit is impossibleshe could not make
so egregious a mistakeshe is quite unpresuming
she must have understood me, Isabella. There
was now emotion, serious emotion in his voice.
Bessie Lee was not a simpleton; she must have
known what you also knowhe faltered. Eliot
would have given worlds for a single glance at
Isabella's
face at this moment; but even if the screen
between them had fallen he could not have seen
it, for she had laid her hands on the table and
buried her face in her palms. I appeal, continued
Meredith, from this stage of our being, troubled
and darkened with distrust, to our childhoodthat
you say is true and unerring:then, Isabella,
believe
its testimony, and believe that, from the
fountain which you then unsealed in my heart,
there has ever since flowed a stream, never
diverted
,
and always increasing, till I can no longer
control
it. Not one word, not one look, Isabella?
Again I appeal to the past:were you unconscious
of the wild hopes you raised when you said, `I
love everybody that I loved in my childhood?'
Oh! cried Isabella, raising her head, I did
not mean thatnot that!
The drawing-room door opened, and Helen
Ruthven
appeared, calling out, Isabella Linwooda
tte--tte
ten thousand pardonsbut, Isabella
dear, as the charm is broken, do come here, and you
too, Mr. Meredithhere is the drollest looking
fellow
at Sir Henry's door. He was walking straight
into the hall, when the sentinel pointed his bayonet
at him. `Now don't,' said he, `that's a plaguy sharp
thing, and you'll hurt me if you don't take care; I
only want to speak a word to my
kappen,
' meaning
captain, you know. Finding the sentinel would not
let him pass, he screamed out to me as I was
coming
up the stairs, `Miss, just please give my duty
to Gin'ral Clinton, and ask him if he wont be so
accommodating as to let me speak to Kappen Lee.'
Was it not comical?
What did you say to the poor fellow? asked
Isabella, who at once concluded he was the
coadjutor
in her preservation.
Say, my dear child! of course, nothing.
They were now all gazing at the personation of
Kisel, seated on the door-step, his head down, and
he apparently absorbed in catching flies. I think
I know the poor fellow, said Meredith, who
recognised
some odd articles of Kisel's odd apparel
he is a half-idiot, who from his infancy attached
himself to Eliot Lee, and clung to him as you have
seen a snarl of drifted seaweed adhere to a rock.
I am amazed that a man of Lee's common sense
should have such an attendant.
I honour him for it, said Isabella; honest,
heartfelt, constant affection, elevates the humblest
and the meanest. From all I have heard of Eliot
Lee, she continued, after a moment's pause, it
is not his fault if his friends in all conditions of life
do not cling to him.
Isabella's remark was commonplace enough,
but the tremulous tone in which it was uttered
struck Miss Ruthven. Judging, as most persons
do, from her own consciousness, she thought there
was but one key to a young lady's emotions; and
whispering to Isabella, she said, Your blush is
beautiful, but a tell-tale.
False, of course, then, replied Isabella, nettled
and embarrassed; and suddenly recollecting she
had an unperformed duty towards the uncouth lad
at the door, she left the drawing-room (declining
Meredith's attendance) to perform it.
This Captain Lee, said Miss Ruthven to
Meredith, must be a gentleman I sometimes saw
at West Point. Our Charlotte was half in love
with him.
Indeed!
`Indeed,' yes; but be pleased now, Mr.
Meredith
,
to recall your absent thoughts, and attend to
me, who am cast upon your tender mercies. I
have a word to charm back the wanderers
Isabella
Linwood!Ah, I see you are herenow
tell me honestly, do you not think that was a false
sentiment of hers? do you think one must of
necessity
be constant in friendship or love? You are
in the constant vein now, but hear me out.
Suppose
I am interested, in love if you please, with a
particular individualI see another who is to him
Hyperion to a satyr, and by a fixed law of nature
one attraction must be overcome by the other. It
is not a deliberate or a voluntary changeit
certainly
is not caprice: I am but the passive subject
of an irresistible power.
The object still changing, the sympathy true,
said Meredith, with a satirical smile.
That was meant, replied Miss Ruthven,
for a piquant satire: it is a mere truism, and
fixing her lustrous eyes on Meredith, she
continued
:
The heart must have an object, but
we are at the mercy of chance; and should we
cling to that first thrown in our way when taste is
crude and judgment unripe, and cling to it after
another appears ten thousand times more
worthy
?
Should we, when daylight comes, shut out
the blessed sun, and continue to grope by a
rushlight
?
We cannotit will penetrate the
crevices
and annihilate the stinted beam that we thought
enough for us in the luminary's absence. Ah,
Mr. Meredith, there is much puling parrotry about
constancy, and first love, and all that
I am sure
of it,
am sure the object may change, and the
sympathy
remain, in the truest, tenderest hearts.
That sympathya queer name, is it not?is
always
alive and susceptible, a portion of the soul, a
part of life; a part! life itself.
There was a strange confusion of ideas in
Meredith's
mind as he listened to this rhapsody of Helen
Ruthven. By degrees one came clearly out of
the mist: and is the girl in love with me? was
his mental interrogatory.
13
CHAPTER XIII.
Is't possible that but seeing you should love her?
In
the meantime Eliot had been released from
his durance, where he had suffered, as mortals
sometimes mysteriously do, what he seemed in
nowise
to have deserved; and passing unobserved
into the entry, he had preceded Miss Linwood
down the stairs, and was standing within the outer
door in conversation with his attendant, so earnest
that he did not perceive her approach till she said,
Am I intruding?
She was answered by Herbert's suddenly
turning
his face to her, and uttering Isabella!
In the suddenness of surprise and joy she forgot
every thing but his presence; and would have
thrown her arms around him but for Eliot's
intervention
.
Herbert!Miss Linwood! I entreat you to
be cautiousyour brother's safety is at stake
not a moment is to be lostis concealment
possible
at your father's house?
Possible!certain. I will instantly go home.
Stoppray hush, Herbert. Was the reason
of your coming down stairs known to any one,
Miss Linwood?
Only to Helen Ruthven and Mr. Meredith.
Two foxes on the scent!that's all, said
Herbert.
Oh, no, Herbert; they would be the last to
betray; but they do not suspect you.
Then all may be managed, said Eliot; trust
no one, Miss Linwoodyou cannot serve your
brother better than by appearing at Sir Henry's
table, and letting it be known, incidentally, that
you have seen my attendant.
I understand you, and will do my best.
Heaven help us!avoid by all means seeing
mamma, Herbertshe will not dare incur the
responsibility
of concealing your presence. Go in
at the back gateyou can easily elude Jupe
trust all to Rose. God bless you, dear brother,
she concluded; and in spite of the danger of
observation
,
she gave him one hasty embrace, and
returned to the drawing-room to enact a parta
difficult task to Isabella Linwood.
The few guests expected soon after arrived;
and Mr. Linwood reappeared from his walk with
the air of a person who has tidings to
communicate
.
Ah, Isabella, said he, I have news for
you.
The rebels have been crucifying more tories,
I suppose?
Pshaw, Belleyou know I did not believe
that any more than you did when Rivington first
published it. I have heard news of your Yankee
preservers.
Only heard!then I have the advantage of
you, for I have seen them.
Seen them! Lord bless mewhere, child?
In the hall below. I seized the opportunity
of relieving you from the interview appointed this
evening.
You astonish me! Well, after all,
Robertson's
suspicions may be groundless. He has just
received advice to look out sharply for the
attendant
of Captain Lee, who is suspected not to be the
person he passes for.
And what if he is not, papa?
What if he is not!a true girl-question!
Why, he may be an officer, who, under the
disguise
of a servant, may be a very efficient
emissary
for Mr. Washington. He may have come to
confer with `some of our whited sepulchres'
pretended
tories, but whigs to the back-bonewe have
plenty such.
It would be very dangerous, said a sapient
young lady, to let such a person go at large.
But, papa, continued Isabella, without noticing
the last interlocutor, it seems to me very
improbable
that General Washington would be
accessary
to any such proceeding.
Ah, he'll take care to guard appearances. He
is as chary of his reputation as Csar was of his
wife'sa crafty one is Mr. Washington. The
passport seems to have contained a true
description
of the true servant of this Captain Lee.
Probably some young Curtius has assumed the
responsibility of the imposition. His detection
will reflect no dishonour on the great head of the
schismaticsonly expose the poor youth to danger.
Danger,
papa! Isabella's tone indicated that
the word fell on her ear associated with a life she
loved.
Yes, Miss Linwood; he may find a short and
complete cure for whiggism; for, I take it, that in
that department of t'other world which these
gentry
go to, they will find rebellion pretty well
under
.
Oh my! how you hate the whigs, Mr.
Linwood
!
exclaimed the aforesaid young lady.
Supposing
it were poor dear Herbert who had
disguised
himself just to take a peep at us all.
Herbert! echoed Mr. Linwood, his colour
deepening and flushing his high forehead,
Herbert
!he
is joined to idolsI should let him
alone.
My! Isabella, is it not quite shocking to hear
your father speak in such a hard-hearted way of
poor Herbert? whispered the young lady, who
still cherished a boarding-school love for Herbert.
But, dear me! who is that coming in with Sir
Henry?He must be one of the young officers
who arrived in the ship yesterday. `Captain Lee,
an American officer!' reiterating Sir Henry's
presentation of his guest. My! I ought to have
known the uniform; but I had no idea there was
18
such an elegant young man in the American army
had you, Isabella?
Isabella was too much absorbed in her own
observations
to return any thing more than bows and
nods to her voluble companion. She saw
Meredith
advance to Eliot with that engaging cordiality
which he knew so well how to throw into his
manner; and she perceived that Eliot met him
with a freezing civility, that painfully re-excited
the apprehensions she had long felt, that there
was something rotten in the state of Denmark.
Sir Henry, after addressing each of his guests with
that official and measured politeness that marks
the great man's exact estimate of the value of each
nod, smile, and word vouchsafed to his satellites,
advanced to her, and said in an under tone, My
dear Miss Linwood, I have sacrificed my tastes
at your shrineinvited a rebel to my table in
consideration
of the service he had the honour of
rendering
you, and my valued friend your father, this
morning.
If all I have heard of the gentleman be true,
replied Isabella, Sir Henry will find his society
an indulgence rather than a sacrifice of taste.
Perhaps so. Sir Henry shrugged his
shoulders
.
He seems a clever person; but you know
antipathies are stubborn; and,
entre nous,
I have
what may be termed a natural aversion to an
American. I mean, of course, a rebel American.
England was so much the Jerusalem of the
loyal colonists, the holy city towards which they
always worshipped, that Sir Henry, in uttering this
sentiment, had no doubt of its calling forth a
responsive
amen from Miss Linwood's bosom.
But her pride was touched. For the first time an
American feeling shot athwart her mind, and, like
a sunbeam falling on Memnon's statue, it elicited
music to one ear at least. Have a care, Sir
Henry, she replied aloud; such sentiments from
our rulers engender rebellion, and almost make it
virtue. I am beginning to think that if I had been
a man, I should not have forgotten that I was an
American. Her eye encountered Eliot Lee's;
and his expressed a more animated delight than he
would have ventured to imbody in words, or than
she would have heard
spoken
with complacency.
Sir Henry turned on his heel, and Eliot occupied
his position. Without adverting to what he had
just overheard, or alluding to the discords of the
country, he spoke to Miss Linwood of her brother,
of course, as if he had left him in camp; from her
brother they naturally passed to his sister. Both
were topics that called forth their most eloquent
feelings. The consciousness of a secret subject
of common concern heightened their mutual
interest
,
and in half an hour they had passed from
the
terra incognita
of strangers to the agreeable
footing of friends.
I saw you bow to Miss Ruthven, said
Isabella
:
you knew her at West Point?
Slightly, replied Eliot, with a very expressive
curl of his lip.
Did not I hear my name? asked Miss
Ruthven
,
advancing, hanging on Meredith's arm, and
seating herself in a vacant chair near Miss
Linwood
.
You might, for we presumed to utter it,
replied
Isabella.
Oh, I suppose Captain Lee has been telling
you of my escape from that stronghold of the
enemyindeed, I could endure it no longer. You
know, Captain Lee, there is no excitement there
but the scenery; and even if I were one of those
favoured mortals who find `tongues in trees, books
in the running brooks, and sermons in stones,' I
have no fancy for them. I prefer the lords of the
creation, fixing her eyes expressively on Meredith,
to creation itself.
Pray tell me, Captain Lee, asked Isabella, is
your sister such a worshipper of nature as she
used to be? it seemed to be an innate love with
her.
Yes, it is; and it should be so, if, as some
poets imagine, there is a mysterious correspondence
and affinity between the outward world and pure
spirits.
Dear Bessie! I am so charmed to hear from
her again. She has sent me but one letter in six
months, and that a very,
very
sad one. Isabella's
eye involuntarily turned towards Meredith, but
there was no indication that the sounds that entered
his ears touched a chord of feeling, or even of
memory. It was worth remarking, that while
subjects
had been alluded to that must have had the
most thrilling interest for both Miss Ruthven and
Meredith, they neither betrayed by a glance of the
eye, a variation of colour, or a faltering of voice,
the slightest consciousness. Truly, the children
of this world are wiser in their generation than
the children of light.
At the very moment Isabella was speaking so
tenderly of her friend, Meredith interrupted her
with, I beg your pardon, Miss Linwood, but I have
a controversy with Miss Ruthven which you must
decide. I insist there is disloyalty in discarding
the Queen Charlotte bonnet; a fright, I grant, very
like the rustic little affair your sister Bessie used
to wear, Lee; and absolute treason in substituting
la vendange,
a Bacchante concern, introduced by
the Queen of France, the patroness of the rebel
causepardon me, Captain Leeyour decision,
Miss Linwood; we wait your decision
Isabella carelessly replied, I wear
la
vendange
;
but not thus carelessly did she dismiss the
subject from her mind. Meredith could not so
lightly have alluded to Bessie, in speaking to her
brother, thought she, while she weighed each
word in a tremulous balance, if he had ever
trifled with the affections of that gentle creature.
I have been unjust to him! he is no
heart-breaker
18*
after all. There is no happier moment in the
history of the heart than when it is relieved of a
distrust; and most deeply to be pitied is a young,
enthusiastic, and noble-minded creature, who, with
a standard of ideal perfection, has her affections
fixed, and her confidence wavering.
Eliot perceived that Miss Linwood's mind was
abstracted, and feeling his position to be an
awkward
one, he withdrew to a distant part of the room.
Meredith, too, made his observations. He was
acute enough to perceive that he had allayed
Isabella's
suspicions. He was satisfied with the
present, and not fearful of the future.
Pray tell me, Meredith, do you know that
Captain Lee? asked a Major St. Clair.
Very well; we were at Harvard together!
Ah! scholar turned soldier. These poor
fellows
have no chance against the regular bred
military. Homer and Virgil are not the masters to
teach our art.
Our army would halt for officers if they were,
said Miss Linwood.
St. Clair, said Meredith, is of the opinion
of the old Romans. Plutarch, you know, says
they esteemed Greek and scholar terms of
reproach
.
You mistake me, Meredith; I meant no
reproach
to the learned Theban; upon my word, he
strikes me as quite a soldier-like looking fellowa
keen, quick eyepowerful musclesgood air
very good air, has he not, Miss Linwood?
Just now he appears to me to have very much
the air of a neglected guest. Jasper, pray present
Major St. Clair to your sometime friend.
Excuse me, Miss Linwood, replied the major,
we have
roturiers
enough in our own household.
I am not ambitious of making the acquaintance of
those from the rebel camp.
May I ask, resumed Isabella, who our
roturiers
are?
Oh, the merchantsmen of business, and that
sort of people.
Our city gentry?
Major St. Clair bowed assent.
Isabella bowed and smiled too, but not
graciously
;
her pride was offended. A new light had
broken upon her, and she began to see old subjects
in a fresh aspect. Strange as it may appear to those
who have grown up with the rectified notions of
the present day, she for the first time perceived
the folly of measuring American society by a
European standardof casting it in an old and
worn mouldof permitting its vigorous youth to be
cramped and impaired by transmitted manacles and
shackles. Her fine mind was like the perfectly
organized body, that wanted but to be touched by
fire from Heaven to use all its faculties freely and
independently.
It was obvious that Meredith avoided Eliot, but
this she now believed was owing to the
atmosphere
of the court drawing-room. Eliot was not
so uncomfortable as she imagined. A common
man in his position might not have risen above
the vanities and littlenesses of self. He might
have been fearful of offending against etiquette,
the divinity of small polished gentlemen. He
might, an irritable man would, have been annoyed
by the awkward silence in which he was left,
interrupted
only by such formal courtesies as Sir
Henry deemed befitting the bearing of the host to
an inferior guest. But Eliot Lee cared for none of
these thingsother and higher matters engrossed
him. He was meditating the chances of getting
Herbert safe back to West Point, and the means
of averting Washington's displeasure. He was
eagerly watching Isabella Linwood's face, where
it seemed to him her soul was mirrored, and
inferring
from its eloquent mutations her relations with
Linwood; and he was contrasting Sir Henry's luxurious establishment, and the flippant buzz of
city gossip he heard around him, with the severe
voluntary privations and intense occupations of
his own general and his companions in arms.
His meditations were suddenly put to flight.
Isabella had been watching for an opportunity to
speak privately to Eliot of her brother. Miss
Ruthven and Meredith never quitted her side.
Miss Ruthven seemed like an humble worshipper
incensing two divinities, while, like the false priest,
she was contriving to steal the gift from the altar;
or rather, like an expert finesser, she seemed to
leave the game to others while she held, or fancied
she held, the controlling card in her own hand.
I must make a bold push, thought Isabella, to
escape from these people; and beckoning to Eliot,
who immediately obeyed her summons, she said,
Permit me, Sir Henry, to show Captain Lee the
fine picture of Lord Chatham in your
breakfasting-room
?
Lord Chatham has been removed to give
place to the Marquis of Shelburne, replied Sir
Henry, with a sarcastic smile.
Shall I show you the marquis, then? The face
of an enemy is not quite so agreeable as that of a
friend, but I am sure Captain Lee will never shrink
from either.
This Captain Lee, whispered Helen Ruthven
to Meredith, has a surprising faculty in converting
enemies into friendshave a care lest he make
friends enemies.
Unfortunately, Isabella's tactics were baffled by
a counter-movement. She was met at the door by
the servant announcing dinner, and Eliot was
obliged
to resign her hand to Sir Henry, to fall behind
the privileged guests entitled to precedence, and
follow alone to the dining-room.
There were no indications on Sir Henry's table
of the scarcity and dearness of provisions so
bitterly
complained of by the royalists who remained
in the city. At whatever rate procured, Sir
Henry's
dinner was sumptuous. Eliot compared it
with the coarse and scanty fare of the American
officers, and he felt an honest pride in being one
among those who contracted for a glorious future,
by the sacrifice of all animal and present
indulgence
.
Dish after dish was removed and replaced, and
the viands were discussed, and the generous wines
poured out, as if to eat and to drink were the chief
business and joy of life. A very pretty course
of fish for the season, said Major St. Clair, who
sat near Eliot, passing his eye over the varieties
on the table: Pray, Captain Lee, have you a good
fish-market at West Point?
We are rather too far from the seaboard, sir,
for such a luxury.
Ah, yesI forgot, pardon me; but you must
have fine trout in those mountain-streamsa pretty
resource at a station is trout-fishing.
Yes, to idlers who need resources; but time, as
the lady says in the play, `time travels in divers
paces
with divers persons'it never `stays' with us.
You've other fish to fryhe! he!very good
allow me to send you a bit of brandt, Captain
Lee; do the brandt get up as far as the
Highlands
?
I have never seen them there.
Indeed!but you have abundance of other
gamewild geese, turkeys, teal, woodcock, snipe,
broad-bills?
We have none of these delicacies, sir.
God bless me!how do you live?
Eliot was pestered with this popinjay, and he
answered, with a burst of pardonable pride, I'll
tell you how we live, sirthe earnest tone of
his voice attracted attentionwe live on salt
beef, brown bread, and beans, when we can get
them; and when we cannot, some of us fast, and
some share their horses' messes.
Bless mehow annoying!
You may possibly have heard, sir, resumed
Eliot, of the water that was miraculously
sweetened
,
and of certain bread that came down from
Heaven; and we, who live on this nutriment that
excites your pity, and feel from day to day our
resolution
growing bolder and our hopes brighter, we
fancy a real presence in the brown bread, and an
inspiration
in the water that wells up through the
green turf of our native land.
There is a chord in the breast of every man that
vibrates to a burst of true feelingthis vibration
was felt in the silence that followed. It was first
broken by Isabella Linwood's delicious voice.
She turned her eye, moistened with the emotion
he had excited, towards Eliot; and filling a glass
from a goblet of water, she pushed the goblet
towards
him, saying, Ladies may pledge in the pure
element
our
native land! Captain Lee.
Eliot filled a bumper, and never did man drink
a more intoxicating draught. Sir Henry looked
tremendously solemn, Helen Ruthven exchanged
glances with Meredith, and Mr. Linwood muttered
between his teeth, nonsensedd nonsense,
Belle!
It must be confessed, that Miss Linwood violated
the strict rules that governed her contemporaries.
She was not a lady of saws and precedents. But
if she sometimes too impulsively threw open the
door of her heart, there was nothing there exposed
that could stain her cheek with a blush. We would
by no means recommend an imitation of her
spontaneous
actions. Those only can afford them to
whom they are spontaneous.
After the momentary excitement had passed, Eliot
felt that he had perhaps been a little too heroic for
the occasion. Awkward as the descent is from
an assumed elevation, he effected it with grace, by
falling into conversation with the major on sporting
and fishing; in which he showed a science that
commanded more respect from that gentleman,
than if he had manifested all the virtues of all
the patriots that ever lived, fasted, starved, and died
for their respective countries.
It was hard for Eliot to play citizen of the world,
while he saw Meredith courted, admired, and
apparently
happy, mapping out, at his own will, a brilliant
career, and thought of his sister wasting the incense
of her affections; no more to Meredith than a last
summer's flower. He deserves not, he thought
indignantly, as his eye fell on Isabella, the heart
of this glorious creatureno man deserves; I
almost
wonder that any man should dare aspire
to it.
When a man begins to be humble in relation to
a woman, he is not very far from love; and absurd
as Eliot would have deemed it to fall in love at first
sight, and utterly absurd for him, at any time, to fall
in love with Miss Linwood, it was most fortunate
for him that he was suddenly taken from her
presence
,
by a request from Sir Henry (who had just
had a note put into his hands) that he would
accompany
him to his council-chamber. When there, he
informed Eliot, that suspicions having been excited
in relation to his attendant, a quest for him had
been made at Mrs. Billings'sbut in vain.
Captain
Lee must be aware, he said, that the
disappearance
of the man was a confirmation of the
suspicions!
Eliot replied, that he was not responsible for
any suspicions that might be felt by the timid, or
feigned by the ill-disposed.
That may be, sir, replied Sir Henry; but we
must make you responsible for the reappearance
of the manyour flag cannot exempt you from
this!
As you please, sir, replied Eliot, quite
undaunted
;
you must decide how far the privilege
of my flag extends. You, sir, can appreciate the
importance of not violating, in the smallest degree,
the few humanities of war.
VOL. I.K 19
Sir Henry pondered for a moment before he
asked, Is there any thing in the character of
your attendant which might betray him into an
indiscretion
?
I am an interested witness, Sir Henry; but if
you do not choose to infer the character from the
action, which certainly has been sufficiently
indiscreet
,
give me leave to refer you to Mr. Meredith;
he knew the poor lad in Massachusetts.
But how can you identify him with this man?
He saw this man to-day.
Meredith was summoned and questioned: He
had seen Captain Lee's servant on Sir Henry's
door-step, and recognised him at the first glance
the dullest eye could mistake no other man for
Kisel.
Do me the favour, Mr. Meredith, said Eliot,
to tell Sir Henry Clinton whether you think my
man would be liable to a panic; for it appears that
having overheard that he was under suspicion, he
has fled.
True to himself, Kisel! He would most
assuredly
fly at the slightest alarm. He is one of
those helpless animals whose only defence is the
instinct of cowardice. I have seen him run from
the barking of a family dog, and the mewing of a
house cat; and yet, for he is a curious compound,
such is his extraordinary attachment to Captain
Lee, that I believe he would stand at the cannon's
mouth for him. Poor fellow! his mind takes no
durable impression; to attempt to make one is like
attempting to form an image in sand; and yet, like
this same sand, which, from the smelting furnace,
appears in brilliant and defined forms, his thoughts,
kindled in the fire of his affections, assume an
expression and beauty that would astonish you;
always in fragments, as if the mind had been
shattered
by some fatal jar.
Meredith spoke
con amore.
He was delighted
with the opportunity of doing Eliot a grace; and
Eliot, in listening to the sketch of his simple friend,
had almost forgot the subterfuge that called it forth.
He was not, however, the less pleased at its
success
,
when Sir Henry told him that his despatches
and passports should be furnished in the course of
the evening, and that no impediment would be
thrown in the way of his departure.
The three gentlemen then parted, Meredith
expressing
such animated regret at their brief
meeting
,
that Eliot was on the point of reciprocating it,
when the thought of his sister sealed his lips and
clouded his brow. Meredith's conscience rightly
interpreted the sudden change of countenance; but
his retained its cordial smile, and his hand abated
nothing of its parting pressure.
Again we must quote that most apposite
sentence
Truly,
the children of this world are wiser
in their generation than the children of light.
K 2
CHAPTER XIV.
Oh, my home,
Mine own dear home.
While
Eliot was enjoying the doubtful
advantage
of Sir Henry's hospitality, Herbert Linwood,
a fugitive in his native city, was seeking
concealment
in his father's house. His ardent
temperament
,
which had plunged him into this perplexity,
did not qualify him to extricate himself from it.
So far from not giving to any unproportioned
thought its act, thought and action were
simultaneous
with him. His whole career had shown
that discretion was no part of his valour. He
never foresaw danger till he was in to the very lips;
and, unfortunately, he manifested none of the
facility
at getting out that he did at getting in. In
short, he was one of those reckless, precipitate,
vivacious, kind, and whole-hearted young fellows,
who are very dear and very troublesome to their
friends.
After leaving Sir Henry Clinton's, he turned
into a lane leading from Broadway to Broad-street,
and affording a side-entrance to his father's
premises
.
As he was about to turn into his father's
gateway, he saw a man enter the lane from
Broad-street
,
and for once cautious, he continued his
walk. He fancied the stranger eyed him
suspiciously
.
As he turned into Broad-street the man
also turned into Broadway, and Herbert eagerly
retraced his steps; but as he entered his father's
gate he had the mortification to see the man
repass
the upper corner of the street, and to believe
that he was observed by him. He was once more
on his father's premises. His heart throbbed. The
kitchen-door was half open, and through the
aperture
he saw Rose, who he was sure would joyfully
admit him into the garrison if he could open a
communication
with her; but there were obstacles in
the way. Jupiter, whom Isabella had warned him
not to trust, was, according to his custom of filling
up all the little interludes of life, eating at a
side-table
.
Beside him sat Mars on his hind-legs,
patiently
waiting the chance mouthfuls that Jupe
threw to him. Mars was an old house-dog, an
enfant gat,
petted by all the family, and pampered
by Jupe. An acquaintance of Jupiter's had
dropped
in for an afternoon's lounge; and Rose, who
had a natural antipathy to loungers of every degree,
was driving round with a broom in her hand, giving
with this staff of office the most expressive
intimations
that his presence was unwelcome.
We must be permitted to interrupt our narrative,
and recede some nine or ten years, to record the
most remarkable circumstance in Rose's life. She
19*
was a slave, and most faithful and efficient. Slaves
at that period were almost the only servants in the
province of New-York; and Rose, in common
with many others, filled the office of nurse. Gifts
and favours of every description testified her owner's
sense of her value. On one memorable
Newyear's
day, when Isabella was a child of eight
years, she presented Rose a changeable silk dress.
It was a fine affair, and Rose was pleased and
grateful.
Now, said Isabella, you are as grand and as
happy as any lady in the landare you not, Rose?
Happy! echoed Rose, her countenance
changing
;
I may seem so; but since I came to a
thinking age, I never have had one happy hour or
minute, Miss Belle.
Oh, Rose, Rose! why not, for pity's sake?
I am a
slave.
Pshaw, Rosy, dear! is that all?I thought
you was in earnest. She perceived Rose was
indeed in earnest; and she added, in an
expostulating
tone, Are not papa and mamma ever so kind
to you? and do not Herbert and I love you next
best to them?
Yes, and that lightens the yoke; but still it is
a yoke, and it
galls.
I can be bought and sold
like the cattle. I would die to-morrow to be free
to-day. Oh, free breath is goodfree breath is
good! She uttered this with closed teeth and
tears rolling down her cheeks.
Tears on Rose's cheeks! Isabella could not
resist them, and pouring down a shower from her
own bright eyes, she exclaimed, You shall be
free, Rose, and flew to appeal to her father. Her
father kissed her, called her the best little girl in
the world, and laughed at her suit.
Rose is a fool, he said; she had reason to
complain when she lived with her old mistress,
who used to cuff her; but now she
was
free in
every thing but the namefar better off than nine
tenths of the people in the world. This sophistry
silenced, but did not satisfy Isabella. The spirit
of truth and independence in her own mind
responded
to the cravings of Rose's, and the
thrilling
tone in which those words were spoken, it
is a yoke, and it galls, continued to ring in her
ears.
Soon after, a prize was promised in Isabella's
school for the best French scholar. She was sadly
behind-hand in the studies that require patient
application
;
and her father, who was proud of her
talents, was often vexed that she did not
demonstrate
them to others. Now, Belle, he said,
if you will but win this prize, I'll give you any
thing you'll ask of me.
Any thing, papa?
Yesany thing.
You promise for fair, sir?
You gipsy! yes.
Then write it down, please; for I have heard
you say, papa, that no bargain is good in law that
is not written down.
Mr. Linwood wrote, signed, and sealed a fair
contract. Isabella set to work. The race was a
hard one. Her competitors were older than
herself
,
and farther advanced in the language; but a
mind like hers, with motive strong enough to call
forth all its energy, was unconquerable. Every
day and evening found her with increasing vigour
at her tasks. Her mother remonstrated, Herbert
teased and ridiculed, and Rose fretted. What
signified it, she asked, for Miss Belle to waste
her rosy cheeks and pretty flesh over books, when,
without book-learning, she was ten times brighter
than other girls? Still Isabella, hitherto a most
desultory creature in her habits, and quitting her
tasks at the slightest temptation, persevered like a
Newton; and like all great spirits, she shaped
destiny. The prize was hers.
Now, Belle, said her father, elated with the
compliments that poured in upon him, I will
fulfil
my part of the contract honourably, as you have
done yours. What shall it be, my child?
Rose's freedom, papa.
By Christopher Columbus (his favourite oath
when he was pleased), you shall have it; and in
half an hour you shall give her, with your own
hand, Belle, the deed of manumission.
Could we but find the right sort of stimulus,
he afterward said to his wife, we might make
Belle a great scholar. But the right sort of
stimulus was not easily found; and Isabella soon
recovered her rosy cheeks and pretty flesh. Her
mind fortunately resembled those rich soils, where
every chance sunbeam and passing shower brings
forth some beautiful production. Her schoolmates
studied, plodded, and wondered they did not know
half as much, and were never half as agreeable, as
Isabella Linwood. Human skill and labour can
do much, but Heaven's gifts are inimitable.
Rose's outward condition was in no wise
changed
,
but her mind was freed from galling shackles
by the restoration of her natural rights, and she
now enjoyed the voluntary service she rendered.
We return from our digression. Herbert
perceived
,
from a glance at the dramatis person that
occupied the scene, that it was no time for him to
enter; and slouching his cap over his face, he
seated
himself on the door-step, and whittled a stick,
listening, with what patience he could muster, to
the colloquy within.
'Pon my honour, Mr. Linwood (the slaves
were in the habit of addressing one another by the
names or titles of their masters), 'pon my
honour
,
Mr. Linwood, you were in a 'dicament this
morning, said Jupiter's friend.
Just 'scaped with my life, gin'ral.
That's always safe, muttered Rose, that
nobody
would cry for if it were lost.
That's not the case with Mr. Linwood,
resumed
the general, for Miss Phillis, in patic'lar,
K 3
turned as white as any lily when he stood by that
kicking horse.
It was a 'markable 'liv'rance, and I'll tell you
how it happened, only don't tell anybody but Miss
Phillis, with my 'spects. Just as Jennet had
stopped
one bout of kicking, and was ready to begin
again, I heard an apparition of a voice crying out
`softly, softly Jennet, softly,' and 'pon my honour
she stood stock still, trembling like a leafdo you
surmise who it was?
Miss Isabella, to be sure, you fool, said Rose.
No such ting, Rose, I was as calm as
A scared turkey, Jupe.
`I say I was as calm as them tongs, and there
was nobody near the horse but that rebel officer
when I heard the apparition. As true as you sit
there, general, it was Mr. Herbert's voice that
quieted Jennet. I'll lay the next news we hear
will be his deathpoor 'guided young man!
'Tis a pity, replied the believing general, to
cut him off 'fore he's a shock of wheat; but then
the rebels must die first or last, as they desarve, for
trying to drive off the reg'lars. Pretty times we
should have in New-York if they were gone: no
balls, no races, no t'eatres, no music, no cast-off
rigimentals, for your lawyers and traders ant
genteel
that way, Mr. Linwood.
Very true, gin'ral. Here's 'fusion to the
rebels! and he passed his cup of cider to his
compatriot.
Now out on you, you lazy, slavish loons,
cried Rose; can't you see these men are raised
up to fight for freedom for more than themselves?
If the chain is broken at one end, the links will fall
apart sooner or later. When you see the sun on
the mountain-top, you may be sure it will shine
into the deepest valleys before long.
I s'pose what you mean, Rose, is, that all men
are going to be free. I heard Mr. Herbert say,
when he
argied
with master, that `all men were
born free and equal;' he might as well say, all
men were born white and tall; don't you say so,
gin'ral.
Be sure, Mr. Linwood, be sure. And I
wonder
what good their freedom would do 'em.
Freedom
ant horses and char'ots, tho' horses and
char'ots is freedom. Don't you own that, Miss
Rose?
He's a dog that loves his collar, retorted Rose.
Don't be 'fronted, Miss Rose. Tell me now,
don't you r'ally think it's Cain-like and ongenteel
for a son to fight 'gainst his begotten father, and
so on?
I would have every man fight on the Lord's
side, replied Rose, and that's every man for his
own rights.
La, Miss Rose, then what are them to do
what has not got any? Rose apparently
disdained
a reply to this argument, and the general
interposed
.
It may be well Mr. Herbert is gone, if he ant
dead and gone; for by what folks say, if the war
goes on, there won't be too much left for Miss
Isabella.
`Folks say!' growled Rose, don't come
here, Mart, with any lies but your own.
Well, well, Miss Rose, I did not say noting.
I know Miss Isabella is sure to have a grander
fortin nor ever her father had, and that 'fore long
tooJem Meredith tells me all about it.
That being the case, Rose, said Jupe, hand
us on a bit of butter. You are as close as if we
were in a 'sieged city.
Butter for you, you old cormorant! and butter
a dollar a pound! No, no; up, Jupeout, out,
Marslet me clear away.
Rose was absolute in her authority. Jupiter
rose, and Mars crawled most unwillingly out at the
door. When there, the drowsy, surfeited animal
was suddenly electrified; he snuffed, wagged his
tail, barked, and ran in and out again. What
does all this mean? demanded Rose; and pushing
the door wide open, she espied a figure quietly
seated on the steps, repressing Mars, and whittling
with apparent unconcern. Now Rose, in
common
with many energetic domestics, had the same
sort of antipathy to beggars that she had to moths
and vermin of every description, considering them
all equally marauders on the domicil.
What are you doing here, you lazy varmint?
pretty time of day for a great two-fisted fellow to
be lying over the door, littering the steps this
fashion. Fawning on a beggar, Mars! shame on
you! clear out, sir!and she gave a stroke with
her broom, so equally shared by the man and dog,
that it was not easy to say for which it was
designed
.
The dog yelped, the man sprang adroitly
on one side of the step, raised his cap, and looked
Rose in the face.
It was a Gorgon glance to Rose. For an
instant
she was transfixed; and then recovering her
self-possession, she said, so as to appear to her
auditors within to be replying to a petition:
Hungry, are you?well, well, go to the
wash-house
,
and I'll bring you some victualsthe
hungry
must be fed.
That's what master calls sound doctrine, Rose,
said Jupiter; I hope you won't forget it before my
supper-time.
You, you hound, you never fast long enough
to be hungry; but I'll remember you at supper-time
I've some fresh pies in the pantryif you'll
take the big kettle to be mended. Now is a good
timeMart will lend you a hand.
Both assented, and thus in a few moments were
disposed of; and Rose repaired to the wash-house
to embark her whole heart in Herbert's concerns,
provided her mind could be satisfied on some
cardinal
points. After she had given vent to the first
burst of joy, something seemed to stick in Rose's
20
throatshe hemmed, coughed, placed and displaced
the moveables about her, and then speaking out
her upright soul, she said, you ant a deserter?
A deserter, Rose! I'd not look you in the
face if I were.
Nor a spy, Mr. Herbert?
Indeed, I am not, Rose.
Then, she cried, striking the back of one hand
into the palm of the other, then we'll go through
fire and water for you; but Miss Belle and I could
not raise our hands for spy or deserter, though he
were bone of her bone.
These preliminaries settled, nothing was easier
than for Rose to sympathize fully with the
imprudent
intensity of Herbert's longings to see his own
family. Nothing beyond present concealment was
to be thought of till a council could be held with
Isabella. Her injunction was obeyed, and Rose
immediately conducted Herbert to his own
apartment
.
On his way thither he caught through a
glass door a glimpse of his mother, who was alone,
employing some stolen moments in knitting for her
son;stolen we say, for well beloved as he was,
she dared not even allude to him in his father's
presence. Mrs. Linwood was thoroughly imbued
with the conjugal orthodoxy, that
Man was made for God,
Woman for God in him.
She firmly believed that the husband ruled by
divine
right. She loved her son; but love was not
with her as with Isabella, like the cataract in its
natural
state, free and resistless; but like the cataract
subdued by the art of man, controlled by his
inventions
,
and subserving his convenience. Such
characters
,
if not interesting, are safe, provided they
fall into good hands. Such as she was, her son
loved her tenderly, and found it hard to resist
flying to her arms; and he would actually have
done so when he saw her take up the
measurestocking
lying in her lap and kiss it, and Rose said,
It is yours, but Rose held him back.
Every thing in his apartment had been
preserved
,
with scrupulous care, just as he had left it,
and all indicated that he was daily remembered.
There was nothing of the vault-like atmosphere
of a deserted room, no dust had accumulated on
the furniture. His books, his writing-materials,
his little toilet affairs, were as if he had left them
an hour before. Herbert had never felt more
tenderly
than at this moment, surrounded by these
mute witnesses of domestic love, the sacrifice he
had made to his country. He was destined to feel
it more painfully.
Rose reappeared with the best refreshments of
her larder. Times are changed, Mr. Herbert,
she said, since you used to butter your bread
both sides, and when you dropped it on the
carpet
say, `The butter side is up, Rosy.' If the
war lasts much longer we shall have no buttered
side to our bread.
How so, Rose? I thought you lived on the
fat of the land in the city. Heaven knows our
portion is lean enough.
Oh, Mr. Herbert, it takes a handful of money
now to buy one day's fare; and money is far from
being plentiful with your father, though I'd pull
out my tongue before I'd say so to any but your
father's son. There's little coming in from the
rents, when the empty houses of the rebels (as our
people call them) are to be had for nothing, or
next to nothing. They say the commandant does
take the rent for some, and give it to the poor;
which is like trying to cheat the devil by giving a
good name to a bad deed.
But, Rose, my father has property out of the
city.
Yes, Mr. Herbert; but the farms are on what's
called the neutral ground; and the tenants write
that what one side does not take, t'other does not
leave; and so between friends and foes it's all
Miss Isabella and I can do to keep the wheels
agoing. She has persuaded your father to dispose
of all the servants but Jupe and meplague and
no profit were they always, as slaves always are.
There's no telling the twists and turns that she
and your mother makes that your father may see
no difference on the table, where he'd feel it most.
If he does, he's sure to curse the rebels; and that's
a dagger to them.
Rose, does my father never speak of me?
Never, Mr. Herbert, never.
Nor my mother?
Rose shook her head. Not in your father's
hearing.
And my sisteris she afraid to speak my
name?
She!the Lord forgive you, Mr. Herbert.
When did she ever fear to do what was right?
There's not a day she does not talk of you, though
your mother looks scared, and your father looks
black; but I mistrust he's pleased. I heard her
read to him out of a newspaper one day how
General
Washington had sent your name in to
Congress
as one of them that had done their duty
handsome
at Stony Point or some of them places; and
she clapped her hands, and put her arms round
his neck, and said, with that voice of hers that's
sweeter than a flute, `Are you not proud of him?'
My noble sister!what did he say, Rose?
Never a word with his lips; but he went out
of the room as if he'd been shot, his face speaking
plainer than words.
Oh, he'll forgive me!I'm sure he will!
exclaimed
Herbert, his ardent feelings kindling at the
first light.
Don't be too
sartin,
Mr. Herbertwill and
heart are at war; and will has been master so long
that I mistrust heart is weakestif, indeed, she
added, averting her eye, you should join the
Reformees
20*
Ay, then the fatted calf would be killed for
me! No, Rose, I had rather die with my father's
curse upon me.
And betterbetter!far better, Mr. Herbert:
your father's curse, if you don't
desarve
it, won't
cut in; but the curse of conscience is what can't
be borne. I must not stay here longer. If you
get tired sitting alone, you can sleep away the
time. The bed has fresh linenI change it every
month, so it sha'n't get an old smell, and put them
in mind how long you've been gone.
After all, thought Herbert, as the faithful
creature quitted the room, I have never suffered
the worst of absencethe misery of being
forgotten
!
But every solacing reflection was soon lost
in the anxieties that beset him. A light-hearted,
thoughtless youth, is like the bark that dances over
the waves when skies are cloudless, breezes light,
and tides favourable, but wants strength and
ballast
for difficult straits and tempestuous weather.
I have swamped myself completely, thought
Herbert. Eliot must inevitably leave me in the
city. It was selfish in me to expose him to
censure
that
never occurred to me. Instead of
getting
my father's forgivenessa fond, foolish dream
I stand a good chance, if Rose is right, of being
handed over to the tender mercies of Sir Henry
Clinton. And if I escape hanging here I am lost
with General Washington: imprudence and
rashness
are sins of the first degree with him. Would
to Heaven I could get out of this net as easily as
I ran into it! I always put the cart before the
horseaction before thought.
With such meditations the time passed heavily;
and Herbert took refuge in Rose's advice, and
threw himself on the bed within the closely-drawn
curtains.
We hope our sentimental readers will not
abandon
him, when we confess that he soon fell into a
profound sleep, from which he did not awaken for
several hours. They must be agitating griefs that
overcome the strong tendencies of a vigorous
constitution
to eating and sleeping. And besides, it
must be remembered in Herbert's favour, that the
preceding night had been one long fatiguing vigil.
Kind nature, pardon us for apologizing for thy
gracious
ministry.
CHAPTER XV.
L'habitude de vivre ensemble fit natre les plus doux
sentimens
qui soient connus des hommes.
Rousseau.
Herbert's
sleep was troubled with fragments
and startling combinations of his waking thoughts.
At one moment he was at Westbrook, making love
to Bessie, who seemed to be deaf to him, and
intently
reading a letter in Jasper Meredith's hand;
while Helen Ruthven stood behind her, beckoning
to Herbert with her most seductive smile, which
he fancied he was not to be deluded by.
Suddenly
the scene changedhe had a rope round his
neck, and was mounting a scaffold, surrounded
by a crowd, where he saw Washington, Eliot, his
father, mother, and Isabellaall unconcerned
spectators
.
Then, as is often the case, a real sound
shaped the unreal vision. He witnessed his own
funeral obsequies, and heard his father reading the
burial service over him. By degrees, sleep
loosened
the chain that bound his fancy, and the actual
sounds became distinct. He awoke: a candle was
burning on the table, and he heard his father
in an adjoining apartment, to which it had always
been his habit to retire for his evening
devotions
.
He heard him repeat the formula
prescribed
by the church, and then his voice,
tremulous
with the feeling that gushed from his heart,
broke forth in an extempore appeal to Him who
holds all hearts in the hollow of his hand. He
prayed him to visit with his grace his wandering
son; and to incline him to turn away from feeding
on husks with swine, and bring him home to his
father's houseto his dutyto his God. If it
please thee, he said, humble thy servant in any
other formsend poverty, sickness, desertion, but
restore my only and well-beloved boy; wipe out
the stain of rebellion from my name. If this may
not be, if still thy servant must go sorrowing for
the departed glory of his house, keep him steadfast
in duty, so that he swerve not, even for his son,
his only son.
The prayer finished, his door was opened, and
he saw his father enter without daring himself to
move. Mr. Linwood looked at the candle, glanced
his eye around the room, and then sat down at
the table, saying, as if in explanation, Belle has
been here. He covered his face with both his
hands, and murmured in a broken voice, Oh,
Herbert, was it to store up these bitter hours that
I watched over your childhoodthat I came every
night here, when you were sleeping, to kiss you
and pray over your pillow?what fools we are!
we knit the love of our children with our very
heart-stringswe tend on themwe pamper them
we blend our lives with theirs, and then we are
desertedforgotten!
Never, never for one moment! cried Herbert,
who with one spring was at his father's feet. Mr.
Linwood started from him, and then, obeying the
impulse of nature, he received his son's embrace,
and they wept in one another's arms.
The door softly opened. Isabella appeared, and
her face irradiating with most joyful surprise,
she called, Mamma, mamma; here, in Herbert's
room! In another instant, Herbert had folded his
mother and sister to his bosom; and Mr. Linwood
was beginning to recover his self-possession, and to
feel as if he had been betrayed into the surrender
of a post. He walked up and down the room, then
suddenly stopping and laying his hand on
Herbert's
shoulder, and surveying him from head to
foot, I know not, but I fear, he said, what
this disguise may meantell me, in one word, do
you return penitent?
I return grieving that I ever offended you, my
dear father, and venturing life and honour to see
youto hear you say that you forgive me.
Herbert, my son, you know, replied Mr.
Linwood
,
his voice faltering with the tenderness against
which he struggled, that my door and my heart
have always been open to you, provided
Oh, no
provideds,
papa! Herbert begs your
forgivenessthis is enough.
I wish, sir, you would think it was enough,
sobbed Mrs. Linwood.
You must think so, papa; it is the sin and
misery of these unhappy times that divides you.
Give to the winds your political differences, and
leave the war to the camp and the field.
Herbert
has always loved and honoured you.
Mr. Linwood felt as if they were dragging him
over a precipice, and he resisted with all his might.
A pretty way he has taken to show it! he said,
let him declare he has abandoned the rebels and
traitors, and their cause, and I will believe it.
Herbert was silent.
My dear father, said Isabella.
Nay, Isabella, do not `dear father' me. I
will not be coaxed out of my right reason. If you
can tell me that your brother abandons and abjures
the miscreants, speakif not, be silent.
If it were true that he did abandon them, he
would be no son of yours, no brother of mine. If
he were thus restored to us, who could restore him
to himself? where could he hide him from himself?
Your own soul would spurn a renegado!think
better of himthink better of his friendsthey
are not all miscreants. There are many noble,
highminded
What? what, Isabella?
As deluded as he is.
A wisely-finished sentence, child. But you
need not undertake to teach me what they are. I
know thema set of paltry schismaticspet
tifogging attorneysschoolmastersmechanics
shop-keepersbankruptsoutlawssmugglers
half-starved, half-bred, ragged sons of Belial;
banded
together, and led on by that quack Catiline, that
despot-in-chief, Washington. `No son of mine if
he abjures them!' I swear to you, Herbert, that
on these terms alone will I ever again receive you
as my son. Again he paused, and after some
reflection
,
added, You have an alternative if you
do not choose to avail yourself of Sir Henry's
standing proclamation, and come in and receive
your pardon as a deserteryou may join the corps
of Reformees. This opportunity now lost, is lost
for ever. Is my forgiveness worth the price I have
fixed? speak, Herbert.
Have I not proved how inexpressibly dear it is
to me?
No faltering, young man! speak to the point.
Oh, my dear, dear son, said his mother, if
you but knew how much we have all suffered for
you, and how happy you can now make us, if you
only will, you would not hesitate, even if the rebel
cause were a good one: you are but as one man to
that, and to us you are all the world.
This
argumentum ad hominem
(the only
argument
of weak minds) clouded Herbert's
perception
.
It was a moment of the most painful
vacillation
;
the forgiveness of his father, the
ministering
,
indulgent love of his mother, the presence of
his sister, the soft endearments of home, and all its
dear familiar objects, solicited him. He had once
forsaken them, but then he was incited by the
immeasurable expectation of unrebuked youth,
thoughts of high emprise, romantic deeds, and
strange incidents; but his experience, with few and
slight exceptions, had been a tissue of dangers
without the opportunity of brilliant exploits; of
fatigue without reward; and of rough and scanty
fare, which, however well it may tell in the past
life of a hero, has no romantic charm in its actual
details. He continued silent. His father
perceived
,
or at least hoped, that he wavered.
Speak, he said, in a voice of earnest entreaty,
speak, Herbertmy dear son, for God's sake,
speak.
It is right above all things to desire his
forgiveness
,
thought Herbert, and it is plain there is but
one way of getting it. I am in a diabolical hobble
if I succeed in getting back to camp, what am I to
expect? Imprudence is crime with our general;
and after all, what good have I done the cause?
and yet
Herbert, exclaimed Isabella, and her voice
thrilled through his soul, is it possible you
waver
?
He started as if he were electrified: his eye met
hers, and the evil spirits of doubt and irresolution
were overcome.
Heaven forgive me! he said, I waver no
longer.
VOL. I.L 21
Then, by all that is holy, exclaimed Mr.
Linwood
,
flushed with disappointment and rage, you
shall reap as you sow; it shall never be said that
I sheltered a rebel, though that rebel be my son.
He rang the bell violently; Justice shall have its
coursewhy does not Jupe come!you too to
prove false, Isabella! I might have known it when
I saw you drinking in the vapouring of that fellow
Lee to-day; again he rang the bell: you may
all desert me, but I'll be true so long as my pulse
beats.
No one replied to him. Mrs. Linwood, sustained
by Herbert's encircling arm, wept aloud. Isabella
knew the tide of her father's passion would have
its ebb as well as flow; she believed the servants
were in bed, and that before he could obtain a
messenger
to communicate with the proper authority,
which she perceived to be his present intention, his
Brutus resolution would fail. She was however
startled by hearing voices in the lower entry, and
immediately Rose burst open the door, crying,
Fly, Mr. Herbertthey are after you!
The words operated on Mr. Linwood like a
gust of wind on a superincumbent cloud of smoke.
His angry emotions passed off, and nature flamed
up bright and irresistible. Every thought, every
feeling but for Herbert's escape and safety,
vanished
.
This way, my son, he cried; through
your mother's roomdown the back stairs, and out
the side gate.God help you! He closed the
door after Herbert, locked it, and put the key in
his pocket. Isabella advanced into the entry to
meet her brother's pursuers, and procure a delay of
a few moments on what pretext she could. She
was met by two men and an officer, sent by
Colonel
Robertson, the commandant. Your pardon,
Miss Linwood, said the officer, pushing by her
into the room where her father awaited him.
How very rude! exclaimed Mrs. Linwood,
for once in her life speaking first and independently
in her husband's presence; how very rude, sir,
to come up stairs into our bedrooms without
permission
.
The officer smiled at this pretended
deference
to forms at the moment the poor mother
was pale as death, and shivering with terror. I
beg your pardon, madam, and yours, Mr. Linwood
this is the last house in the city in which I
should willingly have performed this duty; but you,
sir, are aware, that in these times our very best
and most honoured friends are sometimes involved
with our foes.
No apologies, sir, there's no use in themyou
are in search of Mr. Herbert Linwoodproceed
my house is subject to your pleasure.
The officer was reiterating his apologies, when
a cry from the side entrance to the yard announced
that the fugitive was taken. Mr. Linwood sunk
into his chair; but instantly rallying, he asked
whither his son was to be conducted.
I am sorry to say, sir, that I am directed to
lodge him in the Provost.
L 2
In Cunningham's hands!  the Lord have
mercy on him, then!
The officer assured him the young man should
have whatever alleviation it was in his power to
afford him, until Sir Henry's further pleasure should
be known. He then withdrew, and left Mr.
Linwood
exhausted by a rapid succession of jarring
emotions.
Isabella retired with her mother, and succeeded
in lulling her into a tranquillity which she herself
was far enough from attaining.
The person whom, as it may be remembered,
Linwood met in passing down the lane to his
father's house, was an emissary of Robertson, who
had been sent on a scout for Captain Lee's
attendant
,
and who immediately reported to the
commandant
his suspicions. He, anxious, if possible,
not to offend the elder Linwood, had stationed men
in the lane and in Broad-street, to watch for the
young man's egress. They waited till ten in the
evening, and then found it expedient to proceed
to the direct measures which ended in Herbert's
capture.
CHAPTER XVI.
Great is thy power, and great thy fame
Far kenn'd and noted is thy name!
An' tho' yon lowin' heugh's thy hame,
Thou travels far.
Burns.
Eliot Lee
returned to his lodgings from Sir
Henry's in no very comfortable frame of mind. It
was his duty, and this duty, like others, had the
inconvenient
property of inflexibility, to return to
West Point with the despatches without
attempting
to extricate his friend from the shoals and
quicksands amid which he had so rashly rushed.
He consoled himself, however, under this
necessity
,
by the reflection that he could in no way so
efficiently serve Herbert as by being the first to
communicate his imprudence and its consequences
to General Washington. His anxiety to serve him
was doubled by the consciousness that he should
thereby serve Isabella. An acquaintance of a day
with a young lady ought not, perhaps, to have
given a stronger impulse to the fervours of
friendship
;
yet the truest friend of three-and-twenty
will find some apology for Eliot in his own
experience
,
or would have found it, if, like Eliot, he had
just seen the incarnation of his most poetic
imaginings
.
21 *
While he awaited in his room the despatches, he
tried to adjust the complicated impressions of the
day. He reviewed the scene in the library, and
his conclusions from it were the result of his
observations
,
naturally tinged by the character of the
observer. Is it not impossible for any
man
to
understand
perfectly the intricate machinery of a
woman's heart, its hidden sources of hope and
fear, trust and distrust; all its invisible springs and
complex action? If, he thought, Miss
Linwood
knew Meredith as I know him; if she knew
what she now fears, that he had fed his vanity, his
idol, self, on the exhalations of homage, love, trust,
and hope, from a pure heart that, like a flower,
withered in giving out its sweets, she would not
love him; not that it is a matter of volition to love
or not to love,but she could not. If Isabella
Linwood, gifted as she is in mind and person, were
less soughtif, like my poor little Bessie, she were
in some obscure, shady place of life, her
pre-eminence
unacknowledged and unknown, like her she
would be deserted for an enthroned sovereign.
This she cannot know; and she is destined to be
one of the ten thousand mismated men and women
who have thrown away their happiness, and found
it out too late. Find it out she must; for this
detestable
selfishness dulls a man's perception of the
rights of others, of their deserts, their wants, and
their infirmities, while it makes him keenly
susceptible
to whatever touches self. He resembles
those insects who, instead of the social senses of
hearing and seeing which connect one sentient
existence with another, are furnished with feelers
that make their own bodies the focus of all
sensation
.
Eliot was roused from his sententious revery
by a whistle beneath his window. He looked out
and saw by the moonlight a man squatted on the
ground, and so shaded by the wooden entrance to
the door as to be but dimly seen. Eliot,
conjecturing
who it might be, immediately descended the
stairs and opened the outer door. The man
leaped
from the ground, seized both Eliot's hands, and
cried out in a half articulate voiceCould not
Kisel find you? hey! when the dog can't find his
master, nor the bean its pole, nor the flower the
side the sun shines, then say Kisel can't find you,
Misser Eliothey!
My poor fellow! How in the name of wonder
did you get here alone?
Ah, Misser Eliot, always told you you did not
know what a salvation it was to pass for a fool,
and all the while be just as wise as other folks.
I have my own light, he pointed upwards,
there's one that guides the owl as well as the
eagle, and the fool better than the wise man.
But how came the enemy to let you pass?
Let me! what for should not they? what harm
could such as I do them? I told them so, and they
believed megood, hey!
You cannot have walked all the way?
Walked!when did wit walk? No, Misser
Eliot, not a step of it. Hooked a fishing canoe
and poled 'long shore some,jumped into a wagon
with a blind nigger fiddler and his wife, and rode
some,then up behind a cowboy, and paid him
in whistling some,boarded market-carts some,
and musquashed some.
And here you are, and now I must take care
of you.
Yes, Misser Eliot, depend on you now, pretty
much like other folksKisel, hey! depends on
Providence when he can get nothing else to
depend
on.
Thank Heaven, thought Eliot, I have not to
draw on my extempore sagacity. Now that I have
the real Dromeo, I shall get on without let or
hinderance
.
He re-entered the house, encountered
his landlady, and, imboldened by the presence of
Kisel, laughed at the unnecessary suspicion that
had been excited, ordered his horses, and having
received his despatches and his countersigned
passports
from Sir Henry, he determined to profit by
the moonlight, and immediately set forth on his
return.
As they passed Mr. Linwood's house Eliot
paused for a moment, but there was no intimation
from its silent walls; and hoping and believing that
his friend was safe within them, and breathing a
prayer for the peerless creature who seemed to
him, like a celestial spirit, to sanctify the dwelling
that contained her, he spurred his horse as if
he would have broken the chain that bound him to
the spotthe chain already linking in with his
existence, and destined never to be broken till that
should be dissolved.
He proceeded some twenty or five-and-twenty
miles without incident, when, as he passed a
narrow
road that intersected the highway, five
horsemen
turned from it into the main road. Kisel,
with the instinct of cowardice, reined his horse
close to his master. The men remained in the
rear, talking together earnestly in low tones.
Suddenly
,
two of them spurred their horses and
came abreast of the forward party, the one
beside
Kisel, the other beside Eliot. There was, at
best, impertinence in the movement, and it
annoyed
Eliot. It might mean something worse than
impertinence. He placed his hand on the loaded
pistol in his holster, and calmly awaited further
demonstrations from his new companions. A
cursory
glance assured him they were questionable
characters. They wore cloth caps, resembling
those used by our own winter travellers, drawn
close over the eyes, and having a sort of curtain
that hid the neck, ears, and chin. The mouth and
nose were the only visible features; and though
they were dimly seen by the starlight (the moon
had set), they seemed to Eliot, with a little aid
from imagination, to indicate brutal coarseness
and vulgarity. They had on spencers of a
dreadnaught
material, girded around them with a
leathern
strap.Good evening, said the man at Eliot's
side.
L 3
Captain Lee made no reply; but his squire,
eager to accept a friendly overture, and always
ready on the least hint to speak, replied, Good
evening to you, neighbour; which way are you
riding?
After our horses' noses, replied the fellow,
gruffly.
Oh, that's the way we are travellingso we
may as well be friendly; for in these times there's
many a bird on the wing at night beside owls and
batshey?
Where are you from, fellow? asked the first
speaker.
From below.
Where are you going?
Above.
The man, not disposed to be silenced by Kisel's
indefinite replies, repeated his first question to
Eliot.
The true answer is safest, thought Eliot, who
was determined, if possible, to avoid a contest
where the odds were five to one; and he briefly
communicated his destination and errand.
Despatches! replied the man, echoing Eliot.
Is that all you have about you? I wish you
well, then, to your journey's endand that wish is
worth something, I can tell you. Come, Pat, spur
your horsewe've no time to be lagging here.
I'm thinking, captain, we had better change
horses with these gentlemen, and give them our
spurs to boot; and suiting the action to the word,
he seized Kisel's bridle and ordered him to
dismount
.
At the same instant his comrade-captain
made a lunge at Eliot, as if for a corresponding
seizure; but Eliot perceived the movement in time
to evade it. He roused the metal of his horse
with a wordthe fine animal sprang forward
Eliot turned him short round, and presented his
pistol to Kisel's antagonist, who let fall the bridle
and turned to defend himself.
Now spur your horse and fear nothing, Kisel,'
cried his master.
Not to fear was impossible to Kisel; but the first
injunction he obeyed, even to the rowels of his
spurs; and he and his master soon distanced their
pursuers, who, now partly incited by revenge,
pursued the hopeless chase for two or three miles.
Soon after losing sight of these men, Eliot
reached Gurdon Coit's. Coit was a farmer, who, on
the borders of the river and on the neutral ground,
kept a public house as supplemental to his farm,
which, in these troubled times, was roughly handled
by friends and foes. Friends and foes we say: for
though Coit observed, as beseemed a man of his
present calling, a strict outward neutrality, in heart
he was on his country's side; as he often testified,
with considerable risk to himself, by affording
facilities
to secret emissaries to the city, and by receiving
into his house valuable supplies, that were run up
from the city (where Washington had many secret
trusty friends) for the use of the army at West
Point.
Eliot stopped at Coit's, and announced his
intention
,
received by a hurra from Kisel, of
remaining
there till daylight. Coit was roused from
a nap in his chair by the entrance of his new
guests. In reply to Eliot's request for
refreshment
and lodging, he said, You see, captain
(he recognised Eliot, who had been at his house
on his way down), my house is brimful.
Caesar
,
and Venus, and all the little niggers, sleep
in the kitchen. My wife's sisters are here visiting,
and they've got the best bedroom, and my wife
and the gals the other; for you know we must
give the best to the women, poor cretursso a
plank here in the bar-room is the best sleeping
privilege I can give you, and the barn to your man.
Oh, Misser Eliot, I've got a trembling in my
limbs to-night, interposed Kisel; don't send me
away alone.
Eliot explained the cause of poor Kisel's
trembling
limbs; and it was agreed that he should
share his master's
sleeping privilege.
In answer
to Eliot's communication, Coit said, As sure as a
gun, you've met the skinners; and you're a lucky
man to get out of their hands alive. They've been
harrying up and down the country like so many
wolves for the last three weeks, doing mischief
wherever 'twas to be done;nobody has escaped
them but Madam Archer.
Who is Madam Archer?
I mistrust, captain, you a'n't much acquainted
with the quality in York state, or you'd know
Madam Archer of Beech-Hill; the widow lady
with the blind twins. I believe the Lord has set
a defence about her habitation; for there she stays,
with those helpless little people, and neither harm
nor the fear of it come nigh her, though she has
nothing of mankind under her roof except one old
slave; and them that are brought up slaves, you
know, have neither sense nor pluck for difficult
times.
Kisel interrupted the landlord's harangue to hint
to his master that his fright had brought on a great
appetite; and Eliot, feeling the same effect, though
not from precisely the same cause, requested his
host to provide him some supper, while he and his
man went to look after their horses; a duty that
he gratefully performed, rejoicing in the rustic
education that made it light to him to perform
services
for which he often saw the noble animals
of his more daintily-bred brother officers suffering.
Who are these, my bed-fellows? he asked
of Coit, a few moments after, as he sat discussing
some fine bacon and brown bread, and handing
slice after slice to Kisel, who, squatting on the
hearth, received it like a petted dog from his hand.
The subjects of his inquiry were two long fellows
wrapped in blankets, and their heads on their
knapsacks
,
stretched on the floor, and soundly sleeping.
They are soldiers from above, replied Coit in
a whisper, who have come here to receive some
tea and sugar, and such kind of fancy articles, for
the ladies at the Point.
22
And who is this noisy person on the settle?
He does snore like all natur, replied Coit,
laughing, and then continued in a lowered voice:
I don't know who he is, though I can make a
pretty good guess; and if I guess right, he a'nt a
person I should like to interfere with, and it's plain
he don't choose to make himself known. He has
a rough tongue, that does not seem like your born
qualityhe does not handle his victuals like them
but he has that solid way with him that shows
he was born to command the best of you in such
times as these, when, as you may say, we value a
garment according to its strength, and not for the
trimmings. No offence, captain?
None in the world to me, my good friend; I am
not myself one of those you call the born quality.
A'n't? I declare! then you've beat meI
thought I could always tell 'em. Coit drew his
chair near to Eliot, and added, in an earnest tone,
The time is coming, captain, and that's what the
country is fighting for; for we can't say we are
desperately worried with the English yoke; but the
time is coming when one man that's no better than
his neighbour won't wear stars on his coat, and
another
that's no worse a collar round his neck; when
one won't be born with a silver spoon in his mouth,
and another with a pewter spoon, but all will start
fair, and the race will be to the best fellow.
Hey! Misser Eliot, cried Kisel, in his wonted
tone, when a ray of intelligence penetrated the
mists that enveloped his brain.
His shrill voice awakened the sleeper on the
settle, who, lifting up his shaggy head, asked
what all this cackling meant? Then seeming
to recover his self-possession, he keenly surveyed
Eliot and his man, covered his face with his
bandana
handkerchief, and again composed himself
to sleep.
Eliot, after securing a sleeping privilege for
Kisel, received from our friend Coit the best
unoccupied
blanket and pillow the house afforded;
and giving his fellow-lodgers, in seamen's phrase,
the best berth the width of the room admitted, he
was soon lost in the deep refreshing sleep
compounded
of youth, health, and a good conscience.
Our host was left to his own musings, which, as
he fixed his eye on Eliot's fine face, marked with
nature's aristocracy, were somewhat in the
following
strain: `Not of the born quality!'hum
well, he has that that is quality in the eye of God,
I guess. How he looked after his dumb beast,
and this poor creater here, that seems not to have
the wit of a brute; he's had the bringing up of a
gentleman, any how. I see it in his bearing, his
speech, his voice. Well, I guess my children will
live to see the day when the like of him will be
the only gentlemen in the land. The Almighty
must furnish the material, but the forming,
polishing
,
and currency, must be the man's own doings;
not his father's, or grandfather's, or the Lord knows
who.
While Coit pursues his meditations, destined
soon to be roughly broken, we offer our readers
some extracts from a letter which fortunately has
fallen into our hands, to authenticate our veritable
history. It was written by Mrs. Archer, of Beech
Hill, to her niece, Isabella Linwood.
No, no, my dear Belle, I cannot remove to the
cityit must not be; and I am sorry the question
is again mooted. `A woman, and naturally born
to fears,' I may be; but because I have that
inconvenient
inheritance, I see no reason why I
should cherish and augment it. Your
imagination
,
which is rather an active agent, has
magnified
the terrors of the times; and it seems just
now to be unduly excited by the monstrous tales
circulated in the city, of the atrocities the Yankees
have committed on the tories. I see in
Rivington's
Gazette, which you wrapped around the
sugarplums that you sent the children (thank you),
various precious anecdotes of Yankee tigers and
tory
lambs,
forsooth! that are just about as true
as the tales of giants and ogres with which your
childhood was edified. The Yankees are a
civilized
race, and never, God bless them! commit
gratuitous cruelties. If they still `see it to be
duty' (to quote their own Puritan phrase), they will
cling to this contest till they have driven the
remnant
of your Israel, Belle, every tory and
Englishman
,
from the land; but they will commit no
episodical murders: it is only the ignorant man
that is unnecessarily cruel. They are an instructed,
kind-hearted, Christian people; and of this there
will be abundant proof while the present war is
remembered
.
Remember, Belle, these people have
unadulterated English blood in their veins, which
to you should be a prevailing argument in their
favour
;
and believe me, they have a fair portion of
the spirit of their freedom-loving and all-daring
ancestors
.
Our English mother, God bless her, too,
should have known better than to trammel, scold,
and try to whip her sons into obedience, when
they had come to man's estate, and were fit to
manage their own household. Thank Heaven, I
have outlived the prejudices against the people of
New-England which my father transmitted to his
children. `There they come,' he used to say,
when he saw these busy people driving into the
manor; `every snow brings them, and, dn them,
every thaw too!'
What a pander to ignorance and malignity is
this same prejudice, Belle! How it disturbs the
sweet accords of nature, sacrilegiously severs the
bonds by which God has united man to man, and
breaks the human family into parties and sects!
How it clouds the intellect and infects the heart
with its earthborn vapours; so that the
Englishman
counts it virtue to scorn the American, and
the
true
American cherishes a hatred of the
Englishman
.
Our generous friends in the south look
with contempt on the provident, frugal sons of the
Puritans; and they, blinded in their turn, can see
nothing but the swollen pride of slave-owners and
22*
hard-heartedness of slave-drivers in their brethren
of the south. Even you, dear Belle, have not
escaped this
atmospheric
influence. After a
general
denunciation of the rebels, as you term the
country's troops, you say, in the letter now before
me, `of course, you have nothing to fear from the
British regulars;' and I reply, like the poor brute
in the fable, `Heaven save me from my friends!'
The British soldiers are aliens to the soil; they have
neither `built houses nor tilled lands' here; and
they cannot have the same kindly and home
feeling
that a native extends to the denizens of his
own land. Besides, they are, for the most part,
trained to the inhuman trade of war; and though
I have all due respect for English blood, and know
many of their officers to be most amiable and
accomplished men, I never see a detachment of
their troops, with their colours flying (and such
often pass within sight of us), without a sudden
coldness creeping over me. Then there are the
Jagers and other mercenaries that our friends have
brought over to fight out this family quarrelis
this right, Belle? You will suspect me of having
turned whigwell, keep your suspicion to
yourself
.
The truth is, that living isolated as I do, I
have a fairer point of view than you, surrounded as
you are by British officers and tories devoted to
the royal cause, and to you, my beautiful niece,
their elected sovereign.
My only substantial fear, after all, is of the
cowboys and skinners, more especially the last,
who have done some desperate deeds in my
neighbourhood
.
I have taken care to have it well
known that I have sent all my plate and valuables
to the city, and I hope and believe they will not
pay me a visit. Should they, however, a widow
and two blind children have little to dread from
creatures who are made in the image of God,
defaced
as that image may be. Defenceless
creatures
have a fortress in every human heart. No, I
repeat it, I cannot go to the city. You say I am
afraid of the shackles of city life! I confess, that
with my taste for freedom, and my long indulgence
in it, they would be galling to me. I could,
however
,
bear them without wincing to be near you,
but my children, Bellemy
blind
children! my
paramount duty is to them, and is prescribed and
absolute. In the city they are continually
reminded
of their privation, and the kinder their friends
the more manifold are the evidences of it; there
they feel that they are merely objects of
compassion
,
supernumeraries in the human family, who
can only receive, not give. Here they have
motives to exertions, dependants on their care.
Their fruits and flowers, doves, rabbits, chickens,
ducks, dogs, and kittens, live and thrive by them.
Nature is to them a perpetual study and delight.
I have just been walking with them over the hill
behind my house. You remember the hill is
fringed
with beech-trees, and crowned by their superior
forest brethren, the old tory oak, the legitimate
sovereign by the grace of God; the courtier elm
(albeit American!), that bows its graceful limbs to
every breeze; the republican maple, that resists all
hostility; and the evergreen pine, a loyalistis it,
Belle? well, be it so; it always wears the same
coat, but they say its heart is not the soundest!
Pardon me, we fall so naturally into political
allusions
in these times.
My children have learned so accurately to
discriminate
sounds, that as we walked over the hill,
they made me observe the variations of sound
when the breezes whispered among the light
beech-leaves
,
when they stole through the dense masses
of the maple foliage, fluttered over the pendent
stems of the elm, rustled along the polished
oak-leaves
,
and passed in soft musical sighs, like the
lowest breath of the olian harp, over the bristled
pines. Do you remember the lively little stream
that dashes around the rear of this hill, and
winding
quietly through the meadow at its base, steals
into the Hudson? They, in their rambles,
unattended
and fearless, have worn a footpath along
the margin of this stream, and wherever there
is a mossy rock, or fallen trunk of a tree, they
may be seen tying up wild flowers, or the arm of
each around the other, singing hymns and songs.
I have seen men with hard features and rough
hands arrested by the sound of their voices, and
as they listened, the tears trickling down their
weather-beaten faces. Can I fear for them, Belle?
They both delight in gardening; they love none
but flowers of sweet odour; no unperfumed flower,
however beautiful, is tolerated; but the lawn, the
borders of the walks, all their shady haunts, are
enamelled with mignionette, violets, lilies of the
valley, carnations, clove-pinks, and every
sweet-breathed
flower. The magnificent view of the
Hudson from the piazza they cannot see; but they
have wreathed the pillars with honeysuckles and
sweet-briers, and there they sit and enjoy the
southwest
breezes, the chief luxury of our climate.
Could I pen them up in a city, where they will
never walk into the fresh air but to be a spectacle,
and where they must be utterly deprived of the
ministration of nature through which God
communes
with their spirits? I am sure you will
acquiesce
in my decision, my dear Isabella. You
need not try to convince your father of my
rationality
;
the reasonableness of any woman is a
contradiction
in terms to him. Whatever may happen,
your mother will not reproach me: she will only
say again what she has so often said before, `that
she expected it, poor sister Mary was always so
odd.' This letter is all about myself. I have
anxieties too about you, but for the present I keep
them to myself. The bright empyrean of hope
is for youth to soar in, and your element shall not
be invaded by croakings from the bogs of
experience
.
Truly yours,
Mary Archer.
The same conveyance that transported this
letter, so full of resolution and trust, to Isabella,
carried her information of the events related in the
next chapter.
CHAPTER XVII.
We are men, my liege.
Ay, in the catalogue ye go for men.
Surprise
has sometimes been expressed by our
English friends who have travelled among us, that
the Americans should cherish such lively
recollections
of the war that achieved their independence,
when their countrymen had almost forgotten that
such a contest ever existed. They seem to have
forgotten, too, that while their part was enacted by
soldiers by profession and foreign mercenaries, our
battle was fought by our fathers, sons, and
brothers
;
that while the scene of action was three
thousand miles from them, it was in our
home-lots
and at our firesides; and above all, that while they
fought for the preservation of colonial possessions,
at best a doubtful good, we were contending for
national independencefor the right and power to
make the last and best experiment of popular
government
.
Such circumstances as it falls to our lot now
to relate, are not easily forgotten; and such, or
similar, occurred in some of the happiest homes
of our land.
Mrs. Archer was quietly sleeping with her
children
,
when she was awakened by unusual sounds
in the room below her; and immediately her maid,
who slept in the adjoining apartment, rushed in,
crying out that the house was full of menshe
heard them on the stairs, in the parlour, hall,
everywhere
!
Mrs. Archer sprang from the bed, threw on her
dressing-gown, bade the girl be quiet, and beware
of frightening the children; and then, as they,
startled by the noise, raised their heads from their
pillows, she told them, in a calm and decidedly
cheerful voice, that there were men in the house
who she believed had come to rob it, but that they
would neither do harm to them nor to her. She
then ordered her maid to light the candles on the
dressing-table, and again reassuring her trembling
children, who had meanwhile crept to her side, she
awaited the fearful visiters, whose footsteps she
heard on the staircase.
A fierce-looking wretch burst into the apartment.
The spectacle of the mother and her children
arrested
him, and he involuntarily doffed his cap. It
was a moment for a painter, if he could calmly
have surveyed the scene. The maid had shrunk
behind her mistress's chair, and kneeling there,
had grasped her gown with both hands, as if there
were safety in the touch. Poor little Lizzy's face
was hidden in her mother's bosom, and her fair
silken curls hung over her mother's dark
dressing-gown
.
Ned, at the sound of the opening door,
turned his sightless eyeballs towards the villain.
There was something manly and defying in his
air and erect attitude, something protecting in the
expression
of his arm as he laid it over his sister, while
the clinging of his other arm around his mother's
neck, indicated the defencelessness of childhood
and his utter helplessness. Mrs. Archer had
thrown aside her nightcap; her hair was twisted up
in a sort of Madona style; but not of the tame
Madona cast was her fine, spirited countenance,
which blended the majesty of the ideal Minerva
with the warmth and tenderness of the woman and
mother.
The marauder, on entering, paid her, as we have
said, an instinctive homage; but immediately
recovering
his accustomed insolence, he replied to
her calm demand, of what is your purpose?
To get what we can, and keep what we getmy
name is Hewson, which, if you've heard it, will be
a warrant to you that I sha'n't do my work by
halves.
The name of the skinner was too notorious
not to have been heard by Mrs. Archer. Her
blood ran cold, but she replied, without
faltering
,
Proceed to your work; the house is open to
you, not a lock in your way. Abby, give him
my purse off the dressing-tablethere is all the
money I have by menow leave my room, I pray
you.
Softly, mistresscatch old birds with chaff.
First surrender your watch, plate, and jewels,
which I take to be in this very room that you are
so choice of.
My watch, plate, and jewels, are in
New-York
.
The dl they are! Then emptying out and
counting the gold and silver the purse contained,
this will never do, he saidthis will not pay
the reckoninglive and let liveevery one to his
trade. He then proceeded, without further
ceremony
,
to rip open beds and mattresses, emptied the
contents of every box, trunk, and drawer, explored
every corner and recess as adroitly as a trained dog
would unearth his game, and seized on such light
articles as attracted his eye, grumbling and
swearing
all the time at being cheated and out-manuvred
by a woman; for in this light he seemed to view
the measures Mrs. Archer had taken to secure her
valuables.
In this humour he rejoined his comrades in the
dining-room; who he found, with the exception of
a few dozen silver spoons and forks, had had an
equally bootless search, and were now regaling
themselves with cold meats, etc., from the pantry.
Hey, boysalways after the provender before
you've done your work.
There's no work to be done, captainwe can't
carry off chairs and tablesso what's the use of
bothering? we've done our best, and nobody can
do better.
Your bestmaybe, Patbut your and my
best are two. We shall have whigs, tories, and
reg'lars
at our heels for this flash in the pan. He
strided up and down the room, kicking out of his
way whatever obstacle was in it, and muttering to
himself a plan he was revolving: Madam must
turn out the shiners, he concluded aloud.
VOL. I.M 23
Ay, captainbut how's the bird that won't sing
to be made to singshe is a cunning old one, I'm
thinking.
Old!Time has never made a track on her
yetcunning she may be, but I don't believe she
lied to meshe seems high as the stars above
thatbut if she has not got the money, boys, she
can get itI'll make her, tooI'll wager your soul
on that, Pat.
Wager your own, honey, that's forfeit to the
devil long ago.
A little more time was wasted in similar retorts,
well shotted, in their own phrase, with oaths, and
washed down with plentiful draughts of wine,
when the captain returned to Mrs. Archer's
apartment
.
I say, mistress, he began, his flushed
face and thickened voice indicating she had fresh
cause for alarm, I say we can't be choused
so if you want to save what's choicer than money,
he shook his fist with a tiger-like expression at
the children, you must have two hundred guineas
put under ground for me, on the north side of the
big oak, at the bridge, and that before Saturday night;
nobody to know it but youno living soul but
you and that gal thereno false play, remember.
Come, strike while the iron's hot, or we'll say three
hundred.
Mrs. Archer reflected for a moment. She would
have given a bond for any sum by which she
could relieve herself of the presence of the
outlaws
.
They had already produced such an effect
on little Lizzy, a timid, susceptible creature, that
she expected every moment to see her falling into
convulsions; and with this dread each moment
seemed an hour. She replied, that the money
should, without fail, be placed in the appointed spot.
That is not quite all, madam; I must have
security. I know how the like of you look on
promises made to the like of me. I got a rope as
good as round my neck by trusting to them once,
and no thanks to them that I slipped it. I'll clinch
the nail this timeI'll have security.
What security? demanded Mrs. Archer, the
colour for the first time forsaking her cheeks and
lips; for by the ruffian's glance, and a significant
up and down motion of his head, she guessed his
purpose.
A pawnI must have a pawnone of them
young ones. You need not screech and hold
on so, you little fools. If you behave, I'll not hurt
a hair of your head. The minute I handle the
money you shall have 'em back; but as sure as
my name's Sam Hewson, I'll make 'em a dead
carcass if you play me false.
You shall not touch my childrenany thing
elseask alltake allanything but my children.
Take all!ay, that we shallall we can take;
and as to asking, we mean to make sure of what
we ask`a bird in the hand,' mistress.
Oh, take my word, my oathspare my
children
!
Words are breath, and oaths breath peppered.
Your children are your life; and, one of them in our
M 2
hands, our secret is as safe with you as with us
we've no time to chaffermake one of them ready.
Oh, mother!mother! shrieked Lizzy,
clinging
round her mother's waist.
Hush, LizzyI'll go, said Edward.
Neither shall go, my childrenthey shall
take my life first.
The outlaw had advanced with the intention of
seizing one of them; but, awed by the resolution
of the mother, or perhaps touched by the
generosity
of the boy, he paused and retreated,
muttering
to himself, It's a rough jobPat shall do it.
He once more left the apartment and returned to
his comrades.
A sudden thought occurred to Mrs. Archer; a
faint hope dawned upon her. Bring me the horn
from the hall-table, she said to her servant. The
girl attempted to obey, but her limbs sunk under
her. Mrs. Archer disengaged herself from the
children
,
ran down the stairs, returned with the horn,
threw open her window, and blew three pealing
blasts. The outlaws were engaged in packing
their spoil.
Ha! exclaimed Hewson, it rings wellagain
again. Never mind; you'll wake nothing,
mistress
,
but the dogs, cocks, and owls. Hear how
they're at it!`bowwowwowthe beggars
are come to town,'ha, hawell done. But boys,
I say, we'd best be off soon. Pat, you know (he
had already communicated his plan to Pat), bring
down one of them young ones.
Pat wenthe lingered. Come, boys, hurry,
cried Hewson, who now began to apprehend the
possibility of a response to Mrs. Archer's
summons
:
what the dl ails that fellow?he went
to the staircase and called. Pat appeared; but
without the child, and looking as a wild beast
might, subdued by a charm. They're
blind,
captain
both
blind!
he said. I can't touch them
by all that's holy I can'tthere's not strength in
my arm to hold the sightless thingsthe one nor
the t'other of 'em.
Foolbaby! retorted Hewson, you know
we don't mean to hurt 'em.
Then do it yourself, captainI can't, and
there's an end on't.
Hewson hesitated. The image of the mother
and her blind children daunted even his fierce
spirit. An expedient occurred to him:A sure
way, he thought, of drowning feelings. In
ransacking the pantry he had seen a flask of
brandy, and then prudently concealed it from his
men. He now brought it forth, and passed it round
and round. It soon began its natural work:
consumed
in its infernal fires all intellectual power,
natural affection, domestic and pitiful emotion;
put out the light of Heaven, and roused the brute
passions of the men.
Hewson saw the potion working; their human
countenances changed to brutish form. It's a
dd shame,ant it, boys, said he, for this
tory madam to balk us?we shall have a hurra
23*
after us for this frolic, and nothing to showwe
might as well have robbed a farmhouse, and who
would have cared?
We'll tache her better, captain, said Pat;
we'll make an example of her, as the judges say
in Ireland when they hang the lads. I'll give her
a blow over the head, if you say so, handy like
or wring the chickens' necksit's asy done.
Pshaw, Patit's only your asses of judges
that think examples of any use. If we hook one
of the chickens, you know, Pat, she'll be glad to
buy it back with the yallow shiners, boy, that's
lodged safe in Yorkfifty a pieceshare and
share alikemy turn is it?here's to you, boys
a short life and a merry one. I've charged 'em
up to the mark, thought he; and in raising the flask
to his lips, it slipped through his hands and was
broken to fragments. Ah, my men! there's a sign
for uswe may have a worse slip than that `'tween
the cup and the lip:' so let's be offcome, Pat.
Shall I fetch 'em both, captain?
No, noone is as good as a thousand. But
stay, Pat. Drunk as they are, thought Hewson,
I'll not trust them in the sound of the mother's
screeches. First, Pat, let's have all ready for a
starttie up your bags, boys, come.
The men's brains were so clouded, that it seemed
to Hewson they were an eternity in loading their
beasts with their booty. Delay after delay occurred;
but finally all was ready, and he gave the signal to
Pat.
Pat now obeyed to the letter. He mounted the
stairs, sprang like a tiger on his prey, and returned
with Lizzy, already an unconscious burden, in his
arms. One piercing shriek Hewson heard
proceeding
from Mrs. Archer's apartment, but not
another sound. It occurred to him that Pat might
have committed the murder he volunteered; and
exclaiming, The blundering Irish rascal has
kicked the pail over! he once more ascended the
stairs to assure himself of the cause of the
ominous
silence. Edward was in the adjoining
apartment
when Lizzy was wrested from her mother's
arms. He was recalled by Mrs. Archer's scream;
and when Hewson reached the apartment, he found
Mrs. Archer lying senseless across the threshold
of the door, and Edward groping around, and
calling
,
Mother!Lizzy!where are you?do
speak, mother!
A moment after, Mrs. Archer felt her boy's arms
around her neck. She returned to a consciousness
of her condition, and heard the trampling of the
outlaws' horses as they receded from her dwelling.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Good vent'rous youth,
I love thy courage yet, and bold emprise.
Captain
!Captain Lee! don't you hear that
horn? said Gurdon Coit, shaking our
soundly-sleeping
friend Eliot.
Yes, thank you, I hear it;it's daylight, is it?
No, no; but there's something to pay up at
Madam Archer's. Those devils you met on the
road, I doubt, are therethe lights have been
glancing about her rooms this hour, and now
they've blown the hornthere's mischief, depend
on't.
Why in the name of Heaven did not you wake
me sooner? exclaimed Eliot. Rouse up these
fellowswake that snoring wretch on the settle,
and we'll to her aid instantly.
The offensive snoring ceased as Coit
whispered
,
No, don't wake himedge-tools, you know
He then proceeded to wake the men from West
Point, who were sleeping on the floor. Eliot, as
they lifted their heads, recognised themthe one a
common soldier, the other a certain Ensign Tooler
a man who had the most disagreeable
modification
of Yankee character; knowingness
overlaid
with conceit, and all the self-preserving virtues
concentrated in selfishness, as bad liquor is distilled
from wholesome grain. Tooler, is that you?
exclaimed Eliotand you, Mason? up instantly!
and he explained the occasion for their prompt
service.
And who is this Madam Archer? asked
Tooler, composedly resting his elbow on the floor.
She is a woman in need of our protection.
This is enough for us to know, replied Eliot,
discreetly
evading more explicit information.
She lives in the big house on the hill, don't
she?
Yes, yes.
Then I guess we may as well leave her to her
luck, for she belongs to the tory side.
Good Heavens, Tooler!do you hesitate?
Mason, go with me if you have the soul of a man.
Lie still, Mason, we're under orders,Captain
Lee must answer for himself. It's none of our
business if he's a mind to go off fighting windmills;
but duty is duty, and we'll keep to the straight and
narrow path.
Cowardly, canting wretch! exclaimed Eliot.
I'm no coward, Captain Eliot Lee, and if Coit
will say that Madam Archer is on our side, and
you'll undertake to answer to General Washington
for all consequences, I'll not hinder Mason's joining
you.
The terms were impracticable. There was no
time to be lost: You will go with me, Coit?
said Eliot.
Why, Captain Lee, it's a venturesome
business
.
M 3
Yes or no, Coit! not an instant's delay.
I'll go, Captain Lee,I'm not a brute.
Mason did not quite relish the consciousness of
acting like a brute, and he half rose, balancing in
his mind the shame of remaining, against the risk
of disobeying his ensign's orders. Lie still,
Mason, said Tooler; mind me and you're safe
I'll take care of number one.
The person on the settle now sprang up and
poured
a torrent of vituperative oaths and invectives on
Tooler. Tooler looked up with the abject
expression
of a barking cur when he hears his master's
voice. Why, gen'ral, said he, if I had known
Don't gen'ral me!don't defile my name with
your lips! A pretty fellow you, to prate of duty
and orders in the very face of the orders of the
Almighty commander-in-chief, to remember the
widows and fatherless in their affliction. I
always
mistrust your fellows that cant about duty.
They'll surrender the post at the first go off, and
then expect conscience to let them march out with
the honours of war.
I'm ready to go, sir,ready and willing, if you
say so.
No, by George!I'd rather fight
single-handed
with fifty skinners, than have one such
cowardly
devil as you at my side. All this was said
while the gen'ral was putting on his coat and hat,
and arming himself; are we ready, Captain
Lee? he concluded.
Perfectly, replied Eliot, wondering who this
sturdy authoritative auxiliary might be, but not
venturing to ask, as he thought the gen'ral had
implied his wish to remain incognito, and really not
caring at this moment whose arm it was, provided
it was raised in Mrs. Archer's defence. After one
keen survey of the gen'ral's person, he
concluded
,
I never have seen him. He had not. Once
seen, that frank, fearless countenance was never to
be forgotten; neither could one well forget the
broad, brawny, working-day frame that sustained
it, or the peculiar limp (caused by one leg being
shorter than the other), the only imperfection and
marring of the figure of our rustic Hercules.
In an instant they were mounted, and in five
minutes more, the distance not much exceeding
half a mile, they were entering Mrs. Archer's
hall. An ominous silence reigned there. The
house was filled with smoke, through which the
lighted candles, left by Hewson's crew, faintly
glimmered, and exposed the relics of their feast,
with other marks of their forray. A bright light
shone through the crevices of the pantry door;
Coit opened it, and immediately the flames of a
fire which had been communicated (whether
intentionally
,
was never ascertained) to a chest of linen
burst forth. Good Heaven! where are the
family
!
exclaimed Eliot and his companion, in a breath.
Follow me, cried Coit, leading the way to
Mrs. Archer's apartment, and shouting fire!
His screams were answered by the female
servants
,
who now rushed from their mistress's
apartment
.
Where's your lady? demanded the
general. They were too much bewildered to
reply
,
and both he and Eliot followed Coit's lead,
and all three paused at the threshold of Mrs.
Archer's door, paralyzed by the spectacle of the
mother, sitting perfectly motionless with her boy in
her arms, and looking like a statue of despair.
The general was the first to recover his voice.
Lord of Heaven, madam! he exclaimed, your
house is on fire!
She made no reply whatever. She seemed not
even to hear him. Where is the little girl?
asked
Coit.
Mrs. Archer's face slightly convulsed. Her boy
sprang from her arms at the sound of a familiar
voice,Oh, Mr. Coit, he cried, they've taken
off Lizzy!
The crackling of the advancing flames, and
the pouring in of volumes of smoke, prevented
any farther explanation at the moment. The
instinct of self-preservation, awakened in some
degree, renerved Mrs. Archer; and half sustained
by Eliot's arm, she and her boy were conducted to
an office detached from the house, and so far
removed
from it as to be in no danger from the
conflagration. In the meantime the general had
ascertained from the servants all that could be
learned of the direction the skinners had taken,
and that they were not more than fifteen minutes
in advance of them. He and Coit had remounted
their horses, and he was hallooing to Eliot to join
them:Come, young man, he cried, let's do
what's to be done at once, and cry afterward, if
cry we must.
Recover her! said Mrs. Archer, repeating the
last words of Eliot's attempt to revive her hopes
her lifeless body you mayGod grant it!
She paused, and shuddered. She still felt the
marble touch of Lizzy's cheekstill saw her head
and limbs drop as the ruffian seized her.
Eliot understood her: My dear madam, he
said, she has fainted from terror, nothing more;
she will be well again when she feels your arm
around hertake courage, I beseech you.
It is not in the heart of woman to resist such
inspiring
sympathy as was expressed in Eliot's face
and voice. If Mrs. Archer did not hope, there was
something better than despair in the feeling of
intense
expectation that concentrated all sensation.
She seemed unconscious of the flames that were
devouring her house. She did not hear the boyish
exclamations with which Edward, as he heard the
falling rafters and tumbling chimneys, interspersed
his sobs for poor Lizzy; nor the clamorous
cryings
of the servants, which would break out afresh
as they remembered some favourite article of
property
consuming in the flames.
A few yards from Mrs. Archer's house, a road
diverged from that which our pursuers had taken.
They halted for a moment, when Coit, who was
familiar with the localities of the vicinity, advised
to taking the upper road. They both, he said,
came out in one at a distance of about three
miles. They would thus avoid giving the forward
24
party any warning of their approach, and their
horses being the freshest and fleetest, they might
possibly arrive at the junction of the roads first,
and surprise the skinners from an ambush.
Lucky for us that there is another road,
replied
the general, as, conforming to Coit's
suggestion
,
they turned into it. The rascals we're after
are foxes, and would be sure to escape if they heard
the hounds behind them.
I should think, from my observation of their
horses, replied Eliot, they have small chance
of escaping us in a long pursuit.
There I think you mistake; they get their
jades for no
vartu
under heaven but running
away, and I've heard of their distancing horses that
looked equal to mine; speed a'n't Charlie's forte,
though, he added, in a half audible voice; and
patting his beast lovingly, you've done a feat at
it once, Charlie. They know all the holes and
hiding-places in the country, he continued, and
I have heard of their disappearing as suddenly as
if the ground had opened and swallowed them up
I wish it wouldthe
varmin!
Had we not best try the mettle of our horses?
asked Eliot, who felt as if his companions were
taking the matter too coolly.
If you please.
The general put up his Bucephalus to his utmost
speed; but in spite of the feat his master boasted,
he seemed to have been selected for other virtues
than fleetness, for both Eliot and Coit soon passed
him, and so far outrode him as not to be able
to discern the outline of the rider's figure when
they reached the junction of the roads where they
hoped to intercept the skinners. They had
perceived
the faintest streak of dawn, while they could
see the eastern horizon and the morning star
trembling
and glittering above it. Now they entered a
little wood of thick-set pines and hemlocks, and
the darkness of midnight seemed to thicken around
them.
Hark! cried Eliot, suddenly haltingdon't
you hear the trampling of horses?
Yes, replied Coit, there is a bridge just
ahead; let us secure a position as near it as
possible
.
They moved on, and after advancing a few
yards, again halted, still remaining under cover
of the wood. We are within twenty feet of the
other road, resumed Coit; it runs along just
parallel to where we stand, and a few feet below
us; there is a small stream of water on the other
side of the pines, which we pass over by the bridge
as we fall into the other road; the rub will be to
get on to the bridge before they see usI wish
the general would come up!
We must not wait for him, Coit.
Not wait for him! replied Coit, whose valour
was at least tempered by discretion, we are but
two to five, and they such devils!
We have Heaven on our sidewe must not
wait a breathwe
must
intercept them; follow me
when I give the spurs to my horse.
Oh, if he would but come up! thought Coit;
this young man is as brave as a lion, but the
general
is
a lion!
The skinners had now approached so near to our
friends that they fancied they heard the hard
breathing of their horses. They halted at the
brook, and Eliot distinctly heard Hewson say to
Pat, Don't she come to yet?
I can't just sayonce or twice she opened
her sightless eyes like, and she gasped, but she's
corpse-cold; and captain, I say, I don't like the feel
of her; I am afeard I shall drop her, there's such
a wonderful weight in her little body.
You cowardly fool!
By the soul of my mother, it's truetry once
the lift of her!
Pshaw! I've twice her weight in this bundle
before me. Hold up her head while I dash some
water in her face; they say the breath will go
entirely
if you let it stop too long. Hewson then
dismounted, took from his pocket a small silver
cup he had abstracted from Mrs. Archer's pantry,
and was stooping to fill it, when he was arrested
by the appearance of his pursuers.
Now is our time! cried Eliot, urging his
horse down the descent that led to the bridge.
There the animal instinctively stopped. The
bridge was old, the rotten planks had given way,
and as destruction, not reparation, was the natural
work of those troubled times, the bridge had been
suffered to remain impassable. Eliot looked up
and down the stream; it was fordable, but the
banks, though not high, were precipitous and
ragged
.
Eliot measured the gap in the bridge
accurately
with his eye: My horse can leap it, was
his conclusion, and he gave him voice, whip, and
spur. The animal, as if he felt the inspiration of
his master's purpose, made a generous effort and
passed the vacant space. Eliot did not look back
to see if he were followed. He did not heed Coit's
exclamation, you're lost! nor did he hear the
general, who, on arriving at the bridge, cried, God
help you, my boy!I can'tmy beast can't do it
with my weight on himfollow me, Coit, and he
turned to retrace his steps to a point where, as he
had marked in stopping to water his horse, the
stream was passable.
Eliot was conscious of but one thought, one
hope, one purposeto rescue the prey from the
villains. He had an indistinct impression that
their numbers were not complete. He aimed his
pistol at Patrick's headthe bullet spednot a
sound escaped the poor wretch. He raised
himself
upright in his stirrups, and fell over the side
of the horse, dragging the child with him.
At this moment two horsemen passed between
Eliot and Pat, and one of them, dropping his
bridle and stretching out his arms, screamed,
Misser Eliotoh, Misser Eliot!
It was poor Kisel, but vain was his appeal. One
of the men smartly lashed Kisel's horse:
Linwood's
spirited gray darted forward as if he had
been starting on a race-course; and Kisel was
fain to cling to him by holding fast to his mane, so
24*
strong is instinct, though if he had deliberately
chosen between death and separation from his
master
,
he certainly would have chosen the former.
Meanwhile Hewson, springing forward like a
cat, and disengaging the child from Pat's
death-grasp
,
cried, Fire on him, boys!beat him down.
and re-mounted his horse, intending to pass Eliot,
aware that his policy was to get off before the
attacking
party should, as he anticipated, be
re-enforced
.
Eliot, however, prevented this movement
by placing himself before him, drawing his sword,
and putting Hewson on the defence.
Hewson felt himself shackled by the child, and
he was casting her off, when, changing his purpose,
he placed her as a shield before his person, and
again ordered his men to fire. They had been
ridding
themselves of the spoils that encumbered
them, and now obeyed. Both missed their mark.
Dn your luck, boys! cried Hewson, who
was turning his horse to the right and left to avoid
a side stroke from Eliot, out with your knives
cut him down!
To defend himself and prevent Hewson from
passing him, was now all that Eliot attempted; but
this he did with coolness and consummate
adroitness
,
till his horse received a wound in his throat that
was aimed at his master, and fell dead under him.
That's it, boys! screamed Hewson, finish
him and follow me. But before the words had well
passed his lips, a bullet fired from behind
penetrated
his spine. I am a dead man! he groaned.
His men saw him reeling; they saw Eliot's
auxiliaries close upon them; and without waiting
to take advantage of his defenceless condition, they
fled and left their comrade-captain to his fate.
The general was instantly beside Eliot. Coit
received the child from the ruffian's relaxed hold.
Oh, help me! he supplicated; for the love of
God, help me!
Poor little one, said Coit, laying Lizzy's cheek
gently to his, she's gone.
Oh, I have not killed her! I did not mean she
should be harmedI swear I did not, continued
Hewson. Oh, help me! I'll give you gold,
watches
,
silver, and jewelsI'll give them all to you.
You are wounded, my dear boy, you are
covered with blood, said the general to Eliot, as
he succeeded in disengaging him from the
super-incumbent
burden of his horse.
It's nothing, sir; is the child living?
Nothing! bless your soul, the blood is dripping
down here like rain. While he was drawing off
Eliot's coat-sleeve, and stanching his wound,
Hewson
continued his abject cries.
Oh, gentlemen, he said, take pity on me;
my life is goingI'll give you heaps of goldit's
buried ininin His utterance failed him.
Can nothing be done for the poor creature?'
said Eliot, turning to Hewson, after having bent
over Lizzy, lifted her lifeless hand, and again
mournfully dropped it.
We will see, replied the general, though it
seems to me, my friend, you are in no case to look
after another; and this car'on is not worth
looking
after; but come, we'll strip him and examine
his woundlife is lifeand he's asked for mercy,
what we must all ask for sooner or later. Ah,
he continued, after looking at the wound, he's
called to the general musterpoorly equipped to
answer the roll. But come, friendsthere's no use
in staying herethere's no substitute in this
warfare
every
man must answer for himself.
Oh! groaned the dying wretch, don't leave
me alone.
'Tis a solitary business to die alone, said
Coit, looking compassionately at Hewson as he
writhed on the turf.
It is so, Coit; but he that has broken all bonds
in life can expect nothing better than to die like a
dog, and go to the devil at last. I must be back
at my post, you at yours, and our young friend
on his way to the camp, if he is able. General
Washington a'n't fond of his envoys' striking out
of the highway when they are out on duty. There's
no usethere's no use, he continued to Eliot, who
had kneeled beside the dying man, and was
whispering
such counsel as a compassionate being
would naturally administer to a man in his
extremity
.
Repent! cried Hewson, grasping Eliot's arm
as he was about to rise; repent!what's that?
Mercy, mercyOh, it's all dark; I can't see you.
Don't hold that dead child so close to me!
take it away! Mercy, is there?speak louder
I can't hear youoh, I can't feel you!Mercy!
mercy!
He's donethe poor cowardly rascal, said
the general, who, inured to the spectacle of death,
felt no emotion excited by the contortions of animal
suffering, and who, deeming cowardice the proper
concomitant of crime, heard without any painful
compassion those cries of the wretched culprit, as
he passed the threshold to eternal justice, which
contracted Eliot's brow, and sent a shuddering
through his frame.
There's something to feel for, said the
general
,
pointing to Eliot's prostrate horse; if ever
I cried, I should cry to see a
spereted,
gentle beast
like that cut off by such villanous hands.
Poor Rover! thought Eliot, as he loosed his
girth, and removed the bits from his mouth, how
Sam and Hal will cry, poor fellows, when they
hear of your fate. Ah, I could have wished you
a longer life and a more glorious end; but you
have done well your appointed tasks, and they are
finished.Would to God it were thus with that
wretch, my fellow-creature!
You're finding this rather a tough job, I'm
thinking, said the general, stooping to assist Eliot;
our horses, especially in these times, are friends;
and it's what Coit would call a solitary business
to have to mount into that rogue's seat. But see
how patiently the beast stands by his master, and
how he looks at him! Do you believe, he added,
in a lowered voice, that the souls of these noble
critters,
that have thought, affection, memoryall
that we have, save speech, will perish; and that
low villain's live for ever?I don't.
Eliot only smiled in reply; but he secretly
wondered
who this strange being should be, full of
generous feeling and bold speculation, who had
the air of accustomed authority, and the voice and
accent indicating rustic education. It was evident
he meant to maintain his incognito; for when they
arrived at a road which, diverging from that they
were in, led more directly to Coit's (the same road
that had proved fatal to poor Kisel), he said, that
he must take the shortest cut; and that if Eliot felt
equal to carrying the poor child the distance that
remained he should be particularly glad, as Coit's
attendance was important to him.
Eliot would far rather have been disabled than
to have witnessed the mother's last faint hope
extinguished
;
but he was not, and he received the
child from Coit, who had carried her as tenderly as
if she had been still a conscious, feeling, and
suffering
being.
Coit charged Eliot with many respectful
messages
to Mrs. Archer, such as, that his house was at
her disposalhe would prepare it for the funeral,
or see that she and her family were safely
conveyed
to a British frigate which lay below, in case
she preferred, as he supposed she would, laying
her child in the family vault of Trinity Church.
Eliot remembered the messages, but he delivered
them as his discretion dictated.
As he approached Mrs. Archer's grounds, he
inferred from the diminished light that the flames
had nearly done their work; and when he issued
from the thick wood that skirted her estate, he saw
in the smouldering ruins all that was left of her
hospitable and happy mansion. Ah, thought he,
a fit home for this lifeless little body!
He turned towards the office where he had left
the mother. She was awaiting him at the door.
It seemed to her that she had lived a thousand
years in the hour of his absence. She asked no
questionsa single glance at the still, colourless
figure of her child had sufficed. She uttered no
sound, but stretching forth her arms, received her,
and sunk down on the doorstep, pressing her close
to her bosom.
Edward had sprung to the door at the first sound
of the horse's hoofs. He understood his mother's
silence. He heard the servants whispering, in
suppressed voices, She's dead! He placed his
hand on Lizzy's cheek: at first he recoiled at the
touch; and then again drawing closer, he sat down
by his mother, and dropped his head on Lizzy's
bosom, crying out, I wish I were dead too!
His bursts of grief were frightful. The servants
endeavoured to sooth himhe did not hear them.
Her mother laid her face to his, and the touch of
her cheek, after a few moments, tranquillized him.
He became quiet; then suddenly lifting his head,
he shrieked, Her heart beats, mother! her heart
beats!Lay your hand theredo you not feel it?
It does, it does, mother; I feel it, and hear it
too!
Eliot had dismounted from his horse, and stood
with folded arms, watching with the deep
sympathy
of his affectionate nature the progress of this
family tragedy, while he awaited a moment when
he might offer such services as Mrs. Archer needed.
He thought it possible that the sharpened senses
of the blind boy had detected a pulsation not
perceptible
to senses less acute. He inquired of the
servants for salts, brandy, vinegar, any of the
ordinary stimulants; nothing had been saved--
nothing was left but the elements of fire and water.
These suggested to his quick mind the only and
very best expedient. In five minutes a warm bath
was prepared, and the child immersed in it. Mrs.
Archer was re-nerved when she saw others acting
from a hope she scarcely dared admit. "Station
yourself here, my dear madam," said Eliot; " there,
put your arm in the place of mine--let your little
boy go on the other side and take her hand--let
her first conscious sensation be of the touch most
familiar and dear to her--let the first sounds she
hears be your voices--nothing must be strange to
her. I do believe this is merely the overpowering
effect of terror; I am sure she has suffered no
violence. Put your hand again on her bosom, my
dear little fellow--do you feel the beats now?"
"Oh yes, sir! stronger and quicker than before."
"I believe you are right ; but be cautious, I
entreat you--make no sudden outcry nor
exclamation
."
Mrs. Archer's face was as colourless as the
child's over whom he was bending; and her fixed
eye glowed with such intensity, that Eliot thought
it might have kindled life in the dead. Suddenly,
he perceived the blood gush into her cheeks--he
advanced one step nearer, and he saw that a
faint suffusion, like the first almost
imperceptible
tinge of coming day, had overspread the child's
face. It deepened around her lips--there was a
slight distention of the nostrils--a tremulousness
about the muscles of the mouth--a heaving of
the bosom, and then a deep-drawn sigh. A
moment
passed, and a faint smile was perceptible
on the quivering lip. "Lizzy!" said her mother.
"Dear Lizzy!" cried her brother.
"Mother!--Ned!" she faintly articulated.
"Thank God, she is safe!" exclaimed Eliot.
The energies of nature, once aroused, soon did
their beneficent work; and the little girl, in the
perfect consciousness of restored safety and
happiness
,
clung to her mother and to Edward.
The tide of gratitude and happiness naturally
flowed towards Eliot. Mrs. Archer turned to
express something of all she felt, but he was
already gone, after having directed one of the
servants to say to her mistress that Coit would
immediately be at her bidding.
It was not strange that the impression Eliot
left on Mrs. Archer's mind was that of the most
beautiful personation of celestial energy and mercy.
END OF VOL. I.Letter
Dearest Isabella,
You must love me, or you could not endure my
stupid lettersyou that can write so delightfully
about nothing, and have so much to write about,
while I can tell nothing but what I see, and I see
so little! The outward world does not much
interest
me. It is what I
feel
that I think of and
ponder over; but I know how you detest what you
call sentimental letters, so I try to avoid all such
subjects. Compared with you I am a childtwo
years at our age makes a great differenceI am
really very childish for a girl almost fourteen, and
yet, and yet, Isabella, I sometimes seem to myself
to have gone so far beyond childhood, that I have
almost forgotten that careless, light-hearted feeling
I used to have. I do not think I ever was so
light-hearted
as some children, and yet I was not
seriousat least, not in the right way. Many a
time, before I was ten years old, I have sat up in
my own little room till twelve o'clock Saturday
night, reading, and then slept for an hour and a
half through the whole sermon the next morning.
I do believe it is the natural depravity of my
heart. I never read over twice a piece of heathen
poetry that moves me but I can repeat itand
yet, I never could get past `what is effectual
calling
?'
in the Westminster Catechism; and I always
was in disgrace on Saturday, when parson Wilson
came to the school to hear us recite it:oh dear,
the sight of his wig and three-cornered hat
petrified
me!
Jasper Meredith is here, passing the vacation
with Eliot. I was frightened to death when Eliot
wrote us he was comingwe live in such a
homely wayonly one servant, and I remember
well how he used to laugh at every thing he called
la bourgeoise
. I felt this to be a foolish,
vulgar
pride, and did my best to suppress it; and since I
have found there was no occasion for it, for Jasper
seemed (I do not mean
seemed,
I think he is much
more sincere than he used to be) to miss nothing,
and to be delighted with being here. I do not
think he realizes that I am now three years older
than I was in New-York, for he treats me with
that sort of partialitydevotion you might almost
call itthat he used to there, especially when you
C 2
and he had had a falling out. He has been giving
me some lessons in Italian. He says I have a
wonderful talent for learning languages, but it is
not so: you know what hobbling work I made
with the French when you and I went to poor old
Mademoiselle AmandJasper is quite a different
teacher, and I never fancied French. He has been
teaching me to ride, toowe have a nice little
pony, and he has a beautiful horseso that we
have the most delightful gallops over the country
every day. It is very odd, though I am such a
desperate coward, I never feel the least timid when
I am riding with Jasperindeed, I do not think of
it. Eliot rarely finds time to go with uswhen
he is at home from college he has so much to do
for motherdear Eliot, he is husband, father,
brother, every thing to us.
I had not time, while Jasper and Eliot stayed,
to finish my letter, and since they went away I
have been so dull!The house seems like a tomb.
I go from room to room, but the spirit is not here.
Master Hale, the schoolmaster, boards with us,
and gives me lessons in some branches that Eliot
thinks me deficient in; but ah me! where are the
talents for acquisition that Jasper commended?
Did you ever know, dear Isabella, what it was to
have every thing affected by the departure of
friends, as nature is by the absence of lightall
fade into one dull uniform hue. When Eliot and
Jasper were here, all was bright and interesting
from the rising of the sun to the going down
thereof
now!ah
me!
I am shocked to find how much I have written
about myself. My best respects to your father
and mother, and love to Herbert. Burn this
worthless
scrawl without fail, dear Isabella, and believe
me ever most affectionately
Yours,
Bessie Lee
.Jasper Meredith to Herbert Linwood.
Dear Linwood,
I have been enjoying a very pretty little
episode
in my college life, passing the vacation at
Westbrook, with your old friends the Lees. A
month in a dull little country town would once
have seemed to me penance enough for my worst
sin, but now it is heaven to get anywhere beyond
the sound of college bellsbeyond the reach of
automaton tutorsperiodical recitationschapel
prayers, and college rules.
I went to the Lees with the pious intention of
quizzing your rustics to the top o' my bent; but
Herbert, my dear fellow, I'll tell you a secret; when
people respect themselves, and value things
according
to their real intrinsic worth, it gives a shock to
our artificial and worldly estimates, and makes us
feel as if we stood upon a wonderful uncertain
5*
foundation. These Lees are so strong in their
simplicity
they
would so disdain aping and imitating
those that we (not they, be sure!) think above them
they are so sincere in all their waysno
awkward
consciousnessno shame-facedness
whatever
about the homely details of their family
affairs. By heavens, Herbert, I could not find a
follya meannessor even a ludicrous rusticity
at which to aim my ridicule.
I begin to thinkno, no, no, I do notbut, if
there were many such families as these Lees in
the world, an equality, independent of all
extraneous
circumstances (such as the politicians of this
country are now ranting about), might subsist on
the foundation of intellect and virtue.
After all, I see it is a mere illusion. Mrs. Lee's
rank, though in Westbrook she appears equal to
any Roman matron, is purely local. Hallowed as
she is in your boyish memory, Herbert, you must
confess she would cut a sorry figure in a
New-York
drawing-room.
Eliot might pass current anywhere; but then
he has had the advantage of Boston society, and
an intimacy withpardon my coxcombryyour
humble servant. Bessiesweet Bessie Lee, is a
gem fit to be set in a coronet. Don't be alarmed,
Herbert, you are welcome to have the setting of
her. There is metal,
as you know,
more attractive
to me. Bessie is not much grown since she was
in New-Yorkshe is still low in stature, and so
childish in her person, that I was sometimes in
danger of treating her like a childof forgetting
that she had come within the charmed circle of
proprieties. But, if she has still the freshness and
immaturity of the unfolding rose-budthe
mystical
charm of womanthe divinity stirring within
her beams through her exquisite features. Such
features! Phidias would have copied them in his
immortal marble. How in the world should such
a creature, all sentiment, refinement, imagination,
spring up in practical, prosaic New-England!
She is a wanderer from some other star. I am
writing like a lover, and not as I should to a lover.
But, on my honour, Herbert, I am no loverof
little Bessie I mean. I should as soon think of
being
enamoured of a rose, a lily, or a violet, an
exquisite
sonnet, or an abstraction.
It is an eternity since Isabella has written me
a postscriptwhy is this? Farewell, Linwood.
Yours, &c.
P.S.One word on politicsa subject I
detest
,
and meddle with as little as possible. There
must be an outbreakthere is no avoiding it. But
there can be no doubt which party will finally
prevail
.
The mother country has soldiers, money,
every thing; `'tis odds beyond arithmetic.' As one
of my friends said at a dinner in Boston the other
day, `the growling curs may bark for a while, but
they will be whipped into submission, and wear
their collars patiently for ever after.' I trust,
Herbert
,
you are already cured of what my uncle used
to call the `boy-fever'but if not, take my
advice
be
quiet, prudent,
neutral
. As long as we
are called boys, we are not expected to be patriots,
apostles, or martyrs. At this crisis your filial and
fraternal
duties require that you should suppress, if
not renounce, the opinions you used to be so fond
of blurting out on all occasions. I am no preacher
I have donea
word
to the wise.
M.Letter
Dear Isabella,
Never say another word to
me of what you hinted in your last letter: indeed,
I am too young; and besides, I never should feel
easy or happy again with Jasper, if I admitted
such a thought. I have had but one opinion since
our visit to Effie; not that I believed in herat
least, not much; but I have always known who
was first in his thoughtsheartopinion; and
besides
,
it would be folly in me, knowing his opinions
about rank, &c. Mother thinks him very proud,
and somewhat vain; and she begins not to be
pleased with his frequent visits to Westbrook. She
thinksno, fears, or rather she imagines, that
Jasper
and Ino, that Jasper
or
Ino, that I
it is quite too foolish to write, Isabellamother
does not realize what a wide world there is between
us. I might possibly, sometimes, think he loved
(this last word was carefully effaced, and cared
substituted) cared for me, if he did not know you.
How could Jasper tell you of Eliot's
prejudice
against you? Jasper himself infused it,
unwittingly
,
I am sure, by telling him that when
with you, I lived but to do `your best pleasure,
were it to fly, to swim, or dive into the fire.'
Eliot fancies that you are proud and overbearing
I insist, dear Isabella, that such as you are born
to rule such weak spirits as mine; but Eliot says
he does not like absolutism in any form, and
especially
in woman's. Ah, how differently he would
feel if he were to see youI am sure you would
like himI am not sure, even, that you would not
have preferred him to Jasper, had he been born
and bred in Jasper's circumstances. He has more
of some qualities that you particularly like,
frankness
and independenceand mother says (but
then mother is not at all partial to Jasper) he has
a thousand times more real sensibilityhe does,
perhaps, feel more for others. I should like to
know which you would think the handsomest.
Eliot is at least three inches the tallest; and, as
Jasper once said, `cast in the heroic mould, with
just enough, and not an ounce too much of
mortality'
but
then Jasper has such grace and
symmetry
just
what I fancy to be the beau-ideal of
the arts. Jasper's eyes are almost too blacktoo
piercing; and yet they are softened by his long
lashes, and his olive complexion, so expressive
C 3
like that fine old portrait in your drawing-room.
His mouth, too, is beautifulit has such a defined,
chiselled lookbut then do you not think that his
teeth being so delicately formed, and so very, very
white, is rather a defect? I don't know how to
describe
it, but there is rather an uncertain expression
about his mouth. Eliot's, particularly when he
smiles, is truth and kindness itselfand his deep,
deep blue eye, expresses every thing by turnsI
mean every thing that should come from a pure and
lofty spiritnow tender and pitiful enough for me,
and now superb and fiery enough for youbut what
a silly, girlish letter I am writing`Out of the
abundance of the heart,' you know! I see nobody
but Jasper and Eliot, and I think only of them.Thanks, dear Isabella, for your delightful letter
by Jasperno longer Jasper, I assure you to his
face, but Mr. Meredithoh, I often wish the time
back when I was a child, and might call him
Jasper
,
and feel the freedom of a child. I wonder if
I should dare to call you Belle now, or even
Isabella
?
Jasper, since his last visit at home, tells me
so much of your being `the mirror of fashion
the observed of all observers' (these are his own
wordsdrawing-room terms that were never heard
in Westbrook but from his lips), that I feel a sort of
fearful shrinking. It is not envyI am too happy
now to envy anybody in the wide world. Eliot is
at home, and Jasper is passing a week here. Is it
not strange they should be so intimate, when they
differ so widely on political topics? I suppose it
is because Jasper does not care much about the
matter; but this indifference sometimes provokes
Eliot. Jasper is very intimate with Pitcairn and
Lord Percy; and Eliot thinks they have more
influence
with him than the honour and interest of
his country. Oh, they talk it over for hours and
hours, and end, as men always do with their
arguments
,
just where they began. Jasper insists that
as long as the quarrel can be made up it is much
wisest to stand aloof, and not, `like mad boys, to
rush foremost into the first fray;' besides, he says
he is tied by a promise to his uncle that he will
have nothing to do with these agitating disputes
till his education is finished. Mother says (she
does not always judge Jasper kindly) that it is very
easy and
prudent
to bind your hands with a promise
when you do not choose to lift them.
Ah, there is a terrible storm gathering! Those
who have grown up together, lovingly interlacing
their tender branches, must be torn asundersome
swept away by the current, others dispersed by the
winds.Letter
Dear Isabella,
The world seems turned
upside down since I began this letterwar (
war,
what an appalling sound) has begunblood has
been spilt, and our dear, dear Eliotbut I must
tell you first how it all was. Eliot and Jasper were
out shooting some miles from Cambridge, when, on
coming to the road, they perceived an unusual
commotion
old
men and young, and even boys, all
armed, in wagons, on horseback, and on foot, were
coming from all points, and all hurrying onward in
one direction. On inquiring into the hurly-burly,
they were told that Colonel Smith had marched to
Concord to destroy the military stores there; and
that our people were gathering from all quarters to
oppose his return. Eliot immediately joined them,
Jasper did not; but, dear Isabella, I that know
you so well, know, whatever others may think, that
tories may be true and noble. There was a fight
at Lexington. Our brave men had the best of it.
Eliot was the first to bring us the news. With
a severe wound in his arm, he came ten miles that
we need not be alarmed by any reports, knowing,
as he told mother, that she was no Spartan mother,
to be indifferent whether her son came home with
his shield or on his shield.
Jasper has not been to Westbrook since the
battle. My mind has been in such a state of alarm
since, I cannot return to my ordinary pursuits. I
was reading history with the children, and the
English
poets with mother, but I am quite broken up.
I do not think this horrid war should
separate
those who have been friends; thank God, my
dear Isabella, we of womankind are exemptsnot
called upon to take sidesour mission is to heal
wounds, not to make them; to keep alive and tend
with vestal fidelity the fires of charity and love.
My kindest remembrance to Herbert. I hope he
has renounced his whiggism; for if it must come
to that, he had better fight on the wrong side (
ignorantly
)
than break the third commandment.
Write soon, dear Isabella, and let me know if this
hurly-burly extends to New-Yorkdear, quiet
New-York! In war and in peace, in all the
chances and changes of this mortal life, your own
Bessie Lee
.Miss Linwood to Bessie Lee
.
Exempts! my little spirit of peaceyour
vocation
it may be, my pretty dove, to sit on your
perch with an olive-branch in your bill, but not
mine. Oh for the glorious days of the Clorindas,
when a woman might put down her womanish
thoughts, and with helmet and lance in rest do
battle with the bravest! Why was the loyal spirit
of my race my exclusive patrimony? Can his
blood, who at his own cost raised a troop of horse
for our martyr king, flow in Herbert's veins? or
his who followed the fortunes of the unhappy
James? Is my father's son a renegadoa rebel?
Yes, Bessiemy blood burns in my cheeks while
6
I write it. Herbert, the only male scion of the
Linwoodsmy brotherour prideour hope has
declared himself of the rebel party`Ichabod,
Ichabod, the glory is departed, is written on our
door-posts.'
But to come down from my heroics; we are
in a desperate conditionsuch a scene as I have
just passed through! Judge Ellis was dining with
us, Jasper Meredith was spoken of. `In the
name of Heaven, Ellis,' said my father, `why do
you suffer your nephew to remain among the rebel
crew in that infected region?'
`I do not find,' replied the judge, glancing at
Herbert, `that any region is free from infection.'
`True, true,' said my father; `but the air of
the Yankee states is saturated with it. I would
not let an infant breathe it, lest rebellion should
break out when he came to man's estate.' I am
sorry to say it, dear Bessie; but my father traces
Herbert's delinquency to his sojourn at Westbrook.
I saw a tempest was brewing, and thinking to make
for a quiet harbour, I put in my oar, and repeated
the story you told me in your last letter of our
noncombatant
,
Mr. Jasper. The judge was charmed.
`Ah, he's a prudent fellow!' he said; `he'll not
commit himself!'
`Not commit himself!' exclaimed my father;
`by Jupiter, if he belonged to me, he should
commit
himself. I would rather he should jump the
wrong way than sit squat like a toad under a hedge,
till he was sure which side it was most
prudent
to
jump.' You see, Bessie, my father's words
implied
something like a commendation of Herbert.
I ventured to look uptheir eyes metI saw
a beam of pleasure flashing from them, and passing
like an electric spark from one heart to another.
Oh, why should this unholy quarrel tear asunder
such true hearts!
The judge's pride was touchedhe is a mean
wretch. `Ah, my dear sir,' he said, `it is very
well for you, who can do it with impunity, to
disregard
prudential considerations; for instance, you
remain true to the king, the royal power is
maintained
,
and your property is protected. Your son
I suppose a caseyour son joins the rebels,
the country is revolutionized, and your property is
secured as the reward of Mr. Herbert's patriotism.'
My father hardly heard him out. `Now, by
the Lord that made me!' he exclaimed, setting
down the decanter with a force that broke it in a
thousand pieces, `I would die of starvation before
I would taste a crumb of bread that was the reward
of rebellion.'
It was a frightful moment; but my father's
passion, you know, is like a whirlwind; one gust,
and it is over; and mamma is like those
short-stemmed
flowers that lie on the earth; no wind moves
her. So, though the judge was almost as much
disconcerted as the decanter, it seemed all to have
blown over, while mamma, as in case of any
ordinary
accident, was directing Jupe to remove the
fragments, change the cloth, etc. But alas! the
evil genius of our house triumphed; for even a
bottle of our oldest Madeira, which is usually to
my father like oil to the waves, failed to preserve
tranquillity. The glasses were filled, and my
father, according to his usual custom, gave `the
kingGod bless him.'
Now you must know, though he would not
confess he made any sacrifice to prudence, he has
for some weeks omitted to drink wine at all,
on some pretext or other, such as he had a
headache
,
or he had dined out the day before, or
expected
to the day after; and thus Herbert has
escaped the test. But now the toast was given,
and Herbert's glass remained untouched, while
he sat, not biting, but literally devouring his
nails. I saw the judge cast a sinister look at him,
and then a glance at my father. The storm was
gathering on my father's brow. `Herbert, my
son,' said mamma, `you will be too late for you
appointment.' Herbert moved his chair to rise,
when my father called out, `Stop, sirno
slinking
away under your mother's shieldhear me
no man who refuses to drink that toast at my table
shall eat of my bread or drink of my wine.'
`Then God forgive mefor I never will drink
itso help me Heaven!'
Herbert left the room by one doormy father
by anothermamma stayed calmly talking to
that fixture of a judge, and I ran to my room, where,
as soon as I had got through with a comfortable fit
of crying, I sat down to write you (who are on the
enemy's side) an account of the matter. What
will come of it, Heaven only knows!
But, my dear little gentle Bessie, I never think of
you as having any thing to do with these turbulent
matters; you are in the midst of fiery rebel spirits,
but you are too pure, too good to enter into their
counsels, and far too just for any self-originating
prejudices, such as this horrible one that pervades
the country, and fires New-England against the
legitimate rights of the mother country over her
wayward, ungrateful child. Don't trouble your
head about these squabbles, but cling to Master
Hale, your poetry, and history: by-the-way, I
laughed heartily that you, who have done
duty
reading
so virtuously all your life, should now
come to the conclusion `that history is dry.' I
met with a note in Herodotus, the most picturesque
of historians, the other day that charmed me. The
writer of the note says there is no mention
whatever
of Cyrus in the Persian history. If history
then is mere fiction, why may we not read romances
of our own choosing? My instincts have not
misguided
me, after all.
So, Miss Bessie, Jasper Meredith is in high
favour with you, and the friend of your nonpareil
brother. Jasper could always be irresistible when
he chose, and he seems to have been `i' the vein'
6*
at Westbrook. With all our impressions (are they
prejudices, Bessie?) against your Yankee land, we
thought him excessively improved by his residence
among you. Indeed, I think if he were never to
get another letter from his worldly icicle mother,
to live away from his time-serving uncle, and never
receive another importation of London
coxcombries
,
he would be what nature intended hima
paragon.
I love your sisterly enthusiasm. As to my
estimation of your brother being affected by the
accidents of birth and fortune, indeed, you were
not true to your friend when you intimated that.
Certainly, the views you tell me he takes of my
character are not particularly flattering, or even
conciliating. However, I have my revengeyou
paint him
en beau
the portrait is too beautiful
to be very like any man born and reared within
the disenchanted limits of New-England. I am
writing boldly, but no offence, dear Bessie; I do
not know your brother, and I haveyes, out with
it, with the exception of your precious little self
I have an
antipathy
to the New-Englandersa
disloyal race, and conceited, fancying themselves
more knowing in all matters, high and low,
especially
government and religion, than the rest of the
world`all-sufficient, self-sufficient, and
insufficient
.'
Pardon me, gentle BessieI am just now at
fever heat, and I could not like Gabriel if he were
whig and rebel. Ah, Herbert!but I loved him
before I ever heard these detestable words; and
once truly loving, especially if our hearts be knit
together by nature, I think the faults of the subject
do not diminish our affection, though they turn it
from its natural sweet uses to suffering.Letter
Dear Bessie,
A weeka stormy, miserable
week has passed since I wrote the above, and it
has ended in Herbert's leaving us, and dishonouring
his father's name by taking a commission in the
rebel service. Papa has of course had a horrible
fit of the gout. He says he has for ever cast
Herbert out of his affections. Ah! I am not skilled
in metaphysics, but I
know
that we have no power
whatever over our affections. Mamma takes it all
patiently, and chiefly sorroweth for that Herbert
has lost caste by joining the insurgents, whom she
thinks little better than so many Jack Cades.
For myself, I would have poured out my blood
every drop of it, to have kept him true to his
king and country; but in my secret heart I glory
in him that he has honestly and boldly clung to his
opinions, to his own certain and infinite loss. I
have no heart to write more.
Yours truly,
Isabella Linwood
.
P.S.You may show the last paragraph (
confidentially
)
to Jasper; but don't let him know that
I wished him to see it.
I. L.Letter
You say, my dear madam, that you have
heard `certain reports about me, which you are not
willing to believe, and yet cannot utterly discredit.'
You say, also, `that though you should revolt with
horror from sanctioning your son in those
liaisons
that are advised by Lord Chesterfield, and others
of your friends, yet you see no harm in'
loverlike
attentions `to young persons in inferior
stations
;
they serve' you add, `to keep alive and
cultivate
that delicate finesse so essential to the
success
of a man of the world, and, provided they
have no immoral purpose, are quite innocent,' as the
object of them must know there is an `impassable
gulf between her and her superiors in rank, and
is therefore responsible for her mistakes.' I have
been thus particular in echoing your words, that I
may assure you my conduct is in conformity to
their letter and spirit. Tranquillize yourself, my
dear madam. There is nothing, in any little
fooleries
I may be indulging in, to disquiet you for a
moment. The person in question is a divine little
creaturequite a prodigy for this part of the
world, where she lives in a seclusion almost equal to
that of Prospero's isle; so that your humble servant,
being scarce more than the `third man that e'er
she saw,' it would not be to marvel at `if he
should be the first that e'er she loved'and if I am,
it is my
destiny
my conscience is quite easy
I never have
committed
myself, nor ever shall:
time and absence will soon dissipate her illusions.
She is an unaspiring little person, quite aware of
the gulf, as you call it, between us. She believes
that even if I were lover and hero enough to play
the Leander and swim it, my destiny is fixed on
the other side. I have no distrust of myself, and I
beg you will have none; I am saved from all
responsibility
as to involving the happiness of this
lily of the valley, by her very clear-sighted mother,
7*
and her sage of a brother, her natural
guardians
.
It is yet problematical whether, as you
suppose
,
a certain lady's fortune will be made by the
apostacy of her disinherited brother. If the rebels
win the day, the property of the tories will be
confiscated
,
or transferred to the rebel heir. But all
that is in futurofortune is a fickle goddess; we
can only be sure of her present favours and deserve
the future by our devotion.
With profound gratitude and affection,
Yours, my dear mother,
J. Meredith
.
P. S.My warmest thanks for the inestimable
box, which escaped the sea and land harpies, and
came safe to hand. The Artois buckle is a
chef
d'uvre,
worthy the inventive genius of the royal
count whose taste rules the civilized world. The
scarlet frock-coat, with its unimitated, if not
inimitable
,
capes, `does credit (as friend Rivington would
say in one of his flashy advertisements) to the most
elegant operator of Leicester-fields.' I must
reserve
it till I go to New-York, where they always
take the lead in this sort of civilizationthe boys
would mob me if I wore it in Boston. The
umbrella
,
a rare invention! is a curiosity here. I
understand they have been introduced into
New-York
by the British officers. Novelty as it is, I
venture to spread it here, as its utility commends it
to these rationalists, who reason about an article
of dress as they would concerning an article of
faith.
Once more, your devoted son, M.Eliot Lee to his Mother
.
Town
, 1778.
I have
arrived thus far, my dear mother, on
my journey; and, according to my promise, am
beginning the correspondence which is to soften
our separation.
My spirits have been heavy. My anxious
thoughts lingered with you, brooded over dear
Bessie and the little troop, and dwelt on our home
affairs.
I feared Harris would neglect the thrashing,
and the wheat might not turn out as well as we
hoped; that the major might forget his promise
about the husking bee; that the pumpkins might
freeze in the loft (pray have them brought down,
I forgot it!); that the cows might fail sooner than
you expected; that the sheep might torment you.
E 2
In short, dear mother, the grief of parting seemed
to spread its shadows far and wide. If Master
Hale could have penetrated my mental processes,
he would have deemed his last admonition, to
deport myself in
thought,
word, and deed, like a
scholar, a soldier, and a gentleman, quite lost upon
me. I was an anxious wretch, and nothing else.
Poor Kisel did not serve as a tranquillizer. His
light wits were throwing off their fermentation, in
whistling, laughing, and soliloquizing: and this,
with
Beauty's
shambling gait, neither trot, canter,
nor pace, but something compounded of all,
irritated
my nerves. Never were horse and rider
better matched. Together, they make a fair
centaur
;
the animal not more than half a horse, and
Kisel not more than half a man; there is a
ludicrous correspondence between them; neither
vicious, but both unbreakable, and full of all
manner
of tricks.
Our land at this moment teems with scenes
of moral and poetic interest. We made our first
stop at the little inn in R. The landlord's
son was just setting off to join the quota to be sent
from-that county. The father, a stout old man,
was trying to suppress his emotion by bustling
about, talking loud, whistling, hemming, and
coughing
.
The mother, her tears dropping like rain,
was standing at the fire, feeling over and over again
the shirts she was airing for the knapsack. `He's
our youngest,' whispered the old man to me, `and
mammy is dreadful tender of him, poor boy!'
`Not mammy alone,' thought I, as the old man
turned away to brush off his starting tears. The
sisters were each putting some love-token, socks,
mittens, and nutcakes into the knapsack, which they
looked hardy enough to have shouldered, while one
poor girl sat with her face buried in her
handkerchief
,
weeping most bitterly. The old man patted
her on the neck`Come, Letty, cheer up!' said
he; `Jo may never have another chance to fight
for his country, and marrying can be done any day
in the year.' He turned to me with an explanatory
whisper; `'Tis tough for allJo and Letty are
published, and we were to have the wedding
thanks-giving
evening.'
All this was rather too much for me to bear,
in addition to the load already pressing on my
heart; so without waiting for my horse to be fed,
I mounted him and proceeded.
My next stop was in H. There the
company
had mustered on the green, in readiness to
begin their march. Some infirm old men, a few
young mothers, with babies in their arms, and all
the boys in the town, had gathered for the last
farewell
.
The soldiers were resting on their muskets,
and the clergyman imploring the benediction of
Heaven on their heads. `Can England,' thought
I, `hope to subdue a country that sends forth its
defenders in such a spirit, with arms of such a
9*
temper?' Oh, why does she not respect in her
children the transmitted character of their fathers!
I arrived at Mrs. Ashley's just as the family
were sitting down to tea. She and the girls are
in fine spirits, having recently received from the
colonel accounts of some fortunate skirmishes with
the British. The changed aspect of her once
sumptuous tea-table at first shocked me; but my
keen appetite (for the first time in my life, my
dear mother, I had fasted all day) quite overcame
my sensibilities; the honest pride with which my
patriotic hostess told me she had converted all her
table-cloths into shirts for her husband's men, and
the complacency with which she commended her
sage tea, magnified the virtues of her brown bread,
and self-sweetened sweetmeats would have given
a relish to coarser fare more coarsely served.
I have been pondering on the character of
our New-England people during my ride. The
aspect of our society is quiet, and, to a cursory
observer, it appears tame. We seem to have the
plodding, safe,
self-preserving
virtues; to be
industrious
,
frugal, provident, and cautious; but to
want the enthusiasm that gives to life all its poetry
and almost all its charms. But it is not so; there
is a strong under-current. Let the individual or
the people be roused by a motive that approves
itself to the reasoning and religious mind, a fervid
energy, an all-subduing enthusiasm bursts forth,
not like an accidental and transient conflagration,
but operating, like the elements, to great effects, and
irresistibly. This enthusiasm, this central fire,
is now at its height. It not only inflames the
eloquence of the orator, kindles the heart of the
soldier, the beacon-lights and strong defences of
our land; but it lights the temple of God, and
burns on the family altar. The old man throws
away his crutch; the yeoman leaves the plough in
the half-turned furrow; and the loving, quiet matron
like you, my dear mother, lays aside her domestic
anxieties, dispenses with her household comforts,
and gives the God-speed to her sons to go forth
and battle it for their country. The nature of the
contest in which we are engaged illustrates my
idea. Its sublimity is sometimes obscured by the
extravagance of party zeal. We have not been
goaded to resistance by oppression, nor fretted and
chafed, with bits and collars, to madness; but our
sages, bold with the transmitted spirit of freedom,
sown at broadcast by our Pilgrim fathers, have
reflected on the past and calculated the future; and
coolly estimating the worth of independence and
the right of self-government, are willing to hazard
all in the hope of gaining all; to sacrifice
themselves
for the prospective good of their children.
This is the dignified resolve of thinking beings,
not the angry impatience of overburdened animals.
But good-night, dear mother. After this I
shall have incidents, and not reflections merely, to
send you. The pine-knot, by the light of which
I have written this, is just flickering its last flame.
`I cannot afford you a candle,' said my good hostess
when she bade me good-night; `we sold our tallow
to purchase necessaries for the colonel's menpoor
fellows, some of them are yet barefooted!'
I shall enclose a line to Bessieperhaps she
will show it to you; but do not ask it of her. Tell
dear Fan I shall remember her charge, and give
the socks she knit to the first `brave barefooted
soldier'
I see. Sam must feed Steady for me; and
dear little Hal must continue, as he has begun, to
couple brother Eliot with the `poor soldiers' in his
prayers. Again farewell, dear mother. Your
little Bible is before me; my eye rests on the
few lines you traced on the title-page; and as I
press my lips to them, they inspire holy
resolutions
.
God grant I may not mistake their
freshness
for vigour. What I may be is uncertain;
but I shall ever remain, as I am now, dearest
mother,
Your devoted son,
Eliot Lee
.Letter
My sweet sister Bessie, nothing has afflicted
me so much in leaving home as parting from you.
I am inclined to believe there can be no stronger
nor tenderer affection than that of brother and
sister; the sense of protection on one part, and
dependance on the other; the sweet recollections
of childhood; the unity of interest; and the
communion
of memory and hope, blend their hearts
together into one existence. So it is with usis
it not, my dear sister? With me, certainly; for
though, like most young men, I have had my
fancies, they have passed by like the summer
breeze, and left no trace of their passage. All the
love, liking (I cannot find a word to express the
essential volatility of the sentiment in my
experience
of it) that I have ever felt for all my
favourites, brown and fair, does not amount to one
thousandth part of the immutable affection that I
bear you, my dear sister. I speak only of my
own experience, Bessie, and, as I well know,
against the faith of the world. I should be told
that my fraternal love would pale in the fires of
another passion, as does a lamp at the shining of
the sun; but I don't believe a word of itdo
you,
Bessie? I am not, my dear sister, playing the
inquisitor with you, but fearfully and awkwardly
enough approaching a subject on which I thought
it would be easier to write than to speak; but I
find it cannot be easy to do that, in any mode,
which may pain you.
I have neglected the duty I owed you; and
yet, perhaps, no vigilance could have prevented
E 3
the natural consequence of your intercourse with
one of the most fascinating men in the world.
There, it is out!and now I can write freely. I
said I had neglected my duty; but I was not
conscious
of this till too late. The truth is, my mind
has been so engrossed with political subjects, so
harassed with importunate cravings and conflicting
duties, that I was for a long time unobservant of
what was passing under my eye. I awoke as from
a dream, and found (or feared) that my sister's
happiness was at stake; that she had given, and
given to one unworthy, the irrequitable boon of
her affections; irrequitable, but, thank Heaven,
not irrecoverable. No, I do not believe one word
of all the trumpery about incurable love. I will
not adopt a faith, however old and prevailing,
which calls in question our moral power to achieve
any conquest over ourselves. For my own part,
I do not think we have any power over our
affections
to give or withdraw them, or even to
measure
their amount. This may seem a startling
assertion, and contradictory of what I have said
above; but it is not. The sentiment I there
alluded
to is generated by accidental circumstances,
is half illusion, unsustained by reason,
unauthorized
by realitiesnot the immortal love infused
by Heaven and sustained by truth; but a disease
very mortal and very curable, dear Bessie, believe
me. Such a mind as yours, so pure, so elevated,
has a self-rectifying power. You have felt the
influence of the delightful qualities which M
undoubtedly possesses; and why should you not,
for who is more susceptible to grace and
refinement
than yourself? Heaven has so arranged the
relations of affections and qualities, that, as I have
said above, we can neither give nor withhold our
lovethe heart has no tenants at will. If M
has assumed, or you have imputed to him qualities
which he does not possess, your affection will be
dissipated with the illusion. But if the spell still
remains unbroken, I entreat you, my dear sister,
not to waste your sensibility, the precious food
of life, the life of life, in moping melancholy.
`Attach thee firmly (I quote from memory) to the
virtuous
deeds
And offices of loveto love itself,
With all its vain and transient joys, sit loose.'
I have long had a lurking distrust of M. He
has acted too cautious a part in politics for a sound
heart. Let a man run the risk of hanging for it
either way; but if he have a spark of generosity, he
will be either a whole-souled whig or a loyal tory
in these times.
I know what Mhas so often reiterated.
`He had a mother in England; all his friends were
on the royal side; and, on the other hand, his
property
was here, and might depend on the favour of
the rebels; and indeed, there was so much to be
said on both sides, that a man might well pause!'
There are moments in men's histories when none
but cowards or knaves, or (worse than either)
cold-blooded
,
selfish wretches, would
pause!
It is possible that I misjudge him; Heaven
grant it! All that I
know
is, that he is in New-York
no longer,
pausing,
but the aid of General Clinton.
It is barely possible that he has written; letters are
not transmitted with any security in these times;
but why did he not speak before he went? why, up
to the very hour of his departure (as my mother
says, you know I was absent), did he continue a
devotion which must end in suffering and
disappointment
to you? There is a vicious vanity and
selfishness in this, most unmanly and detestable.
Do not think, dearest Bessie, that I am anxious to
prove him unworthyAlas, alas! I was far too
slow to believe him so; and I now only set before
you these inevitable inferences from his conduct, in
the hope that your illusion will sooner vanish, and
you will the sooner recover your tranquillity.
I am writing without a ray of light, except
what comes from the embers on the hearth.
Perhaps
you will think I am in Egyptian mental
darkness
.
No, Bessie, I must be clear-sighted when I
have nothing in view but your honour and
happiness
.
They shall ever be my care, even more than
my own. But why do I separate that which is one
and indivisible? Good-night, dear sister. Let me
fancy you listening to me; your sweet eye fixed on
me; no dejected nor averted look; your face
beaming
,
as I have often seen it, with the tenderness
so dangerous here, so safe in heaven; the hope so
often defeated here, there ever brightening; the
joy so transient here, there enduring!Let me see
this blessed vision, and I shall sleep sweetly and
sweetly dream of home.
Ever thine, Bessie,
E. L.Letter
My Dearest Mother,
I arrived safely at
headquarters on the 22d. Colonel Ashley
received
me with open arms. He applauded my
resolution to join the army, and bestowed his curses
liberally (as is his wont on whatever displeases him)
on the young men who linger at home, while the
gallant spirits of France and Poland are crossing
the ocean to volunteer in our cause. He rubbed
his hands exultingly when I told him that it was
your self-originating decision that I should leave
you. `The only son of your motherthat is, the
only one to speak of' (forgive him, Sam and Hal),
`and she a widow!' he exclaimed. `Let them talk
about their Spartan mothers, half men and
demimonsters
;
but look at our women-folks, as tender
and as timid of their broods as hens, and as bold
and self-sacrificing as martyrs! You come of a
good stock, my boy, and so I shall tell the gin'ral.
He's old Virginia, my lad; and looks well to blood
in man and horse.'
The next morning he called, his kind heart
raying out through his jolly face, to present me to
General Washington. If ever I go into battle,
which Heaven of its loving mercy grant, I pray
my heart may not thump as it did when I
approached
the mean little habitation, now the
residence
of our noble leader. `You tremble, Eliot,'
said my colonel, as we reached the door-step. `I
don't wonderI always feel my joints give a little
when I go before him. I venerate him next to
the Deity; but it is not easy to get used to him as
you do to other men.'
When we entered, the general was writing. If
Sam wishes to know whether my courage returned
when I was actually in his presence, tell him I
then forgot myselfforgot I had an impression to
make. The general requested us to be seated
while he finished his despatches. The copies were
before him, all in his own hand. `Every
t
crossed,
and every
i
dotted,' whispered the colonel, pointing
to the papers. `He's godlike in that; he finishes
off little things as completely as great.' I could
not but smile at the comparison, though it was
both striking and just. When the general had
finished, and had read the letters of introduction
from Governor Hancock and Mr. Adams, which I
presented, `You see, sir,' said my kind patron,
`that my young friend here is calculating to enter
the army; I'll answer for him, he'll prove good
and true; up to the mark, as his father Sam Lee
was before him. He, that is, Sam Lee, and I,
fit
side by side in the French war; I was no flincher,
you know, sir, and he was as brave as Julius Csar,
Sam was; so I think my friend Eliot here has a
pretty considerable claim.'
`But, my good sir,' said the general, `you
know we are contending against hereditary claims.'
`That's true, sir; and thank the Lord, he can
stand on his own ground; he shot one of the first
guns at Lexington, and got pretty well
peppered
too, though he was a lad then, with a face as smooth
as the palm of my hand.'
`Something too much of this,' thought I; and I
attempted to stop my trumpeter's mouth by saying
`I had no claims on the score of the affair at
Lexington
;
that my being there was accidental, and
I fought on instinct.'
`Ah, my boy,' said the colonel, determined to
tell his tale out, `you may say thatthere's no
courage like that that comes by
natur,
gin'ral; he
stood within two feet of me, as straight as a
tombstone
,
when a spent ball bounding near him, he
caught it in his hands just as if he'd been
playing
wicket, and said, you may throw down your
bat, my boys, I've caught you out!was not that
metal?'
General Washington's countenance relaxed as
the colonel proceeded (I ventured a side glance),
and at the conclusion he gave two or three
emphatic
and pleased nods; but his grave aspect
returned immediately, and he said, as I thought, in
a most frigid manner, `the request, Mr. Lee, of my
friends of Massachusetts, that you may receive
a commission in the service, deserves attention;
Colonel Ashley is a substantial voucher for your
personal merit. Are you aware, sir, that a post of
honour in our army involves arduous labour,
hardships
,
and self-denial? Do you know the actual
condition of our officersthat their pay is in
arrears
,
and their private resources exhausted? There
are among them men who have bravely served
their country from the beginning of this contest;
gentlemen who have not a change of linen; to
whom I have even been compelled to deny,
because
I had not the power to divert them from
their original destination, the coarse clothes
provided
for the soldiers. This is an affecting, but a
true view of our actual condition. Should the
Almighty prosper our cause, as, if we are true to
ourselves, he assuredly will, these matters will
improve
;
but I have no lure to hold out to you, no
encouragement but the sense of performing your
duty to your country. Perhaps, Mr. Lee, you
would prefer to reflect further, before you assume
new obligations?'
`Not a moment, sir. I came here determined
to serve my country at any post you should assign
me. If a command is given me, I shall be
grateful
VOL. I.F 11
for it: if not, I shall enter the ranks as a private
soldier.'
General Washington exchanged glances with
the colonel, that implied approbation of my
resolution
,
but not one syllable dropped of
encouragement
as to the commission; and it being evident that
he had no leisure to protract our audience, we took
our leave.
I confess I came away rather crest-fallen. I
am not such a puppy, my dear mother, as to
suppose
my single arm of much consequence to my
country, but I felt an agreeable, perhaps an
exaggerated
consciousness, that I deservednot
applause
,
but some token of encouragement.
However
,
the colonel said this was his way; `he
never
disappoints an expectation,seldom authorizes one.'
`Is he cold-hearted?' I asked.
`The Lord forgive you! Eliot,' he replied.
`Cold-hearted!No, his heat does not go off by
flashes, but keeps the furnace hot out of which the
pure gold comes. Lads never think there is any
fire unless they see the sparks and hear the roar.'
`But, sir,' said I, `I believe there is a very
common impression that General Washington is
of a reserved, cold temperament'
`The devil take common impressions. They
are made on sand, and are both false and fleeting.
Wait, Eliotyou are true metal, and I will venture
your impressions when you shall know our noble
commander better. Cold, egad,' he half muttered
to himself; `where the deuse, then, has the heat
come from that has cemented our army together,
and kept their spirits up when their fingers and
toes were freezing?'
Give me joy, my dear mother; a kiss, Bessie; a
good hug, my dear little sisters; and a huzza, boys!
General Washington has sent me a lieutenant's
commission, and a particularly kind note with it.
So, it appears, that while I was thinking him so
lukewarm to my application, he lost no time in
transmitting it to Congress, and enforcing it by his
recommendation. Our camp is all bustle.
Soldiers
,
just trained and fit for service, are departing,
their term of enlistment having expired. The
new quotas are coming in, raw, undisciplined
troops. The general preserves a calm, unaltered
mien; but his officers fret and fume in private, and
say that nothing effective will ever be achieved
while Congress permits these short enlistments.
Thanks to you, dear mother; my funds have
enabled me to purchase a uniform. I have just
tried it on. I wish you could all see me in it.
`Every woman is at heart a rake,' says Pope; that
every man is at heart a coxcomb, is just about as
F 2
true. My new dress will lose its holyday gloss
before we meet again, but the freshness of my
love for you will never be dimmed, my dear
mother
;
for Bessie, and for all the little band, whose
bright faces are even now before my swimming
eyes.
Yours devotedly,
Eliot Lee
.
P. S.My poor jack-o'-lantern, Kisel, is of
course of no use to me, neither does he give me much
trouble. He is a sort of mountebank among the
soldiers, merry himself and making others merry.
If he is a benefactor who makes two blades of
grass grow where but one grew before, Kisel
certainly
is, while he produces smiles where rugged
toil and want have stamped a scowl of discontent.Herbert Linwood to his Sister.
July
30
th,
1779.
Dearest Belle,
I write under the inspiration
of the agreeable consciousness that my letter may
pass under the sublime eye of your
commander-in-chief
,
or be scanned and sifted by his underlings.
I wish to Heaven that, without endangering your
bright orbs, I could infuse some retributive virtue
into my ink to strike them blind. But the deuse
take them. I defy their oversight. I am not
discreet
enough to be trusted with military or
political
secrets, and therefore, like Hotspur's Kate, I
can betray none. As to my own private affairs,
though I do not flatter myself I have attained a
moral eminence which I may challenge the world
to survey, yet I'll expose nothing to you, dear Belle,
whose opinion I care more for than that of king,
lords, and commons, which the whole world may
not know without your loving brother being
dishonoured
thereby: so, on in my usual `streak o'
lightning style,' with facts and feelings.
You have before this seen the official account
of our successful attack on Stony Point, and have
doubtless been favoured with the additional light
of Rivington's comments, your veritable editor.
These thralls of party editors! The light they emit
is like that of conjurers, intended to produce false
impressions.
Do not imagine I am going to send you a regular
report of the battle. With all due deference to
your superior mental faculties, my dear, you are
but a woman, and these concernments of `vile
guns' must for ever remain mysteries to you. But,
Belle, I'll give you the romance of the affair`thy
vocation, Hal.'
My friend Eliot Lee has a vein of quixotism,
that reminds me of the inflammable gas I have seen
issuing from a cool healthy spring. Doctor Kissam,
you know, used to say every man had his insanity.
Eliot's appears in his affection for a half-witted
follower, one Kisel; the oddest fellow in this world.
His life is a series of consecutive accidents, of good
and bad
luck
.
On the 10th he had been out on the other side
of the river,
vagrantizing
in his usual fashion, and
returning late to his little boat, and, as we suspect,
having fallen asleep, he drifted ashore at Stony
Point. There he came upon the fort, and a string
of trout (which he is seldom without) serving him
as a passport, he was admitted within the walls,
His simplicity, unique and inimitable, shielded him
from suspicion, and a certain inspiration which
seems always to come direct from Heaven at the
moment of his necessity, saved him from betraying
the fact that he belonged to our army, and he was
suffered to depart in peace. The observations he
made (he is often acute) were of course
communicated
to his master, and by him made available to our
enterprise. Eliot and myself were among the
volunteers
.
He, profiting by Kisel's hints, guided us
safely through some `sloughs of despond.' With
all his skill, we had a killing scramble over
pathless
mountains, and through treacherous swamps,
under a burning sun, the mercury ranging
somewhere
between one and two hundred, so that my
sal volatile blood seemed to have exhaled in vapour,
and my poor body to be a burning coal, whose next
state would be ashes.
Our General Wayne (you will understand his
temper from his
nom de guerre,
`mad Anthony')
had ordered us to advance with unloaded muskets
and fixed bayonets. He was above all things
anxious to avoid an accidental discharge, which
might alarm the garrison. At eight in the evening
we were within a mile and a half of the fort, and
there the detachment halted; while Wayne, with
Eliot and some other officers, went to reconnoitre.
They had approached within gunshot of the works,
when poor Kisel, who away from Eliot is like an
unweaned child, and who had been all day
wandering
in search of him, suddenly emerged from the
wood, and in a paroxysm of joy discharged his
musket. Wayne sprang forward, and would have
transfixed him with his bayonet, had not Eliot
thrown himself before Kisel, and turned aside
Wayne's arm: some angry words followed, but it
ended in the general leaving Kisel to be managed
by Eliot's discretion. The general's displeasure,
however, against Eliot, did not subside at once.
When the moment for attack came, I felt
myself
shivering, not with fear, no, `
franchement
' (as
our old teacher Dubois used to say on the few
occasions when he meant to tell the truth),
franchement
,
not with fear, but with the recollection of my
father's last words to me. The uncertain chances
of a fierce contest were before me, and my father's
curse
rung in my ears like the voices that
turned
the poor wretches in the Arabian tale into
stone. Once in the fight, it was forgotten; all men
are bulldogs then, and think of nothing past or to
come.
They opened a tremendous fire upon us; it was
the dead of night, Belle, and rather a solemn time,
I assure you. Our commander was wounded by
a musket ball: he fell, and instantly rising on one
knee, he cried, `Forward, my brave boys,
forward
.'
The gallant shout gave us a new impulse;
and we rushed forward, while Eliot Lee, with that
singular blending of cool courage and generosity
which marks him, paused and assisted the general's
aid in bearing him on, in compliance with the wish
he had expressed (believing himself mortally
wounded), that he might die in the fort. Thank
God, he survived; and being as magnanimous as he
is brave, he reported to the commander-in-chief
Eliot's gallantry and good conduct throughout the
whole affair, and particularly dwelt on the aid he
had given him, after having received from him
injurious
epithets. In consequence of all this, Eliot
is advanced to the rank of captain. Luck is a
lord, Belle; I would fain have distinguished myself,
but I merely, like the rest, performed my part
honourably, for which I received the thanks of
General Washington, and got my name blazoned
in the report to Congress.
I hear that Helen Ruthven is dashing away in
New-York, not, as I expected, after her romantic
departure hence, as the honourable Mrs. O.
Well! all kind vestals guard her! Heaven knows
she needs their vigilance. Rumour says, too, that
you are shortly to vow allegiance to my royalist
friend. God bless you! my dear sister. If it
were true (alas! nothing is more false) that matches
are made in Heaven, I know
who
would be your
liege-lord. Another match there was, that in my
boyhoodmy boyhood! my youth, my maturity,
I believed Heaven had surely made. It is a musty
proverb, that. Farewell, Belle; kiss my dear
mother
for me, and tell her I would not have her, like
the old Scotch woman, pray for our side, `right or
wrong,' but let her pray for the right side, and then
VOL. I.H 15
her poor son will be sure to prosper. Oh, would
that I could, without violating my duty to my
country
,
throw myself at my father's feet. His loyalty
is not truer to King George, than mine to him.
Dearest Belle, may Heaven reunite us all.
Yours,
H.
Linwood
.
P. S.Kind love, don't forge it, to Rose.No, no, my dear Belle, I cannot remove to the
cityit must not be; and I am sorry the question
is again mooted. `A woman, and naturally born
to fears,' I may be; but because I have that
inconvenient
inheritance, I see no reason why I
should cherish and augment it. Your
imagination
,
which is rather an active agent, has
magnified
the terrors of the times; and it seems just
now to be unduly excited by the monstrous tales
circulated in the city, of the atrocities the Yankees
have committed on the tories. I see in
Rivington's
Gazette, which you wrapped around the
sugarplums that you sent the children (thank you),
various precious anecdotes of Yankee tigers and
tory
lambs,
forsooth! that are just about as true
as the tales of giants and ogres with which your
childhood was edified. The Yankees are a
civilized
race, and never, God bless them! commit
gratuitous cruelties. If they still `see it to be
duty' (to quote their own Puritan phrase), they will
cling to this contest till they have driven the
remnant
of your Israel, Belle, every tory and
Englishman
,
from the land; but they will commit no
episodical murders: it is only the ignorant man
that is unnecessarily cruel. They are an instructed,
kind-hearted, Christian people; and of this there
will be abundant proof while the present war is
remembered
.
Remember, Belle, these people have
unadulterated English blood in their veins, which
to you should be a prevailing argument in their
favour
;
and believe me, they have a fair portion of
the spirit of their freedom-loving and all-daring
ancestors
.
Our English mother, God bless her, too,
should have known better than to trammel, scold,
and try to whip her sons into obedience, when
they had come to man's estate, and were fit to
manage their own household. Thank Heaven, I
have outlived the prejudices against the people of
New-England which my father transmitted to his
children. `There they come,' he used to say,
when he saw these busy people driving into the
manor; `every snow brings them, and, dn them,
every thaw too!'
What a pander to ignorance and malignity is
this same prejudice, Belle! How it disturbs the
sweet accords of nature, sacrilegiously severs the
bonds by which God has united man to man, and
breaks the human family into parties and sects!
How it clouds the intellect and infects the heart
with its earthborn vapours; so that the
Englishman
counts it virtue to scorn the American, and
the
true
American cherishes a hatred of the
Englishman
.
Our generous friends in the south look
with contempt on the provident, frugal sons of the
Puritans; and they, blinded in their turn, can see
nothing but the swollen pride of slave-owners and
22*
hard-heartedness of slave-drivers in their brethren
of the south. Even you, dear Belle, have not
escaped this
atmospheric
influence. After a
general
denunciation of the rebels, as you term the
country's troops, you say, in the letter now before
me, `of course, you have nothing to fear from the
British regulars;' and I reply, like the poor brute
in the fable, `Heaven save me from my friends!'
The British soldiers are aliens to the soil; they have
neither `built houses nor tilled lands' here; and
they cannot have the same kindly and home
feeling
that a native extends to the denizens of his
own land. Besides, they are, for the most part,
trained to the inhuman trade of war; and though
I have all due respect for English blood, and know
many of their officers to be most amiable and
accomplished men, I never see a detachment of
their troops, with their colours flying (and such
often pass within sight of us), without a sudden
coldness creeping over me. Then there are the
Jagers and other mercenaries that our friends have
brought over to fight out this family quarrelis
this right, Belle? You will suspect me of having
turned whigwell, keep your suspicion to
yourself
.
The truth is, that living isolated as I do, I
have a fairer point of view than you, surrounded as
you are by British officers and tories devoted to
the royal cause, and to you, my beautiful niece,
their elected sovereign.
My only substantial fear, after all, is of the
cowboys and skinners, more especially the last,
who have done some desperate deeds in my
neighbourhood
.
I have taken care to have it well
known that I have sent all my plate and valuables
to the city, and I hope and believe they will not
pay me a visit. Should they, however, a widow
and two blind children have little to dread from
creatures who are made in the image of God,
defaced
as that image may be. Defenceless
creatures
have a fortress in every human heart. No, I
repeat it, I cannot go to the city. You say I am
afraid of the shackles of city life! I confess, that
with my taste for freedom, and my long indulgence
in it, they would be galling to me. I could,
however
,
bear them without wincing to be near you,
but my children, Bellemy
blind
children! my
paramount duty is to them, and is prescribed and
absolute. In the city they are continually
reminded
of their privation, and the kinder their friends
the more manifold are the evidences of it; there
they feel that they are merely objects of
compassion
,
supernumeraries in the human family, who
can only receive, not give. Here they have
motives to exertions, dependants on their care.
Their fruits and flowers, doves, rabbits, chickens,
ducks, dogs, and kittens, live and thrive by them.
Nature is to them a perpetual study and delight.
I have just been walking with them over the hill
behind my house. You remember the hill is
fringed
with beech-trees, and crowned by their superior
forest brethren, the old tory oak, the legitimate
sovereign by the grace of God; the courtier elm
(albeit American!), that bows its graceful limbs to
every breeze; the republican maple, that resists all
hostility; and the evergreen pine, a loyalistis it,
Belle? well, be it so; it always wears the same
coat, but they say its heart is not the soundest!
Pardon me, we fall so naturally into political
allusions
in these times.
My children have learned so accurately to
discriminate
sounds, that as we walked over the hill,
they made me observe the variations of sound
when the breezes whispered among the light
beech-leaves
,
when they stole through the dense masses
of the maple foliage, fluttered over the pendent
stems of the elm, rustled along the polished
oak-leaves
,
and passed in soft musical sighs, like the
lowest breath of the olian harp, over the bristled
pines. Do you remember the lively little stream
that dashes around the rear of this hill, and
winding
quietly through the meadow at its base, steals
into the Hudson? They, in their rambles,
unattended
and fearless, have worn a footpath along
the margin of this stream, and wherever there
is a mossy rock, or fallen trunk of a tree, they
may be seen tying up wild flowers, or the arm of
each around the other, singing hymns and songs.
I have seen men with hard features and rough
hands arrested by the sound of their voices, and
as they listened, the tears trickling down their
weather-beaten faces. Can I fear for them, Belle?
They both delight in gardening; they love none
but flowers of sweet odour; no unperfumed flower,
however beautiful, is tolerated; but the lawn, the
borders of the walks, all their shady haunts, are
enamelled with mignionette, violets, lilies of the
valley, carnations, clove-pinks, and every
sweet-breathed
flower. The magnificent view of the
Hudson from the piazza they cannot see; but they
have wreathed the pillars with honeysuckles and
sweet-briers, and there they sit and enjoy the
southwest
breezes, the chief luxury of our climate.
Could I pen them up in a city, where they will
never walk into the fresh air but to be a spectacle,
and where they must be utterly deprived of the
ministration of nature through which God
communes
with their spirits? I am sure you will
acquiesce
in my decision, my dear Isabella. You
need not try to convince your father of my
rationality
;
the reasonableness of any woman is a
contradiction
in terms to him. Whatever may happen,
your mother will not reproach me: she will only
say again what she has so often said before, `that
she expected it, poor sister Mary was always so
odd.' This letter is all about myself. I have
anxieties too about you, but for the present I keep
them to myself. The bright empyrean of hope
is for youth to soar in, and your element shall not
be invaded by croakings from the bogs of
experience
.
Truly yours,
Mary Archer.